Authors
Brian L. Johnson
Number of Reviews
147

Title
Review for Hand That Rocks the Cradle, The (1992)
     Annabella Sciorra is three months pregnant when her gynecologist
moves.  A new gynecologist is recommended to her.  When she goes to her
first appointment he sexually molests her.  She files a suit against him
and when she does four other women also file suit.  The doctor commits
suicide when he hears about it.  His widow, Rebecca DeMornay, is also
pregnant and she loses her baby due to a miscarriage because of stress.
DeMornay feels that Sciorra and her husband Matt McCoy are responsible
for the loss of DeMornay's baby.  Six months later, Sciorra is putting
in a greenhouse and has trouble building it and taking care of her new
baby so she puts an advertisement in the newspaper for a nanny.
DeMornay answers the advertisement under a false name and gets the job.
The reason DeMornay takes the job is to try to take Sciorra's family
away from her.
     THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE is a suspense film, not a horror
film.  It is not very gory and, like ALIEN, mostly relies on suspense
to carry you through the film.  On a zero to five scale I give THE HAND
THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE a five.  It is rated R for  female nudity, adult
situations, adult humor, violence, and explicit language.
     Before I went to see THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE, I had heard
mixed opinions on the film from my friends ranging from, "It's wonderful
go out and see it" to "It's a piece of trash don't bother."  I am happy
to say that after seeing the film I give it a "It's wonderful go out and
see it."  I highly recommend that you go out and see this film, but head
out to the theater early, because I went to the late showing (around
9:30 PM) and ten minutes before show time the show was sold out.
     Rebecca DeMornay (who has been in many films including RISKY
BUSINESS, the made-for-cable film BY DAWN'S EARLY LIGHT, and most
recently BACKDRAFT) is the main star of the film.  She has the most
interesting, and most three dimensional, character in the film.  She has
to make the children like her, while still getting her revenge on
Sciorra's character.  She is the evil presence that the audience isn't
supposed to like.  And in the film when DeMornay gets punched the
audience in the showing I went to applauded.
     Annabella Sciorra plays the mother of the children.  She has to
put up with all the problems that start to occur after DeMornay shows
up.  Her role was played down, probably so DeMornay's would stand out.
And Matt McCoy (the new man in POLICE ACADEMY 5: ASSIGNMENT MIAMI BEACH
and POLICE ACADEMY 6: CITY UNDER SIEGE) plays Sciorra's husband.  His
conflict in the film, is that he has to resist DeMornay's tempting to
leave Sciorra.
     Ernie Hudson (a ghostbuster) plays a mentally-slow person who is
working at McCoy and Sciorra's house.  He is doing outside work like
putting up a fence, and painting the house.  He is the person that the
audience is supposed to like the most, or at least I did.  I feel that
his character was the best written and really got the audience to feel
for him the most.  The film doesn't in anyway put down mentally retarded
people, but instead puts out the message that they are people and have
rights too.
     The director, Chris Hanson, did a good job picking camera angles
and the lighting for the film.  He can make even a daylight scene feel
spooky, something that not all directors can do.
     So, see this film, in the theater, for it will not be as spooky on
a television screen.

Title
Review for Wisecracks (1991)
100 min., R, Stand-Up/Documentary, 1991
Director: Gail Singer
Cast: Whoopi Goldberg, Sandra Shamas, Phillis Dillar, Jenny Lecoat,
      Carol Burnette, Pam Stone, Carrie Snow, Joy Behar,
      Ellen DeGeneres, Maxine Lapidus, Jenny Jones, Emily Levine,
      Robin Tyler, Paula Poundstone, Maria Callous, JoAnne Astrow,
      Deborah Theaker, Kim Wayans, The Alexander Sisters,
      The Clichettes, Faking it Three, Dorothy Hart, Geri Jewell,
      Carol Channing, Lucille Ball
     This film is a combination of stand-up comedy acts and a
documentary about stand-up comediennes and how they do what they do.
     I didn't think much of WISECRACKS at all.  It was boring and not
that well put together.  I suggest that, unless you are interested in
becoming a stand-up comic, you skip this film.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give WISECRACKS a one.  WISECRACKS is rated R for explicit
language, adult situations, and adult humor.
     One of the problems with this film, at least in my area, was that
it was marketed as a stand-up comedy movie.  Only briefly did it hint
that it was a documentary.  The film is not a stand-up movie, and those
going to it expecting that will be sorely disappointed.  It is mostly a
documentary on stand-up comedy with some acts mixed in to try and keep
your interest up.
     Another thing that really hit me about the film is that the film
would have one of the comediennes explaining her act, but then you
wouldn't see any of her stand-up until about half an hour later, or just
the opposite, you would see the act and then about half an hour later
you would here an explanation of the act.  I think that the film would
have flowed much more smoothly if they had the person explain about
their act, or about stand-up in general, as some did, and then show the
person at work.  For some of the acts, I don't think that I ever saw the
comedienne give a talk (but maybe I was dozing off through that part).
     Many of the people talking repeated what earlier people had already
said, but using different words thus making the film repetitive.  Also,
just when some of the acts were starting to get funny they would be cut
off and the ending was never shown.  Some were sprinkled out, so that
over a period of fifteen minutes an entire segment was shown in little
pieces.

Title
Review for Knight Moves (1992)
100 min., R, Suspense/Mystery, 1993
Director: Carl Schenkel
Cast: Christopher Lambert, Diane Lane, Tom Skerritt, Daniel Baldwin,
      Charles Bailey-Gates, Alex Diakun
     Christopher Lambert is a Grandmaster chess competitor.  While the
competition is going on, a serial killer starts killing females, and
Lambert is the only suspect that Tom Skerritt, the police chief, has.
The killer starts playing a game with Lambert to see if Lambert can
catch the killer before the game is over.  Skerritt and his partner
Daniel Baldwin have psychiatrist Diane Lane called in to investigate
Lambert to see if he is doing the killings.
     KNIGHT MOVES is an excellent suspense film that I suggest that you
see soon, because I don't think that it will be in the theaters for
long, even though it was released this weekend.  I think that KNIGHT
MOVES is worth full admission price and is a must see.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give KNIGHT MOVES a five.  KNIGHT MOVES is rated R for
explicit language, female nudity, adult situations, and graphic
violence.
     The cast for this film is excellent.  Christopher Lambert
(HIGHLANDER, GREYSTOKE: THE LEGEND OF TARZAN LORD OF THE APES) is very
good.  Diane Lane (CHAPLIN, NATIONAL LAMPOON GOES TO THE MOVIES) is the
reason that I went to see this film.  I am a fan of her work, and I am
pleased to say that she is excellent.  Tom Skerritt (POISON IVY [1992
version], WILD ORCHID 2: TWO SHADES OF BLUE) is the other reason to see
this film.  He is usually a great actor and this film is no exception.
Daniel Baldwin gives a good performance.
     KNIGHT MOVES is very well written and quite suspenseful.  This film
is not very gory, so those of you with weak stomachs won't be bothered
if you see this film.  The director, Carl Schenkel does a wonderful job
of creating a suspenseful atmosphere in this film.
     I especially enjoyed how the beginning credits of the film were
done.  They created an air of mystery, right from the beginning.  I also
thought that doing them in black and white probably enhanced the effect.

Title
Review for Superstar: The Life and Times of Andy Warhol (1991)
90 min., not rated, Documentary, 1990
Director: Chuck Workman
Cast: Andy Warhol, Dennis Hopper, Sylvia Miles, Fran Lebowitz,
      Ultra Violet, Viva
     This is a documentary about one of the most interesting and
brilliant people in entertainment history, Andy Warhol, who lived from
1928 to 1987.  He became famous after painting some Campbell's soup
cans.  He continued painting as well as branching out into movie-making.
Some of his movies were bizarre, like a six-hour underground film about
a person sleeping and ANDY WARHOL'S FRANKENSTEIN.  Some were sexually
oriented in nature, like ANDY WARHOL'S DRACULA.  Some were black in
nature, like ANDY WARHOL'S BAD.  But most of all they were Andy.
     I tend not to care for documentaries too much.  I have seen
several, like CHUCK BERRY--HAIL! HAIL! ROCK 'N' ROLL, THE COMPLEAT
BEATLES, and THE MAKING OF A LEGEND: GONE WITH THE WIND, that I have
just found slow and boring.  When watching a documentary I like to be
entertained as I am learning about the person/group.  The best actual
documentary that I have seen is MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE (my actual
favorite is "Weird Al" Yankovic's spoof of documentaries called THE
COMPLEAT AL).  SUPERSTAR I found to be an enjoyable documentary to
watch.  It wasn't too long and it didn't bore me.  To the best of my
knowledge, SUPERSTAR is not on video cassette [actually it is; I just
saw it in my videostore yesterday, under "Andy Warhol, Superstar"
-Moderator], but is still running in the small arty type theaters.  I
don't recommend SUPERSTAR for a general audience, but for people who are
interested in Andy Warhol.  If you are not interested in Andy Warhol,
this film will probably be incredibly boring for you.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give SUPERSTAR a three.  SUPERSTAR is unrated but
contains explicit language, brief female nudity, and brief male nudity.
     This film had a lot of ways of hiding what it was telling you so
that you didn't realize that you were gaining knowledge.  The part that
I felt was the best done was the beginning with the television screens.
It was visually pleasing, yet insightful into Andy Warhol.  I also liked
how, towards the center of the film, clips from many of Warhol's films
were included.  I feel that it is interesting that most of the people
who are interviewed in the film are now dead.  I also find it
interesting that Andy Warhol was shot by one of his former actresses and
sad that he died, not of the gunshot wound, but of the care he received
in the hospital.  I really don't have too much more to say, other than I
enjoyed the film, and I will try to hunt out some of Andy's old work to
see.

Title
Review for Pit and the Pendulum, The (1990) (V)
97 min, Not Rated, Horror, 1991
Director: Stuart Gordon
Cast: Lance Henriksen, Rona De Ricci, Jonathan Fuller, Frances Bay,
      Mark Margolis, Jeffrey Combs, Stephen Lee, Tom Towles,
      William J. Norris, Carolyn Purdy-Gordon, Oliver Reed
     The film is set in the 1400s during the Spanish Inquisition.  Baker
Fuller and his wife De Ricci make bread to sell at the frying of a
witch, Purdy-Gordon.  They are against the burning of people as witches
so they plan to stay just long enough to sell their bread.  They get
stuck in a crowd and are forced to watch the burning.  After the witch
is fried the guards bring out her son and whip him.  De Ricci runs up to
the guards and tell them to stop beating the boy, and the guards put her
in prison as a witch.  Fuller went to the leader of the Spanish
Inquisition, Henricksen, and asks if he would free De Ricci because she
is not a witch.  Henricksen says that she will stand trial and that will
determine whether she is a witch or not.
     Instead of being a slasher film about some maniac on the loose
killing nubile co-eds, like most modern horror films, THE PIT AND THE
PENDULUM is more of a horror of the tortures humans do to themselves.
However the film has nothing to do with Edgar Allan Poe's story, which
it is supposedly based on.  The video cassette box states on it "Edgar
Allan Poe's THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM"; it should just state "THE PIT AND
THE PENDULUM."  There is however a scene with Oliver Reed that is quite
close to "The Cask of the Amontillado."  The pit and the pendulum, which
played such an important role in Edgar's story, take a back seat spot in
the film.  The film could have been much better if given, maybe, a
better cast and if it followed Edgar Allan Poe's short story more.  The
whole part of the short story where the man is hooked onto the ground
and the pendulum comes swinging closer and closer is put into a small
couple of minutes scene.  The rest of the film is based on Rona De
Ricci's time spent in the dungeons and her husband Fuller trying to save
her.  All of this wasn't even hinted at in Edgar Allan Poe's short
story.
     This film is part of a series of produced by Harry Alan Towers that
are coming over from Italy.  The only other films that I know of that
are also coming over to the U.S. from Italy are BURIED ALIVE (which is
already in video stores) and THE HOUSE OF USHER.  There are probably
others.  This film (and the other two listed above) are direct-to-video
releases.
     For an enjoyability rating the highest I can give it is a three
(out of a 0 - 5 scale).  I was very disappointed in the film considering
the amount of time it took to be able to check it out of the video
store, it was out every time I went in.  THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM is not
rated but contains graphic violence and female nudity.  If you have an
empty night and you're in the mood for a "different" horror film you
might give this one a glance.

Title
Review for Muppet Christmas Carol, The (1992)
     The Muppets do their version of Charles Dickens's holiday classic,
A CHRISTMAS CAROL.  Michael Caine is Ebenezer Scrooge, who doesn't enjoy
Christmas.  He is mean to everyone, especially his employees, including
Kermit the Frog, as Bob Crachit.  Caine is visited by his dead business
partners (there are two in this version) Statler and Waldorf, as the
Marley's.  Statler and Waldorf send Caine three ghosts to show him the
evil of his ways, in hopes to help him change.
     THE MUPPET CHRISTMAS CAROL is a very enjoyable holiday film that I
think both the young and the old will love.  If your area is still
playing this film, I don't think that it will be there for long, so you
should see it soon.  On a scale of zero to five, I give THE MUPPET
CHRISTMAS CAROL a five.
     This film I believe is the fourth Muppet film (the earlier films
that I can remember are THE MUPPET MOVIE, which was just released on
video cassette, THE GREAT MUPPET CAPER, which was also just released on
video cassette, and THE MUPPETS TAKE MANHATTAN).  The Muppets, despite
the death of their creator Jim Henson, are still doing well, but Kermit
the Frog will never be the same.
     Believe it or not, the Muppets stay very close to the original
story.  They take only a few liberties with the story, like making two
Marley's and making Charles Dickens (excellently played by Gonzo)
narrate the story with his side kick, Rizzo the Rat (also great!)
     Michael Caine takes the back seat in this film, because the Muppets
are the best part of this film.  However Michael Caine does do a great
job.

Title
Review for Of Mice and Men (1992)
1:59, PG-13, Drama, 1992
Director: Gary Sinise
Cast: John Malkovich, Gary Sinise, Sherilyn Fenn, Ray Walston,
      Alexis Arquette, Joe Morton, Casey Siemaszko, John Terry,
      Noble Willingham
     Gary Sinise and John Malkovich are migrant farm workers.  John
Malkovich isn't very bright and keeps getting the two in trouble.
Sinise watches over Malkovich and tries to keep him out of trouble.
They go to work on Noble Willingham's farm where Malkovich starts
having problems with Willingham's son Casey Siemaszko.
     OF MICE AND MEN is the third film version of John Steinbeck's
novel.  I haven't seen the 1939 version yet.  I think that this version
of OF MICE AND MEN is much better than the 1981 television film (which
received a three).  This film follows the novel very closely.  I
definitely recommend this film to everybody.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give OF MICE AND MEN a five.  OF MICE AND MEN is rated PG-13
for explicit language and graphic violence.
     The cast for this version is much better than the '81 version.  I
think that John Malkovich (SHADOWS AND FOG, EMPIRE OF THE SUN) does a
much better Lenny than Randy Quaid did.  Likewise Gary Sinise does a
better George than Robert Blake did.  Ray Walston (BLOOD RELATIONS,
POPCORN, and for all of you who wrote back on my review of POPCORN, "My
Favorite Martian") gave the best performance in this film.  Walston
plays the old man on the farm and I feel that he adds a lot to the
film.  Sherilyn Fenn (MERIDIAN: KISS OF THE BEAST, BACKSTREET DREAMS)
gives her best performance since TWO MOON JUNCTION as Casey Siemaszko's
flirtatious wife.  Casey Siemaszko (BREAKING IN, THREE O'CLOCK HIGH) is
great as the boss's cruel son.
     This film is very well written, and gets extremely dramatic in
places (I haven't seen so many wet eyes leaving the theater).  I think
that this film will have a better impact if you see it in the theater,
so do so if you have the chance still.  It has been released on video
cassette.  Both the settings and photography for this film are top
notch.

Title
Review for Danger Island (1992) (TV)
97 min., not rated, Suspense/Action, 1992, Made-for-television
Director: Tommy Lee Wallace
Cast: Lisa Banes, Richard Beymer, Maria Celedonio, Gary Graham,   
      Kathy Ireland, Joe Lara, Christopher Pettiet, Beth Toussaint,
      Eddie Valez, Nikki Cox, June Lockhart, Gina Malina Aurio
     Several people are stranded on a tropical island after the private
plane they were in crash-landed in the ocean.  The island, which seems
uninhabited, turns out not to be a vacation in paradise.  Something in
the ocean attacks two of the people, which one of disappears soon after,
and the other one gets physical deformities.  The rest of the people
travel through the island trying to find help, unaware of the strange
things that are going on around them.
     DANGER ISLAND, which was made for the NBC television network, is
exceptionally good, especially for a television film.  I hope that it
gets released on video cassette, because it would allow people who
missed it when it was aired to see it.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give DANGER ISLAND a five.
     DANGER ISLAND is very well written and seems to transcend its
television roots.  The story is interesting as well as suspenseful.  The
characters are well developed and are ones that found myself wanting to
know more about.  The special effects are very well done.  The locations
picked for the filming look great.  Interestingly enough, the film
leaves itself open for a sequel.  Whether this was intended or not I
don't know.  If handled correctly, a good sequel could be made.
     I think that this is one of the best television films that I have
ever seen.  The budget for the film seemed to be larger than most
television films.  The major problem with most television films is that
they are either one of the many "disease of the week" films, which I, at
least, am getting sick of, or the film has a good idea, but it seems
that a talented writer couldn't be found that would fit in the budget.
This isn't a "disease of the week" film (thank God!) and the writer did
a great job (meaning he probably won't be working for television for
very much longer).

Title
Review for Heathers (1989)
102 min., R, Comedy, 1989
Director: Michael Lehmann
Cast: Christian Slater, Winona Ryder, Shannen Doherty, Lisanne Falk,
      Kim Walker, Penelope Milford, Glenn Shadix, Lance Fenton,
      Renee Estevez
     At high school Winona Ryder is part of a clique composed of three
other girls all with the first name Heather (Shannen Doherty, Lisanne
Falk, and Kim Walker).  Ryder meets weird unpopular Christian Slater in
the school cafeteria.  He is tired of the three Heathers running the
lives of everybody at school so he proposes that he and Ryder kill them
off  in a way that looks like suicide.  They start with Walker.  After
they kill her, she becomes more of an idol than before and Ryder starts
to have second thoughts about Slater's crazy idea.
     HEATHERS is a very good black comedy about high school life, for
those who haven't forgotten high school or for those who are still in
high school.  I think to really get the meaning behind the film you must
be in high school, or have already gone through high school.  Younger
viewers, I feel, will not get the enjoyment from the film.  The use of
suicide may offend some viewers, so if this is a touchy subject with you
this may not be the film for you to see.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give HEATHERS a four.   HEATHERS is rated R for explicit language,
violence, and adult situations.
     HEATHERS covers the hard subject of cliques, not just in high
school but every where.  At least in my high school, the cliques run the
school, and someone from one clique usually doesn't associate with
someone from another clique, which is not the way it should be.
     The main problem, I feel, with HEATHERS is that the film gets
ecxessively unrealistic.  Christian Slater over does his role just a
little bit.  He seems to be trying to impersonate Jack Nicholson and he
isn't the best at it.  Slater would have done a better job if he put a
little bit more of himself into the role.   Winona Ryder's character is
not the brightest person.  She just goes into Slater's crazy ideas
without thinking of what might happen.  Ryder puts in a great
performance and I feel does a better job than Slater.  Shannen Doherty
(of "Beverly Hills, 90210"), Lisanne Falk, and Kim Walker all do a great
job as the three Heathers.
     The film is rather well written, but as I mentioned earlier, the
film does get rather unrealistic in some places.  The part that I think
was the biggest rip-off was the ending.  I felt it was just slapped in
with no consideration for those watching the film.  This I feel really
hurt the film, and I wish that somebody had tried harder to make the
ending better.

Title
Review for Doppelganger (1993)
1:45, R, Suspense/Horror, 1992
Director: Avi Nesher
Cast: Drew Barrymore, George Newbern, Dennis Christopher, Leslie Hope,
      Stanley DeSantis, Dan Shor, George Maharis, Peter Dobson,
      Sally Kellerman
     Drew Barrymore, a young girl, is being bothered by her
doppelganger, that is killing off her family in New York.  She moves to
Los Angeles and moves into an apartment with George Newbern.  He finds
out about Barrymore's problem with her doppelganger and tries to help
her with it.
     DOPPELGANGER: THE EVIL WITHIN was just released to CBS/FOX home
video.  DOPPELGANGER is a reasonably good B-grade horror film and is
worth a rental if you enjoy the genre.  If you don't tend to enjoy
B-horror movies, then I would recommend that you skip this one.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give DOPPELGANGER a four.  DOPPELGANGER is
rated R for explicit language, graphic violence, and female nudity.
     DOPPELGANGER is reasonably well written.  The story line is
interesting and the film moves smoothly along.  The characters are
interesting and develop well.  The story line isn't overly
predictable.  Unfortunately, the ending to the film is a big let down.
It doesn't hook in well to the rest of the film and seems to be a big
cop-out.
     The acting in the film is reasonably good.  Drew Barrymore
(MOTORAMA, BEYOND CONTROL: THE AMY FISHER STORY) is great.  George
Newbern also does a very good job.  Dennis Christopher (JAKE SPEED,
STEPHEN KING'S IT) also does a good job.  Sally Kellerman (MEATBALLS 3,
THREE FOR THE ROAD) is definitely the low point of the film.  I wish
that someone else had been cast in her role.

Title
Review for Bob Roberts (1992)
107 min., R, Comedy/Documentary, 1992
Director: Tim Robbins
Cast: Tim Robbins, Gore Vidal, Alan Rickman, Giancarlo Esposito,
      Ray Wise, Susan Sarandon, James Spader, Fred Ward, John Cusack,
      Peter Gallagher, Kelly Willis, Fisher Stevens, Lynne Thigpen
     Tim Robbins plays Bob Roberts, a folk singing senatorial candidate.
He travels around singing songs about the problems with America.  As his
campaign goes on, some people start to turn against him.
     BOB ROBERTS starts off with a good idea, a folk singer who pops
into a government race and then doesn't do much (remind anyone of Ross
Perot).  The problem that hurts this film is that the film isn't that
funny.  Too many of the jokes fail.  Tim Robbins can't sing very well
either, which is not good when his character is a singer.  I don't
recommend that you see this film in the theater.  Instead, if you wish
to see it, wait for the video cassette.  This film is worth viewing for
a very cheap rental.  I give BOB ROBERTS a two on a scale of zero to
five.  BOB ROBERTS is rated R for explicit language and violence.
     The biggest problem that I noticed in this film is that Bob
Robert's music videos were not funny.  I think that they were supposed
to be funny, but they certainly didn't turn out that way.  The videos
weren't well done, and didn't hold my attention.  Some of the songs that
Tim Robbins sang were well done, but in my opinion, Tim Robbins can't
sing.  Those songs that were well written ended up being butchered by
Robbins.  The rest of the songs fell into the same category as the music
videos.
     What I think Tim Robbins tried to create was a pseudo-documentary
showing some of the problems with America today.  The film's basic
problem is that Tim Robbins didn't stick entirely to documentary format
in this film.  Some of the scenes were shot as a movie, and the others
were shot as a documentary; then the two were combined.  I didn't think
that this style worked.
     This film isn't entirely bad.  Most of the cast did a very good
job.  The actor that I think gives the best performance in this film is
Alan Rickman.  He seems to stand a little above the rest of the cast.
The actor that I think does the worst job was Gore Vidal.  He doesn't
seem to be with the film very much.  Some of the scenes (especially the
live television show part) I thought were well done.

Title
Review for Trespass (1992)
     While fighting a fire, firemen Bill Paxton and William Sadler are
given a treasure map by a man who then commits suicide.  The map shows a
floor of an abandoned factory in East St.  Louis.  Bill Paxton and
William Sadler go to the factory to search for the treasure.  While they
are searching, drug dealer Ice-T and his gang show up and Paxton and
Sadler witness a murder.  Paxton and Sadler end up trapped in one of the
rooms at the factory with Ice-T's brother as a hostage.  They try to
find a way out, while Ice-T tries to get his brother back.
     Being a fan of Ice-T (both the music and acting there of) and
director Walter Hill, I went out to see TRESPASS at the first chance I
got.  This is more of a young adult film, than an adult film, but that
is not to say that all adults will dislike it.  I did enjoy watching
TRESPASS, and recommend it if you tend to enjoy Walter Hill's films.  On
a scale of zero to five, I give TRESPASS a five.  TRESPASS is rated R
for violence and explicit language.
     This is certainly a time for music artists to start acting.  
Whitney Huston has a film out, THE BODYGUARD; Phil Collins was just
recently in HOOK; rap artists Ice-T and Ice Cube are continuing their
film careers in TRESPASS.  TRESPASS was originally scheduled to be
released during the summer under the title THE LOOTERS, but the timing
was too close to the L.A.  riots.  TRESPASS is written excellently.  It
is exciting and the action sequences are great.  The soundtrack for the
film is great.  The music fits the film perfectly.
     There are several levels to the characters, some are good (Bill
Paxton, William Sadler) and others are bad (Ice-T, Ice Cube).  But
within those levels, there is still more, Bill Paxton is a good guy,
whereas William Sadler is a semi-good good guy.   The same is shown with
Ice-T and Ice Cube, Ice Cube is definitely a bad guy, but Ice-T is a
semi-bad bad guy.
     I have enjoyed Ice-T's acting career so far (NEW JACK CITY,
RICOCHET) and I think that he is a powerful screen presence.  He has
played the good guy (NEW JACK CITY) and now he plays the semi-bad guy
(the same as he did in RICOCHET, I believe).  He does an excellent job
in this film, and he alone makes the film worth going to see.  Ice Cube
(BOYZ N THE HOOD) is very good as one of the bad guys.  William Sadler
and Bill Paxton were great as the firemen.  The two people who I enjoyed
the most in this film were Ice-T and the person who played the black man
who was living in the factory.

Title
Review for Wild Orchid II: Two Shades of Blue (1992)
111 min., not rated, Drama, 1992
Director: Zalman King
Cast: Wendy Hughes, Tom Skerritt, Robert Davi, Brent Fraser,
      Nina Siemaszko, Christopher McDonald, Joe Dallesandro,
      Casey Sander, Stafford Morgan, Don Bloomfield, Lydie Denier
     Nina Siemaszko's father Tom Skerritt, an avid drug user, dies.
Siemaszko ends up working at a whorehouse.  Robert Davi, who does odd
jobs at a whorehouse, gets interested in Siemaszko.   Siemaszko sees a
high school boy who she is interested in, but she doesn't know how to
tell him what her profession is.
     WILD ORCHID 2: TWO SHADES OF BLUE is the latest film by erotic film
maker Zalman King, who's past films include WILD ORCHID and TWO MOON
JUNCTION.  WILD ORCHID 2 is not really a sequel to WILD ORCHID, in fact
it has nothing to do with WILD ORCHID.  The only thing that links the
film together at all is the fact that Zalman King directed both.  I
enjoyed WILD ORCHID, but I hated WILD ORCHID 2.  Everything that WILD
ORCHID had, this didn't.  WILD ORCHID 2: TWO SHADES OF BLUE is also
available in a less explicit R rated version.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give WILD ORCHID 2 a one.  WILD ORCHID 2 is unrated and contains
female nudity, explicit language, strong sexual content, and adult
situations.
     The one thing that keeps WILD ORCHID 2 from being a total waste is
that its cast is excellent.  Tom Skerritt, who gets top billing, is only
on the screen for about fifteen minutes.   Unfortunately the story isn't
up to the original, in fact it is far from it.  In WILD ORCHID, I found
the story interesting (as well as erotic).  WILD ORCHID 2 skips the
interesting and just tries to be erotic, where it fails miserably.  My
suggestion is to skip this film and rewatch WILD ORCHID.  The story,
such as it is, is muddled and not everything is explained.  Things that
happen don't always make sense and are often confusing.  This film seems
to have no real reason for existing, and I am not quite sure why it ever
was made.

Title
Review for Dr. Giggles (1992)
95 min., R, Horror, 1992
Director: Manny Coto
Cast: Larry Drake, Holly Marie Combs, Glenn Quinn, Cliff De Young,
      Richard Bradford, Michelle Johnson, Keith Diamond, Denise Barnes
     When Larry Drake was a child, his father was a doctor and his
mother was dying from heart problems.  Drake's father lost it and
started killing the residents of a town for their hearts, to save his
wife.  Drake's father was killed by the occupants of the town and Drake,
who helped his father, escaped.  Now, many years later, Drake is coming
back to the town, as a doctor, to get a bloody revenge.  Holly Marie
Combs is having heart problems and may have to have an operation.  Her
boyfriend is generally causing her problems and her father Cliff De
Young, whose wife just died in an operation, is seeing rather young
Michelle Johnson.  All this is putting considerable strain on Combs
heart.  Then Drake, Dr. Giggles, shows up in her life.
     DR. GIGGLES is a humorous horror film.  It almost seemed to be a
parody of modern horror films, but just when I started to get that
feeling, the film reminded me that it wasn't.  I definitely don't
recommend this film to those with a weak stomach.  I do, however,
recommend this film to any fan of horror films.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give DR. GIGGLES a four.  DR. GIGGLES is rated R for explicit
language, adult situations, and graphic violence.
     The cast for this film is relatively well known for a horror film.
Larry Drake (DARKMAN, MURDER IN NEW HAMPSHIRE: THE PAMELA WOJAS SMART
STORY) was perfect in the title role.  He has this look that can be
rather spooky (especially behind a bloody saw).  Holly Marie Combs
(BORN ON THE FOURTH OF JULY, "Picket Fences") also does a great job.  I
found myself caring more for her character than I usually do at a horror
film.  I found her character to be above the typical "horror movie
bimbo".  Glenn Quinn ("Roseanne," "Covington Cross") does a relatively
good job as Combs's boyfriend.  He didn't look like he gave all that he
could for his role, however.  Cliff De Young (SECRET ADMIRER, RUDE
AWAKENING, SHOCK TREATMENT), I think, gave the weakest performance in
the film.  He wasn't on screen for very much, and when he was on, I got
nothing from his character.  Michelle Johnson (BLAME IT ON RIO, WAXWORK,
as well as some small roles in the recent films DEATH BECOMES HER and
FAR AND AWAY), also gave a reasonable performance.  I will never figure
out why she made the beginning credits since her role was rather short.
Because of this, no real characterization was created for her character
and it was hard to feel one way or another for her.
     There aren't many gory scenes in this film, but for the most part,
the few that there are turn out to be really good ones.  The special
effects for the film are very well done.  The script is well written
and interesting.  The film doesn't fall into too many of the typical
slasher film cliches, although the ending could have been improved, as
it was too predictable.  The director Manny Coto, who I think is a first
time director, does a great job.  The sets that are used are excellent.
I especially like how the old doctor's house was made to look on the
inside.

Title
Review for Meatballs 4 (1992)
91 min., R, Comedy, 1992
Director: Bob Logan
Cast: Corey Feldman, Jack Nance, Bojesse Christopher,
      Johnny Cocktails, J. Trevor Edmond, Paige French,
      John Mendoza, Bentley Mitchum, Christy Thom,
      Deborah Tucker, Frank Walton, Sarah Douglas
     A water-skiing camp run by Jack Nance gets an extremely small
amount of campers.  The rival camp run by Bojesse Christopher gets most
of the water skiing campers.  To try to improve the camp, Nance gets
Corey Feldman, the ex-athletic instructor from Christopher's camp, to
try to improve his camp.  Deborah Tucker, Nance's daughter, used to be
going out with Feldman, but he left her.  She is now going out with
somebody else, but is not over Feldman yet.  Fat Johnny Cocktails has a
low self esteem and is constantly put down by people.  He sees Christy
Thom, a camper, and falls in love with her.  Nance is running low on
payments, and to keep the camp he organizes a competition between his
camp and Christopher's camp.  Christopher sends her henchmen, John
Mendoza and Frank Walton, to make sure that Nance's camp loses.
     MEATBALLS starring the always charming Bill Murray, in my opinion,
is (and probably will always be) the funniest camp movie made.  Then
came along MEATBALLS - PART 2, it had none of the original cast members,
and it sucked!  Then came MEATBALLS 3, that had nothing to do with camp,
but it starred the lovely Shannon Tweed and wasn't funny.  It also
sucked.  Now comes MEATBALLS 4.   MEATBALLS 4 takes place at a camp
again, now a water skiing camp, and stars Corey Feldman, who has starred
in some wonderful films, like THE 'BURBS, EDGE OF HONOR, FRIDAY THE 13TH
- THE FINAL CHAPTER, THE GOONIES, THE LOST BOYS, and STAND BY ME.  This
film can't be as bad as numbers 2 and 3, *can it?*.  Well, it is.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give MEATBALLS 4 a zero.  MEATBALLS 4 is rated
R for explicit language, female nudity, and adult situations.
     The only people who I feel will like MEATBALLS 4 are people who are
looking for cheap thrills, but will sacrifice laughs.  All this film
ends up being, is a T&A (tits and ass for those who don't know) film
with, for the most part, poor acting.  At least mixed in with the T&A
there could have been some humor.  I think I laughed three times and
most of the jokes in the film are old and tired or just plain stupid.
If you are looking for a good camp movie may I suggest MEATBALLS, PARTY
CAMP, CAMP CUCAMONGA (a television film), and POISON IVY (also a
television film, but is also available on video cassette).
     When watching this film, I felt like it was missing something.   It
was almost like it was a sequel to a film that didn't exist.   The
actors referred to events that happened at the camp before this film
took place and seemed to expect that we already knew about them.  I felt
that this was very poor.
     I am disappointed with director Bob Logan, who brought us the
hilarious EXORCIST spoof called REPOSSESSED (with Linda Blair, Leslie
Nielsen, and Ned Beatty).  Logan has sunk down to the level of most of
Chuck Vincent's films.  The writing for the film, also done by Logan, is
terrible.  The film is pointless, boring, and stupid.  This film gives
us all the common camp film elements that we have seen many times
before, except they seemed better before; maybe because the films were
interesting.
     Corey Feldman and John Mendoza, a very talented stand up comedian,
don't belong in this film.  They both have talent and I am surprised
that they have sunk to this level.  Other than these two actors, in my
opinion, the rest of the cast was uninspired.  I never felt for any of
the characters, and didn't care who won the battle between the camps,
the ending to which was obvious from the beginning.
     How this is at all related to the original MEATBALLS I don't know.
At least the second one took place at the same camp.   Numbers 3 and 4
don't even grace us with that.  I wish that when people make sequels,
they would try to make them be related to the original film, and try to
make them better than the original.  With the MEATBALLS series, it looks
like the people making them are saying, "Ya that last one *was* bad, but
I bet I can make one that is *worse* that people will still waste their
money to go see.  Ya, well I have one worse than that; try this one:
"this person who was related to the roommate of the sister of the
janitor of the original film is going to send their kids to a summer
camp and let's call it a sequel."  Is this what the modern cinema has
turned to?  I really hope not, and I wish that film makers would stop
making inferior sequels and instead try making new and original films;
films that make people want to see another instead of mindless trash.
The worst part is that I have been waiting weeks for this film, and I
wasted $2.50 renting it.

Title
Review for Mississippi Masala (1991)
     Indian (from India) Sarita Chudhury, who moved from Africa to
Mississippi with her family 18 years before, meets Denzel Washington, a
Black who owns his own rug cleaning business.  The two fall in love, but
their relationship is threatened by Sarita Chudhury's father, who
dislikes Blacks.
     MISSISSIPPI MASALA is by the director of SALAAM BOMBAY!, and I feel
that it is a very good film, and definitely worth seeing.   I almost
didn't go to see this film, because the title, at least to me, sounded
boring, and I had only seen one preview for the film and it didn't tell
too much.  I give MISSISSIPPI MASALA a four on a scale of zero to five.
MISSISSIPPI MASALA is rated R for explicit language, adult situations,
and mild violence.
     When I saw the advertisements for MISSISSIPPI MASALA I wasn't quite
sure of what it was going to be about.  It looked like it was either
going to be a remake of ROMEO AND JULIET or an immigrant drama.  It was
more of a remake of ROMEO AND JULIET than an immigrant drama, but it
really wasn't either.
     Denzel Washington gave a great performance, along with the rest of
the cast.  What I think that I liked most about the film, was the
screenplay.  It was very well crafted and it held my interest throughout
the film.  Also the locations for the film were well-picked.  I don't
think that the film would have been nearly as good if the film was set
in a rich neighborhood.  
     I think that MISSISSIPPI MASALA deserved a better release than it
got, at least in my area.  My local art/import theater picked it up and
played it for four days.  If given the chance, I think that the film
would have done very well in a real movie theater, and gotten a bigger
audience.

Title
Review for Sleepwalkers (1992)
100 min., R, Horror, 1992
Director: Mick Garris
Cast: Brian Krause, Alice Krige, Madchen Amick, Stephen King
     Note: Sleepwalkers are "people" who are only half-human.   They
need to feed on human female virgins.
     Brian Krause is the new kid in town.  He goes to the local high
school and he gets to know beautiful, but unpopular, Madchen Amick.
Unfortunately for Madchen Amick, Brian Krause is a Sleepwalker who needs
to feed and help feed his mother Alice Krige or she will die.
     SLEEPWALKERS is a relatively good horror film.  It gets a bit
strange in some places, and the film gets very unrealistic at times, but
is still fun to watch.  The film is sometimes gory which will deter some
people from the film.  You could definitely do worse than this film,
although I don't know whether to recommend that you see this film in the
theater.  You may be better off waiting to see SLEEPWALKERS when it
comes to video.   On a scale of zero to five, I give SLEEPWALKERS a
four.   SLEEPWALKERS is rated R for explicit language, adult situations,
and graphic violence.
     I saw SLEEPWALKERS on opening night (Friday) and it is not at all
what I was expecting.  The advertisements that I saw for the film
painted a different picture in my head of what the film was going to be
like.  Sure, I liked SLEEPWALKERS, but it was nowhere near as good as I
was hoping it was going to be.  By now, I have come to expect a certain
amount from the films whose screenplay is written by Stephen King (films
based on Stephen King films written by someone else are totally
unpredictable as to how good they will be, so I don't expect too much
out of them).  This is definitely a low for him.  From what I have
heard, MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE is *really* bad, so evidently this is not
Stephen King's worst screenplay (then again he didn't direct this film).
     SLEEPWALKERS is the first full feature film that Stephen King has
written exclusively for the screen.  I feel the main problem with the
film is that it does get very unbelievable at some points.   Personally,
that detracted from my enjoyment of the film.  And, for those
interested, Stephen King has a cameo part as the caretaker of a
graveyard.
     BASIC INSTINCT has stirred up some controversy on it's portrayal of
lesbians and bisexuals.  Well, SLEEPWALKERS may unearth some trouble
with the portrayal of incest between Brian Krause and his mother Alice
Krige.  This seemed to really disturb some of the people in the theater,
so will be likely to offend others.  If you feel that this may offend
you, don't go to see the film.  There are plenty of other good films
playing that you can see instead.

Title
Review for Intent to Kill (1993)
1:35, NC-17, Action, 1993
Director: Charles Kanganis
Cast: Traci Lords, Angelo Tiffe, Scott Patterson, Louis A. Perez, 
      Sabrina Ferrand, Michael Foley, Sam Travolta, Vinnie Curto, 
      Elena Sahagun, Kevin Benton, Yaphet Kotto
     The Columbian Cowboys, a gang of drug dealers, are trying to
regain some lost dope.  They are slaughtering people all over the city
to get the dope back.  Traci Lords, a non-conformist cop, unofficially
goes after The Columbian Cowboys to try and stop the blood bath.
     INTENT TO KILL has just recently been released on P.M. video
cassette.  This is a good film for those of you who tend to enjoy B
movies, but don't mind a considerable amount of violence.  The special
effects for the film aren't the best, but the poor special effects
doesn't detract too much from the film.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give INTENT TO KILL a four.  INTENT TO KILL is rated NC-17 for explicit
language, graphic violence, and adult situations.
     The cast for this film, for the most part, is quite good.  Traci
Lords (A TIME TO DIE [1991], CRY-BABY), the underage porn actress who
shocked many people when she was revealed several years ago, has
starred in a series of quality films that prove that she can really
act.  This film is one of them.  She does a very good job in this film
proving that she can handle dramatic roles.  Yaphet Kotto (ALIEN,
MIDNIGHT RUN) is great as Lords's captain.  He brings life to any
character that he takes on.  The actor in the cast that I was least
impressed with is the person who plays the psychotic member of the
Columbian Cowboys.  His acting isn't very convincing and I think that
he could have been better cast.
     I don't know why this film received an NC-17 rating.  It didn't
seem to have anything worse than the film MARKED FOR DEATH, which
received an R.  Don't let the NC-17 rating scare you away because you
will be missing a great film.
     The premise behind this film has been done many times before, and,
unfortunately, this film is also very predictable.  However, the film
is still enjoyable to watch.  I suggest that you attempt to see this
film before it disappears.

Title
Review for Wayne's World 2 (1993)
1:31, Comedy, 1993
MPAA rating: PG-13 (explicit language, adult situations, adult    
                   humor)
Rating: four (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Stephen Surjik
Cast: Mike Myers, Dana Carvey, Christopher Walken, Tia Carrere,   
      Ralph Brown, Kim Basinger, Chris Farley, Aerosmith,
      Drew Barrymore, Ed O'Neill, Charlton Heston
     Wayne Campbell (Mike Myers) and Garth Algar (Dana Carvey) have
moved out and are on their own.  Wayne is visited in a dream by Jim
Morrison, who tells Wayne to have a concert, the modern version of
Woodstock.  Wayne and Garth go through many problems to try and make
the concert happen.  Also, Christopher Walken is trying to break up
Wayne and his girlfriend Cassandra (Tia Carrere).
     The problem with most sequels of great movies is that the sequel
stinks, take CADDYSHACK and CADDYSHACK 2 for instance.  Luckily WAYNE'S
WORLD 2 doesn't fall into that problem.  WAYNE'S WORLD 2 keeps the
charm of the original, without being a carbon copy of the original.  It
is great to see Wayne and Garth back in action and in great form.
     Some of the cameos in this film are great.  Especially Charlton
Heston and Drew Barrymore.  They keep the general idea of the film
moving.  Other cameos, like Ed O'Neill's, are disappointing, but they
are few.
     WAYNE'S WORLD 2 has a kick-ass soundtrack, that includes
Aerosmith, Gin Blossoms, and Bad Company that keeps the mood of the
film going throughout.  WAYNE'S WORLD 2 is well-written, and those that
enjoyed the first will probably enjoy number two.  Also, as a word of
advise, stay through the end credits.  Like the first film, this film
has a cute segment in the end credits.

Title
Review for Storia di ragazzi e di ragazze (1989)
90 min., not rated, Comedy/Drama/Romance, 1991, In Italian with
English subtitles
Director: Pupi Avati
Cast: Davide Bechini, Lucrenzia Lante, Della Rovere
     In Italy a man and a woman are preparing to get married.  The
woman's family is very rich and the man's family is quite poor.   This
film shows the two families preparing for the wedding.  The wedding is
to be held at the woman's house and just about everything that could go
wrong does.
     I generally don't like foreign films at all.  This film is rather
good, although not nearly as good as MY MOTHER'S CASTLE.  It is comical,
yet dramatic at the same time.  I would recommend, if this film comes to
a theater close to you, that you go for not higher than a matinee price.
People who tend to like foreign films should be sure to see this film.
It will be just as good on video, if it comes to video, for it gains
nothing from being shown on a big screen.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give THE STORY OF BOYS AND GIRLS a three.  THE STORY OF BOYS AND GIRLS
is not rated, but contains adult situations.
     This film will not be liked by all audiences.  It requires a person
who is willing to sit down and think while watching.  It also requires a
person with an open mind.  Someone who just likes to go to films where
no thought is involved, or who tends not to like any films other than
comedies, should not go to see this film, because there is not enough
comedy in the film to satisfy you.
     The acting is average.  I have seen some films where the acting is
better, but the acting is not horrible.  There is no actor/actress that
really stands out with an exceptional performance, on the other hand, no
actor/actress does a really poor job either.  The story though, is
original.  The parents of the bride are fighting with each other because
the bride's mother's husband has been having an affair with another
woman.  One of the brides brothers is a real show-off.  The groom's
parents aren't sure of the marriage, because they really can't afford
it.  To add to the confusion, the married man who rents the downstairs
rooms in the bride's house shows up with a mysterious female.

Title
Review for Jurassic Park (1993)
2:10, PG-13, Science Fiction/Action, 1993
Director: Steven Spielberg
Cast: Sam Neill, Laura Dern, Richard Attenborough, Jeff Goldblum, 
      Samuel L. Jackson
     Richard Attenborough makes living dinosaurs from their DNA and
makes a theme park, Jurassic Park, of them on an island of Costa Rica.
He invites scientists Sam Neill, Laura Dern, and Jeff Goldblum to comes
see Jurassic Park.  While the scientists are on the tour some
carnivorous dinosaurs get loose and threaten the whole group.
     JURASSIC PARK is one of the projected summer blockbusters and has
been incredibly hyped up.  This film is not as good as it was supposed
to be.  However, the film is still worth going to see.  Definitely see
this film on the big screen because of the big budget special effects
that will definitely loose their impact on a television screen.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give JURASSIC PARK a four.  JURASSIC PARK is
rated PG-13 for violence and explicit language.
     JURASSIC PARK is loosely based on the novel by Michael Crichton,
who also co-wrote the film.  The film doesn't follow the novel very
faithfully and those that have read the novel may be disappointed with
the film.  The special effects for this film are great, especially the
dinosaurs.  They appear so life-like.
     The film is well written and moves along smoothly.  Some parts are
quite predictable, but what can you expect.  The film does have some
surprises too.  The characters are well done and are written so that
the viewer can't help from hoping that they survive (or bite it
depending on your frame of mind).
     The acting in JURASSIC PARK is great.  Sam Neill (MEMOIRS OF AN
INVISIBLE MAN, DEAD CALM) does a great job as one of the paleontologists
and Laura Dern (WILD AT HEART, RAMBLING ROSE) is excellent as the other
paleontologist.  Richard Attenborough (director of CHAPLIN and GANDHI) is
one of my favorite actors in this film.  His performance is perfect.
Jeff Goldblum (THE FLY, INTO THE NIGHT) does a reasonably good job.  His
acting is not the best (but is much better than some of his old films
-- TRANSYLVANIA 6-5000 comes to mind).  Samuel L. Jackson (NATIONAL
LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON 1, PATRIOT GAMES) is my other favorite actor in
this film.

Title
Review for Grand Canyon (1991)
135 min., R, Drama, 1992
Director: Lawrence Kasdan
Cast: Steve Martin, Danny Glover, Kevin Kline, Mary McDonnell,
      Mary-Louise Parker, Alfre Woodard, Tina Lifford, Marlee Shelton
     This film is about several people who have problems in their lives,
how they cope with their problems, and how they help out others.
     I think that GRAND CANYON is a wonderful film.  If you haven't yet
had the chance to see it, that you rush out to do so immediately.  I was
able to see the film on the big screen (at a second run theater) and
thought that it was definitely worth it.   GRAND CANYON is also
available on video cassette, although it won't be quite as spectacular
this way, it may be the only way that you will be able to see it.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give GRAND CANYON a five.  GRAND CANYON is
rated R for explicit language and female nudity.
     The performances in this film are great.  Steve Martin gives the
best performance that I have seen, and shows that he can do a wonderful
job with dramatic material.  Danny Glover also gives a spectacular
performance.  Kevin Kline is great.  He deftly handles his material and
creates a wonderful character.  Alfre Woodard is also very notable in
the cast, and does nothing but add to the film.  Mary McDonnell and
Mary-Louise Parker also seem to give their best.
     The director Lawrence Kasdan, who did THE ACCIDENTAL TOURIST and
BODY HEAT, does a wonderful job.  The film comes out looking perfect.
The script is expertly written and kept me fully entranced for the full
two hours and fifteen minutes.  When the film was over, I wished that it
had gone on for a longer time.  I wanted to know what happened to all
people in the film after it was over.  The locations used for the film
are excellent.  They set the film perfectly and added greatly to the
finished product.
     The score for the film was perfect.  The volume wasn't so high that
it drowned out words or became annoying and it fit the film.  Although I
am not much for classical music, I thought that it came out great.

Title
Review for Sneakers (1992)
126 min., PG-13, Action/Comedy, 1992
Director: Phil Alden Robinson
Cast: Robert Redford, Dan Aykroyd, Ben Kingsley, Mary McDonnell,
      River Phoenix, Sidney Poitier, David Strathairn, Timothy Busfield,
      George Hearn, Eddie Jones, Stephen Tobolowski, James Earl Jones
     Robert Redford is the head of a small business that breaks into
businesses to check their security.  The members are Redford, Dan
Aykroyd, River Phoenix, Sidney Poitier, and David Strathairn.  Each of
the members have an interesting past.  The National Security Agency
(NSA) requests Redford to find and bring them a black box, which is
being made by a mathematician.  The team finds the box and turns it over
to the NSA.  Redford finds out that the men from the NSA aren't really
from the NSA.  The fake NSA people try to kill Redford's team and the
team has to get back the box.
     SNEAKERS is an excellent film, which in some ways is like the
earlier film WARGAMES.  I highly recommend this film for everybody.
This film won't be in theaters for much longer, so I suggest seeing it
soon.  On a scale of zero to five, I give SNEAKERS a five.  SNEAKERS is
rated PG-13 for explicit language and violence.
     The cast for this film is excellent.  Robert Redford, who, believe
it or not, I have never seen in a film before, is superb.  He makes his
character believable without overacting.  Dan Aykroyd is great and not
in a slapstick role, as he usually is.  His character is magnificent,
and provides most of the comedy.  Nothing is ever made of River
Phoenix's character.  He isn't on the screen for all that long and he
doesn't have much of a speaking role.  His character also doesn't do
much.  Sidney Poitier is outstanding.  I have seen a few of Poitier's
past films and haven't been that impressed by Poitier (then again most
were old films and I am not generally impressed by old films).  In this
film though I really got into his character and enjoyed his acting.
David Strathairn was exceptional as the blind man.  His character was
also basically there for comic relief.  Ben Kingsley, however, I feel
was a miscast.  He tried his best, but I don't think that he fit the
role.  James Earl Jones was completely wasted in a cameo appearance.  He
has good acting talent, but hasn't been using it recently, having only
cameo appearances instead.  I hope that he will take a real role in the
near future.  Mary McDonnell was also not on for much time.  When she
was, though, she did a great job.
     The script and story were perfectly written.  The story moved along
smoothly and was interesting.  The characters, for the most part, were
well developed.  Nobody in the film had moronic lines that no real
person would ever have said.  The direction was excellent.
     This film is a great family film because there is no blood with the
violence and there is minimal profanity.  The story is one that will
entertain the young as well as the old.  All the stars work well
together and appear as if they are enjoying the whole film.  This is one
of the best films I have seen in a long time.

Title
Review for Hellraiser III: Hell on Earth (1992)
     The owner of a popular punk club finds a statue with Pinhead's face
in the center.  He finds out that Pinhead is in the statue and releases
him (stupid man).  Reporter Farrell is contacted by a ghost and told
about the death and destruction that Pinhead will raise (starting with
the schmuck that released him).  Farrell is the only person who knows
enough to stop Pinhead.
     I enjoyed HELLRAISER 3: HELL ON EARTH very much and am glad that I
saw it in the theater.  I felt that it was worth  the money to see it on
the big screen.  The only people who I feel will like this film are big
fans of the genre.  For those who think that they will enjoy seeing this
film, I suggest the big screen.  For those who are dubious, may I
suggest that you wait for the video cassette.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give HELLRAISER 3 a four.  HELLRAISER 3 is rated R for explicit
language, graphic violence, and adult situations.
     The special effects for the film are great.  The "cenobites" look
great.  I have heard that HELLRAISER 3 is nothing more than a rehash of
HELLRAISER and HELLBOUND - HELLRAISER 2.  I have not yet seen either of
the earlier films, so I can't confirm it, although I do plan on seeing
them when I get a chance.  I wanted to see this film before it left the
theaters, so I decided that I could watch the earlier ones later.  The
actors all do a reasonably good job, although that is not hard to do in
a horror film.  There are a few things in the film that don't make sense
to me.  However, they may have been explained in parts one or two.
     I was a little upset to see that Clive Barker was only the
executive producer.  I am a fan of his writing and had hoped that he had
written this one.  He wrote and directed HELLRAISER and he may have
written HELLBOUND - HELLRAISER 2, but I am not sure.  Oh well, it was
still a good movie.
     By the way: Did anyone else see the series of six continuing skits
during the MTV Music Awards with David Spade, Pinhead, Andrew Dice Clay,
and Ringo Starr?  If you missed it, you might try to find a friend who
taped the awards so that you can see it.  It is worth it.  There are
three skits during the program (the first with Dice, the second with
Pinhead, and the third with Starr) and three during the end credits.
                                 --------
     I also got to see two previews of upcoming horror films that look
great.  One is INNOCENT BLOOD (which just opened in theaters), by John
Landis, and the other is DRACULA (which is going to be released around
Thanksgiving), by Francis Ford Coppola.

Title
Review for Loaded Weapon 1 (1993)
1:28, PG-13, Comedy, 1993
Director: Gene Quintano
Cast: Emilio Estevez, Samuel L. Jackson, Jon Lovitz, Tim Curry,   
      Kathy Ireland, William Shatner, Whoopi Goldberg, Lance Kinsey,
      Phil Hartman, Charlie Sheen, Frank McRae, James Doohan,
      F. Murray Abraham, Corey Feldman, Paul Gleason, Richard Moll,
      Bruce Willis
     "By-the-book" cop Samuel L. Jackson and "loose cannon" cop Emilio
Estevez are investigating the death of Jackson's old partner Whoopi
Goldberg.  They run across criminal William Shatner and Estevez's love
interest Kathy Ireland.
     NATIONAL LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON 1 is a great film from the people
who brought us ANIMAL HOUSE, CLASS REUNION, CLASS OF '86, VACATION,
EUROPEAN VACATION, and CHRISTMAS VACATION.  LOADED WEAPON 1 is a
slapstick comedy film like the recent films HOT SHOTS! and NAKED GUN 2
1/2.  I feel that LOADED WEAPON 1 is as good as HOT SHOTS! but not up
to the level of NAKED GUN 2 1/2.  I recommend this film to fans of
slapstick comedy.  On a scale of zero to five, I give NATIONAL LAMPOON'S
LOADED WEAPON 1 a five.   LOADED WEAPON 1 is rated PG-13 for explicit
language, adult situations, adult humor, and violence.
     LOADED WEAPON 1 lampoons many recent films, the most obvious being
the LETHAL WEAPON series.  The most excellent I of these parodies I feel
were WAYNE'S WORLD and BASIC INSTINCT.
     For the most part the cast isn't overly memorable, but are great
fun to watch during the film.  The leads Samuel L.  Jackson (AMOS &
ANDREW), Emilio Estevez (MEN AT WORK, FREEJACK), and Jon Lovitz (MOM AND
DAD SAVE THE WORLD, A LEAGUE OF THEIR OWN) do a great job impersonating
the people from the LETHAL WEAPON series.   Kathy Ireland (DANGER
ISLAND, NECESSARY ROUGHNESS, MR. DESTINY) is beautiful and has an
amusing character.  Tim Curry (CLUE, THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW)
makes a wonderful Wilderness Girl.  
     Like the recent film THE PLAYER, LOADED WEAPON 1 has many big name
stars in cameo roles.  The best cameo role I think was Richard Moll as a
jailer.  Charlie Sheen (HOTSHOTS!, CADENCE), Emilio Estevez's brother,
has a great cameo.  Lance Kinsey (the POLICE ACADEMY series) makes a
great moron cop.  Whoopi Goldberg (MADE IN AMERICA, THE PLAYER) does a
wonderful stiff.
     On the other hand, Phil Hartman ("Saturday Night Live," HOW I GOT
INTO COLLEGE) has the worst cameo in this film.  I didn't think that his
character was at all funny.  Corey Feldman (MEATBALLS 4, EDGE OF HONOR)
was wasted in this film because he can do a good job when given
material, but he wasn't given anything to do.
     LOADED WEAPON 1 is excellently written.  It kept me laughing
throughout the film.  If one joke misses you then another will come
along and catch you.  This film is also filled with hilarious sight
gags.

Title
Review for Certain Sacrifice, A (1985)
60 min., not rated, Drama, 1985 (1979)
Director: Stephen Jon Lewicki
Cast: Jeremy Pattnosh, Madonna, Charles Kurtz
     Madonna gets attacked and raped by Charles Kurtz.  She, with the
help of drifter Jeremy Pattnosh and her friends, try to hunt out Charles
Kurtz from where he is hiding and bring their own form of revenge upon
him.
     I am writing this review mostly to advise you that, in my opinion,
A CERTAIN SACRIFICE is one of the biggest rip-offs to ever hit the video
market.  The video box states that this is the film Madonna refuses to
admit that she is in, and it is easy to see why.  This film has terrible
production values.
     The sound is totally horrible.  The volume of the sound on the tape
fluctuates from inaudible to very loud.  There is very little for
dialogue, probably to save on production costs, and often there is music
to cover up the parts with no dialogue.  There are some very pitiful
sound effects.  At one point a limo pulls away from a curb very slowly,
but you hear the sound of it screeching away from the curb and crashing
very loudly into the van in front of it.  When it cleanly pulls away
from the van, the van is untouched.  Sometimes there is loud music over
the dialogue, that tries to drown it out.
     The acting is just plain terrible.  The cast looks as if they just
read the script while waiting for their shoot to happen.  They also
look, while they are supposed to be acting, like they can't wait for the
shoot to get over so that they can go home.  The picture is lousy.  It
looks like the video cassette is a copy of another video cassette on
poor equipment.  Colors fade up and down.  The screen sometimes gets
real dark then real bright.  At times faces look washed out, at times
the film is real grainy, and at other times the picture is clear.
     There is barely any story line to the film, the plot is sad and
pathetic.  The screenplay, written by Jeremy Pattnosh and Stephen Jon
Lewicki, is not worth mentioning.  The movie is only sixty minutes long,
but the screenplay is really only for a film that is twenty to thirty
minutes long, and a pitiful one even at that length.
     Lastly, this film was actually filmed in 1979, but apparently was
not released until 1985.  To the best of my knowledge A CERTAIN
SACRIFICE just hit the video market.  So, don't waste your money renting
this film.  A CERTAIN SACRIFICE is marketed as an art film.  I don't
even consider it that.  Personally, I would have been embarrassed to
have my name associated with this film.  Even as an art film, it isn't
worth watching, even for free!  It is just sixty minutes of wasted time
that you could have better spent doing something else.  This film isn't
worth watching even if you are an avid fan of Madonna.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give A CERTAIN SACRIFICE a zero.  A CERTAIN SACRIFICE is
not rated but contains explicit language, female nudity, violence, and a
rape scene.

Title
Review for Boomerang (1992)
120 min., R, Comedy, 1992
Director: Reginald Hudlin
Cast: Eddie Murphy, Robin Givens, Halle Berry, David Alan Grier,
      Grace Jones, Chris Rock, Tisha Campbell, Eartha Kitt,
      Martin Lawrence, Geoffrey Holder
     Eddie Murphy has a reputation at his work place for being able to
bed any woman.  In comes Robin Givens who is Murphy's new boss.
Naturally, Murphy wants to get Givens into bed (well who wouldn't) and
Givens plays hard to get which makes Murphy want her even more.  When
Murphy starts to realize that he may be interested in a serious
relationship with Givens, he finds all she is looking for is sex.
     BOOMERANG is a very funny movie, even better than HARLEM NIGHTS and
ANOTHER 48 HRS.  I highly recommend that you go see this film before it
leaves the theaters.  On a scale of zero to five, I give BOOMERANG a
five.  BOOMERANG is rated R for brief female nudity, explicit language,
adult situations, and adult humor.
     Eddie Murphy is not as foul mouthed as usual, and has a more
interesting character than in past films.  This film will probably be
loved by any fan of Eddie.  Robin Givens gives a good performance, but
her character seemed to lack depth.  Halle Berry and David Allan Grier,
of FOX's "In Living Color," both give great performances.  Grier, I
think, gives his best performance yet.  I found Eartha Kitt's character
to be obnoxious and annoying, but the film would not have been as good
without her.
     BOOMERANG is not a film to be picked apart and analyzed.   Instead
it is a film to sit down, relax and laugh at.  If you go to pick it
apart, I think that you will hate this film.  If you want to go to enjoy
Eddie's funny antics, then this is definitely a film for you.  This film
is nearing the end of its theatrical run, so I suggest that if you are
going to go see it that you don't wait too long.  There is nothing
really to be said about the locations, because most of them were inside
buildings.  The script was great and gave all the actors a chance to
come out and make you laugh.  The soundtrack was also great!
     There isn't really too much more I can say about this film.   It is
of no great moral backing, and probably won't be nominated for an Oscar
(comedies seldom are).  Nothing will be lost by watching this film on a
VCR if you would prefer to wait and skip the high theater prices.

Title
Review for Motorama (1992)
1:29, R, Comedy, 1992
Director: Barry Shils
Cast: Jordan Christopher Michael, Susan Tyrrell, Jack Nance, John Diehl,
      Garrett Morris, Michael J. Pollard, Flea, Drew Barrymore, Meat Loaf,
      Dick Miller, Irwin Keyes
     Ten-year-old Jordan Christopher Michael steals a car and goes off
on a trip through a strange country collecting Motorama cards trying to
win the Motorama game.  Along his trip, Michael meets some very
eccentric people.
     MOTORAMA was just released on videocassette and because of its
great cast I wanted to see it.  Now I want to warn all of you about
it.  Don't see this film, it is slow-moving, boring, and not very
funny.  On a scale of zero to five, I give MOTORAMA a one.  MOTORAMA is
rated R for female nudity, explicit language, and adult situations.
     Most of the cast of this film are normally funny, but in this film
they either aren't given enough time to do anything or have badly
written characters.  Jordan Christopher Michael doesn't show any talent
in this film, but he's still better than that horribly annoying
Macaulay Culkin.  Susan Tyrrell (CRY-BABY, FAR FROM HOME) is completely
wasted.  She is barely on screen long enough for one to recognize her.
Jack Nance (WHORE, MEATBALLS 4) just starts to get going and then isn't
on screen any longer.  John Diehl is on the screen longer than anyone
in the cast except for Jordan Christopher Michael, and he is only on
for about five minutes.  He doesn't do that good a job, but it may just
be that his part was poorly written.  Garrett Morris (CAR WASH,
CRITICAL CONDITION) isn't given time to do anything.  Michael J.
Pollard (TANGO & CASH, FAST FOOD) also isn't given enough time to be
funny, or even establish a character for that matter.  Flea (BACK TO
THE FUTURE - PART 3, DUDES) may just be the best thing about this
film.  Drew Barrymore (DOPPELGANGER:  THE EVIL WITHIN, SKETCH ARTIST)
is completely wasted and shown as just another pretty face.  Meat
Loaf's (THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW, THE SQUEEZE) character was very
poorly written.  Dick Miller (MATINEE, GREMLINS) isn't allowed to do
anything.  Irwin Keyes (MOB BOSS) more than being wasted is given a
character that many may find to be offensive because it makes fun of
mentally retarded people in a poor way.
     If you hadn't gathered by now, this film is very poorly written.
Jokes are poorly executed, if they even are executed.  In one scene,
Jordan Christopher Michael loses a Motorama card that he needs out the
window next to a reservoir.  Instead of falling down into the
reservoir, it sails around in the air for a few seconds and then falls
in Michael's hand.  I fail to even see the purpose for this scene to be
added.  That's not the only scene like it either.  Many scenes are
started, but never end up being finished.  Like at one point a dead man
is dragged down to a river.  Michael washes his face in the river then
leaves.  The dead man is never spotted, explained, or has anything else
done with.  I sat through it, sometimes in extreme agony, and when it
finally came to the end, I felt incredibly cheated.  The ending is
horribly done and I think all viewers will be disappointed with it.
Even the endings to most of the low budget slasher films are better
than this ending.

Title
Review for Kuffs (1992)
100 min., PG-13, Action/Comedy, 1992
Director: Bruce A. Evans
Cast: Christian Slater, Tony Goldwyn, Milla Jovovich, Bruce Boxleitner, Troy
      Evans, Leon Rippy, Scott Williamson
     Bum Slater finds out that his girlfriend Jovovich is two months
pregnant.  Unable to handle the thought of getting married and having a
baby, Slater skips out on Jovovich.  He goes to see his brother, who is
a rent-a-cop in San Francisco and owns his own district.  Slater's
brother gets killed by a hitman.  Slater inherits his brother's district
and sets out to find the hitman and make him pay for what he has done.
     KUFFS is a wonderful film for those people who like action films
but yet don't want them to be too serious, and for people who like to go
out for a good laugh.  On a zero to five scale, I give KUFFS a four.
KUFFS is rated PG-13 for explicit language, violence, adult situations,
and adult humor.
     KUFFS is not Christian Slater's best film.  In my opinion PUMP UP
THE VOLUME has been Slater's best film (which received a five on my
scale).   Slater's worst film has been TWISTED (which I gave a three).
KUFFS comes in between these two films.  In his career, Christian Slater
has played a variety of people; a skateboarding punk (in GLEAMING THE
CUBE), a brilliant psychotic kid (in TWISTED), a teenager in need of
help (HEATHERS), an outlaw (in YOUNG GUNS 2 and ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF
THIEVES), a rebel (in PUMP UP THE VOLUME), and now a cop (well, it had
to come around sometime, didn't it?)
     Milla Jovovich, the Russian supermodel, has been in one film so
far, RETURN TO THE BLUE LAGOON.  I have not yet seen RETURN TO THE BLUE
LAGOON so I can't comment on her performance.  She put in a very good
performance in this film.  She does, however, take second stage to
Christian Slater, who is obviously the main draw to this film.  All of
the actors in this film did a very good job.  Tony Goldwyn is Slater's
short time partner and is basically around for comic relief so Slater
doesn't have to cover the entire film.  And is that fat cop Robbie
Cultrane?  I missed the name in the credits.
     KUFFS is a very inventive film.  It has come up with what is
probably the most hilarious use for subtitles in the movie industry.
KUFFS also blows away those bleeps used to cover up foul language on
television.
     KUFFS is not a strict comedy like NAKED GUN 2 1/2.  It does have
its share of the laughs though.  Likewise, KUFFS is not a strict action
film.  On how popular KUFFS is with audiences I really can't tell you.
KUFFS opened on Friday and I saw it on Sunday night.  There was a total
of eight people in the theater, but those eight people seemed to have
enjoyed the film.
     So, for a very inventive film that is well worth going to see,
definitely don't miss this film.  It is worth $6.50, or whatever the
ticket price where you are.

Title
Review for Bad Channels (1992)
86 min., R, Horror/Comedy/Science Fiction, 1992
Director: Ted Nicolaou
Cast: Paul Hipp, Martha Quinn, Aaron Lustig, Ian Patrick Williams,
      Michael Huddleston, Victor Rogers, Charlie Spradling,
      Melissa Behr, Ania Sava, Sonny Carl Davis, Tim Thomerson
     Controversial rock dee-jay Paul Hipp takes over an all polka radio
station when it changes to a world wide rock station.  That night an
alien takes over the station and takes Hipp hostage.   The alien starts
stealing beautiful, but ditsy, earth girls with the radio waves and Hipp
has to find a way to stop it.
     BAD CHANNELS is one of the newest films by Full Moon Entertainment.
Although the plot is preposterous I found the film to be great fun to
watch and recommend it to any fans of B- movies and any fans of Full
Moon Entertainment (one of my favorite film companies).  On a scale of
zero to five, I give BAD CHANNELS a four.  BAD CHANNELS is rated R for
explicit language and adult situations.
     The cast does a great job.  They all look like they are enjoying
themselves.  There are two cameos in the film.  Charlie Spradling (an
actress in several Full Moon films, as well as being their spokes
person) is a waitress and Tim Thomerson as Dollman (a character from the
Full Moon film DOLLMAN), who shows up at the end of the end credits, so
stick through them.
     The special effects are great, and the creature effects are cute.
One of the neatest of the creatures is the cute little robot with the
brain in its head.  The one part of the special effects that I didn't
like very much were the spaceship effects.   All that was composed of
was colored lights going in circles in the air.  The story successfully
combines science fiction and horror with a bit of humor thrown in.  The
script is well written and seems to be above the level of most B-movies.
The sets are great.  I especially like how the inside of the radio
station looks after the alien takes it over.
     Most of the music for the film is by Blue Oyster Cult and it is
great.  When a person gets grabbed there is almost a music video that
goes on and that I found to be very enjoyable.  One of my favorite bands
is the one in costume from the hospital.

Title
Review for tame! (1990)
101 min., NC-17, Comedy/Drama, 1990, In Spanish with English
subtitles
Director: Pedro Almodovar
Cast: Victoria Abril, Antonio Banderas, Loles Leon, Francisco Rabal,
      Julieta Serrano, Maria Barranco, Rossy de Palma
     Released mental patient Antonio Banderas kidnaps porn star Victoria
Abril when she refuses to marry him.  Banderas ties Abril up and keeps
her trapped in her apartment.  As Abril's captivity goes on, she starts
to fall for Banderas.
     ATAME! is certainly not a comedy for all people.  People with
obscure tastes, I think, will have the most chance of liking this film.
I enjoyed this film a lot and suggest that adventurous people take a
chance with this film.  Inspite of what the title might suggest, this is
not a S&M, T&A, or bondage film.  I give ATAME! a five on a scale of
zero to five.  ATAME! is rated NC-17 for female nudity, explicit
language, adult situations, and violence.  There are two versions of
ATAME! available, an NC-17 version and an unrated version (the version
that I saw).  Both versions have a run time of 101 minutes, so there
can't be more than a few seconds difference.
     The cast for this film is excellent, especially Victoria Abril (LA
LUNE DANS LE CANIVEAU [THE MOON IN THE GUTTER], AMANTES [LOVERS 1991
version], HIGH HEELS).  She brings her character alive when she is on
screen.  Victoria Abril is the highlight of this film.  Antonio Banderas
(WOMEN ON THE VERGE OF A NERVOUS BREAKDOWN) also does a great job.
Francisco Rabal, who plays an old director in the film, has the funniest
character in the film.
     Spanish cult director Pedro Almodovar (WOMEN ON THE VERGE OF A
NERVOUS BREAKDOWN) has created an excellent dark comedy that will most
likely reward those who are willing to try this film with a great time.
ATAME! is excellently written and has great locations.  I think the way
that the drug district was set up to look was great.  The subtitles are
in yellow and done well, so that they can be read in all of the scenes.

Title
Review for Killer Tomatoes Strike Back (1990)
This review is part three of a series which, in order, includes ATTACK
OF THE KILLER TOMATOES, RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES: THE SEQUEL, and
KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK!.
88 min., not rated, Comedy, 1990
Director: John De Bello
Cast: Rick Rockwell, Crystal Carson, Steve Lundquist, John
Witherspoon, John Astin, Kevin West, "Rock" Peace, John De Bello,
Charlie Jones
     Rick Rockwell is a cop working for "Rock" Peace, a veteran of the
two tomato wars.  He doesn't see the danger that exists with having
tomatoes around.  Scientist Crystal Carson is attacked by tomatoes and
goes to Rockwell for help.  He thinks it is a joke, but the two along
with Fuzzy Tomato (from RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES: THE SEQUEL),
discover that the evil doctor Austin, who is impersonating the host of a
talk show called Geranahue (a stupid pun), plans to help tomatoes take
over the world.
     KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK! is the sequel to the film RETURN OF
THE KILLER TOMATOES: THE SEQUEL.  KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK! is a
pathetic excuse for a movie, but is not quite as bad as the original,
ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES.  The production values look higher, but
the jokes are just as lame.  Some of the actors are better than the
original but not much.  On a scale of zero to five, I give KILLER
TOMATOES STRIKE BACK! a one.  KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK! is not
rated but contains adult situations.
     The best part of this film was the tomatoes.  They looked rather
cute, although I don't think that they were supposed to, and seemed to
do a better job than the actors.  Then again, they were probably easier
to train than the actors.  For the most part the actors do a horrible
job.  The two that I thought put in rather good performances were John
Astin, from the television show "The Addams Family" (not the movie), and
Charlie Jones.  John Astin is great as the evil professor Gangrene.  He
has an evil crazy appearance that makes his role totally believable.  If
it wasn't for him and the tomatoes this film would have been a total
loss.  Charlie Jones, who only has a cameo in this film, is funny as the
master of disguise.  Crystal Carson, although she looks good, shows no
acting ability and the scene with her in the shower is completely
stupid.  "Rock" Peace, who plays the tomato basher dude also shows no
acting ability at all and I have no clue as to why he keeps getting
called back for the role.  Couldn't they find anybody else who could do
a better job?  
     I feel even fans of camp films will find this one horrible and a
waste of time.  I can't recommend this film to anybody unless you found
ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES to be a wonderful film, and if you did I
feel sorry for you.  If you must see this film convince a friend to see
it and get him or her to rent it so you won't waste any money.
     One last note, at the beginning of the video cassette, for KILLER
TOMATOES STRIKE BACK! there is an ad for part four of the Tomatoes
trilogy (yes, I catch the joke) called KILLER TOMATOES EAT FRANCE,
which may or may not really exist.  If it does, it looks like it will be
as bad as KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK!  If I ever find it on video
cassette I will write a review on it and tell you what I thought of it.
I would appreciate any comments on it if anybody has already seen it
(the copyright notice on the ad was 1991 so it probably would already be
on video cassette if it actually exists).

Title
Review for Lincoln (1992) (TV)
195 min., not rated, Documentary, 1992, Made-for-television
Director: Peter W. Kunhardt
Voices of: James Earl Jones, Jason Robards, Glenn Close, Dabney Coleman,
           Stacy Keach, Ossie Davis, Richard Dreyfus, Rod Steiger,
           Richard Widmark, Arnold Schwarzenegger, E.G. Marshall,
           Richard Thomas, Fred Gwynne, Eli Wallach, Oprah Winfrey,
           Burgess Meredith, Ned Beatty, Barnard Hughes,
           Cliff Robertson, Maureen Stapleton, Frank Langella,
           Henry Morgan, Keith Carradine, Blythe Danner, Robert Vaughn,
           Philip Bosco, Jim Dale, Jill Clayburgh, Robby Benson,
           Gordon Parks, John Shea, Laurence Luckinbill,
           Stockard Channing
     This is a documentary on one of America's greatest presidents,
Abraham Lincoln (voice of Jason Robards).  The documentary is narrated
by James Earl Jones and covers Lincoln from his start in politics to his
assassination by John Wilkes Booth (voice of Frank Langella).
     LINCOLN was made much in the same way that the PBS film THE CIVIL
WAR was made, using pictures of Lincoln and the other people featured in
the film.  I never saw the PBS film THE CIVIL WAR, so I can't say
whether this one came out better.  I think however, that LINCOLN was
very well done, and worth seeing if you get the chance.  If you missed
LINCOLN when it aired on television, it is also available on video
cassette, which runs for 45 minutes longer than the film did on
television.  On a scale of zero to five, I give LINCOLN a four.  LINCOLN
contains nothing that I think anyone would find objectionable.
     The voice talent for LINCOLN, I felt, for the most part is very
good.  I think that fact that the film had experienced actors for the
voices helped the film considerably.  Instead of one monotone voice
throughout the film, there were several different voices, which had some
emotion to them.  I think that it is good that the film had more than
just a narrator, because hearing the same voice for the entire length of
the film would get rather boring.  I feel that only one of the voices
was miscast, that was Arnold Schwarzenegger.  He is great in his action
films where he doesn't have much of a speaking role, and he was even
able to pull off KINDERGARTEN COP.  As just a voice talent, however, I
don't think that his voice makes it.  He doesn't have good diction, and
I feel that voice could have been better cast.  [Moderator's note: The
character he spoke was Bavarian-born, and probably had the same accent.]
     I liked how there were color shots of the buildings in the present
day mixed in with the portraits from the time.  That technique added
some variety to the film and kept all the old photographs from wearing
on the viewer.  The photographs were well picked and were well placed in
the film so that they fit in.
     The only other main problem that I had with the film is that I
think that it could have run for television time of two and a half to
three hours, instead of the four that it ran.  Even though the four
hours were well done, the film after a while seemed to be going on
forever.

Title
Review for Wayne's World (1992)
135 min., PG-13, Comedy, 1992
Director: Penelope Spheeris
Cast: Mike Myers, Dana Carvey, Rob Lowe, Donna Dixon, Lara Flynn Boyle,
      Tia Carrere, Alice Cooper, Ione Sky, Robert Patrick, Ed O'Neill,
      Chris Farley, Brian Doyle-Murray, Colleen Camp, Meatloaf
     Wayne and Garth (played in order by Mike Myers and Dana Carvey)
run a public access television show called Wayne's World from Wayne's
basement.  Television executive Rob Lowe wants to buy up the show so he
can put it on a network station.  Mike Myers sees female rocker Tia
Carrere and falls in love with her but is chased by his airhead
ex-girlfriend Lara Flynn Boyle.  Dana Carvey sees beautiful Donna Dixon
and falls in love with her but can't bring up the courage to speak to
her.
     WAYNE'S WORLD is very funny at most times, although it is
occasionally slow.  Probably after you finish the film you won't even
remember the slow scenes.  WAYNE'S WORLD is just a "vege-out" movie,
there is nothing really important said.  Actually there is one point
made in the film.  It is that someone should not sell out to
commercialism.  This film is just for someone who wants to spend a
night at the movies without having to think.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give WAYNE'S WORLD a four.  WAYNE'S WORLD is rated PG-13 for
explicit language, adult situations, and adult humor.
     I don't know whether to recommend that you go out to the theaters
to see WAYNE'S WORLD.  Some of you will love it, some of you will hate
it -- it all depends on your preferences for comedy.  If you are a fan
of "Saturday Night Live" or are a fan of silly movies, like THE NAKED
GUN 2 1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR and HOT SHOTS!, then I highly recommend
that this film be on your list of films to see.  If you are a fan only
of more subtle comedy, like PRETTY WOMAN or "CROCODILE" DUNDEE, I really
don't recommend that you rush out to the theater to see the film.  This
film will probably lose nothing on video, so those of you unsure about
the film might want to wait for the video to come out.
     WAYNE'S WORLD is based on a series of "Saturday Night Live" skits
created by Mike Myers.  The "Wayne's World" skits on "Saturday Night
Live" tend to be funnier than in this film.  Three members of the cast
of this film, that I know of, are also currently members of "Saturday
Night Live."  Those are, Mike Myers, Dana Carvey, and Chris Farley.
     WAYNE'S WORLD features many cameo appearances by movie and
television stars.  Ed O'Neill ("Married... with Children") stars as a
psychopathic waiter at an all night diner.  Alice Cooper has a concert
performance in the film and talks with Mike Myers and Dana Carvey.
Meatloaf stars as "Tiny."  Robert Patrick (TERMINATOR 2) stars as, well,
you'll see.  Chris Farley stars as a limousine driver.

Title
Review for Whore (1991)
88 min., NC-17, Drama, 1991
Director: Ken Russell
Cast: Theresa Russell, Benjamin Mouton, Antonio Fargas,
      Elizabeth Movelead, Daniel Quinn, Jason Saucier, Sanjay,
      Micahel Crabtree, Jared Barclay, Doug MacHugh,
      Amanda Goodwin, Frank Smith, Jason Kristofer, Tom Villard,
      Ginger Lynn Allen, Jack Nance
     WHORE depicts a day in the life of a prostitute.  It follows one
prostitute, played by Theresa Russell, from morning till night.  Along
the way Russell talks about her life and those she loves.
     WHORE is a gritty, depressing, graphic, yet powerful and emotional
film.  WHORE is *not* an erotic or porno film.  It doesn't try to
titillate you in any way.  It contains minimal nudity, and the sex
scenes are less than erotic.  Instead it shows what a prostitute goes
through.  The film does not try to please you, but on the other hand, it
doesn't purposely offend you.  Many people probably will be offended
because of the straightforwardness of this film, but it isn't for
everybody.  People who are out looking for cheap thrills will be sorely
disappointed with this film.  If you are in the mood for a good drama,
and you are watching with an open mind, you will probably love this
film.  WHORE is available in two versions, an NC-17 rated version and an
unrated version.  The unrated version runs for 5 more minutes than the
NC-17 one.  One a scale of zero to five, I give WHORE a five.  WHORE is
rated NC-17 for explicit language, adult situations, and female nudity.
     Part of the reason this film ends up so good is because of its
excellent cast.  Theresa Russell gives a very powerful and emotional
performance.  This may be her best film yet.  She brought me right into
her character and made me feel for her.  Benjamin Mouton gives an
equally powerful performance as Russell's slimeball pimp.  He makes his
character repellent, yet shows that he is a human too.  Antonio Fargas
plays a weird guy who Russell meets on the street.  His is an impressive
performance.  The rest of the cast of this film, who all have bit parts,
do a great job.  Especially Jack Nance as the school teacher, Ginger
Lynn Allen as the hurt prostitute, Tom Villard as the hippie, the person
who played the no-condom man, and Russell's book friend.
     I really enjoyed the opening song "Doing the Bang" by Fascinating
Force.  I feel that it accurately shows the way many people feel about
prostitutes.  I feel this song was much more appropriate than some rock
song that has nothing to do with the movie.  I don't remember the rest
of the music from the movie.  At least it wasn't distracting.
     Ken Russell's (no relation to Theresa) directing is excellent and
the writing is superb.  The story is very gripping and interesting.
Theresa Russell's flashbacks are well weaved into the film so they don't
appear awkward.  The actors don't send up with any moronic dialog, which
sometimes happens in films.
     WHORE does not condone, or put down, prostitution.  It shows it for
what it is, and nothing more; mostly from the prostitute's point of
view, some as seen by the pimp, and a very little as seen by the
customer.  WHORE could probably have gotten away with an R rating,
except that the subject matter requires a certain amount of maturity.
This is not appropriate for young teens.

Title
Review for Double vie de Vronique, La (1991)
105 min., R, Mystery, 1991, In French (?) with English subtitles
Director: Krzysztof Kieslowski
Cast: Irene Jacob, Phillippe Voltar, Sandrine Dumas,
      Aleksander Bardini, Louis Duereux, Claude Duneton,
      Halina Gryglaszewska, Kalina Jedrusik
     In Poland, Veronika (Irene Jacob), who is a singer, has feelings
that she has a counterpart.  In France, Veronique (also Irene Jacob),
gets premonitions that something is going to happen to her.  She starts
receiving strange mail from an unknown person and tries to figure out
what it all means.
     I found THE DOUBLE LIFE OF VERONIQUE to be a great movie, and wish
that I could have gone back to see it again, but I saw it on the last
day it was being shown.  I highly recommend this film, I think that you
will probably enjoy it.  This film has been released on video cassette.
However, many video stores may probably not get this film (like mine
didn't).  If your video store has gotten the film, there is no real need
to go see it in the theater, unless you prefer to see films in the
theater.  On a scale of zero to five, I give THE DOUBLE LIFE OF
VERONIQUE a five.  THE DOUBLE LIFE OF VERONIQUE is rated R for female
nudity, adult situations, and explicit language.
     All of the actors/actresses do a great job.  Irene Jacob, who won
the Best Actress Award at the Cannes Film Festival, is excellent, as
well as being extremely beautiful.  Veronika's aunt and Veronique's
father were also both great.  A nice thing about the film is that the
two main characters (Veronika and Veronique) are shown separately.  At
only one brief time are the two shown almost together, and that keeps
the film from getting confusing.  
     This film is definitely not for mainstream audiences.  I feel that
those who don't ever venture to their local art theater will most likely
find this film to be a waste of time.  Those who tend to enjoy
imports/alternative cinema will most likely be entranced by the film,
although you may have to see the film twice for everything to make
sense.
     The idea behind the film is interesting, but I don't think that it
is a new idea.  The film is well written.  Well, I should say that the
subtitles are well written (I don't understand the language spoken so I
don't know what the actors were really saying).  The subtitles are done
with white lettering, and is almost always easy to read.  The locations
used, I assume in France and Poland, are great and really set the film
well.

Title
Review for Chteau de ma mre, Le (1990)
     A young French boy is in love with the hills of France.  He would
like to spend all his time in his family's second house in the hills,
but because of schooling and his father's job he is unable to spend much
time there.  He tries, whenever possible, to go up to the hills so he
can have fun.
     I found MY MOTHER'S CASTLE to be a very interesting and beautiful
film to watch.  What makes this film so interesting is not so much the
plot, as it is in the scenery.  I highly recommend that if this film
comes to a theater near you, you go see it.  It will be well worth the
trip.  I rate MY MOTHER'S CASTLE a four on a scale of zero to five.  MY
MOTHER'S CASTLE is rated PG and I couldn't find anything that anyone
might find objectionable.
     MY MOTHER'S CASTLE is the sequel to Yves Robert's earlier film MY
FATHER'S GLORY, which unfortunately I have not yet been able to see.  MY
MOTHER'S CASTLE, and MY FATHER'S GLORY, are based on the writings of
Marcel Pagnol.  From the way this film ends I think that it will be the
last in the series.  The title of the film makes little sense until just
before the end when it gets explained to you.
     The best part, I feel, were the locations used for the filming.  I
assume that the locations are in France, but at any rate they are
perfect.  The film would not be near as good as it is if the locations
weren't as well picked.  The opening credits are shown while a camera
pans around a beautiful mountain.  The acting was really well done, by
all the people in the film.  The actors really convince you that they
are the person in the film.  I started to actually feel for the people
in the film.
     I almost didn't go to see this film when it was playing in my town,
because I thought that it was going to be boring.  I haven't had a good
record with imported films.  I have seen a dreadful French film called
CHOCOLAT, a boring Danish film called PELLE THE CONQUEROR, a semi-poor
French film called BAXTER, and a reasonably good Italian film called THE
STORY OF BOYS AND GIRLS.  But I am really glad that I went and saw MY
MOTHER'S CASTLE.  I just can't put into words the way that I felt about
it.  I am going to try to see if I can get my local art/import theater
to get MY FATHER'S GLORY to see if it is just as good.

Title
Review for National Lampoon Goes to the Movies (1981)
1:29, R, Comedy, 1982
Directors: Bob Giraldi, Henry Jaglom
Cast: Robby Benson, Richard Widmark, Diane Lane, Candy Clark,
      Christopher Lloyd, Peter Reigart, Ann Dusenberry, Barry Diamond,
      Elisah Cook, Robert Culp, Bobby Di Cicco, Teresa Ganzel,
      Julie Kavner, Joe Spinell, Titos Vandis, Margaret Whitton,
      Fred Willard, Henny Youngman, Trinidad Silva, Tommy Koenig,
      Olympia Dukakis, Dick Miller
     This film is actually three spoofs of films/television.  The first
segment, "Grow Yourself," is a spoof of personal growth films.  Peter
Reigart kicks his wife out of the house so that the two of them can
grow.  The second segment, "Success Wanters," is a spoof of soap
operas.  Ann Dusenberry, a stripper, uses what she can to climb the
success ladder.  The last segment, "Municipalians," is a spoof of cop
films.  Young policeman Robby Benson is after woman killer Christopher
Lloyd and can't seem to get the knack of things.
     NATIONAL LAMPOON'S MOVIE MADNESS has just been re-released on
MGM/UA Home video under the title NATIONAL LAMPOON GOES TO THE MOVIES.
Supposedly this film originally had a fourth segment making fun of
disaster films, but that is not on the MGM/UA cassette.  This film is
funny and worth seeing.  On a scale of zero to five, I give NATIONAL
LAMPOON'S MOVIE MADNESS a four.  MOVIE MADNESS is rated R for adult
situations, female nudity, adult humor, explicit language, and
violence.
     Henry Jaglom was the director of the "Municipalians" segment and
Bob Giraldi was the director of the "Grow Yourself" and "Success
Wanters" segments.  Olympia Dukakis (LOOK WHO'S TALKING, MOONSTRUCK),
Trinidad Silva (UHF), Dick Miller (MATINEE, AMAZON WOMEN ON THE MOON)
and Tommy Koenig (NATIONAL LAMPOON'S CLASS OF '86) all have brief
cameos in this film.  I liked the drawn pictures that were shown
between the segments.  I think that they make a good segue between the
sketches.
     I feel that "Municipalians" is the best segment in the film.  I
think that it has the best cast and is written better than the others.
It is also the funniest segment.  MOVIE MADNESS is worth seeing just
for this segment.  Robby Benson (WHITE HOT, BEAUTY AND THE BEAST) makes
a great innocent cop.  Christopher Lloyd (BACK TO THE FUTURE - PART 3,
THE ADDAMS FAMILY) makes a great criminal.
     "Success Wanters," which is the next best segment, gets stretched
out too long.  The material can't quite hold up throughout the entire
segment.  Ann Dusenberry (THE MEN'S CLUB) gives a reasonably good
performance, however, I think she could have done a little better.
Robert Culp (HICKEY AND BOGGS, "I Spy") does a great job as the head of
a margarine company.
     "Grow Yourself" is definitely the worst segment.  The script
wasn't written too well and it has many slow spots.  There are some
very funny parts though, so it is still worth watching.  I don't think
Peter Reigert (NATIONAL LAMPOON'S ANIMAL HOUSE) gives his best
performance in this film.  Diane Lane (KNIGHT MOVES, CHAPLIN), even
though her name is third on the beginning credits, only has a cameo.
She does a good job though.

Title
Review for Guncrazy (1992)
1:37, R, Action/Drama, 1992, Made-for-Cable-Television
Director: Tamra Davis
Cast: Drew Barrymore, James LeGros, Billy Drago, Rodney Harvey,
      Joe Dallesandro, Michael Ironside, Ione Skye
     Promiscuous teenager Drew Barrymore gets James LeGros, who is in
prison for manslaughter, as a pen pal.  Barrymore learns that LeGros
likes guns, so she learns how to use them.  LeGros gets out of prison on
parole and he goes to live in the same town as Barrymore.  Even though
LeGros can't have sex, he and Barrymore find that they have some things
in common, especially a liking for guns.
     GUN CRAZY was aired on, and made for, Showtime, several months ago
and it was just released on videocassette.  Apparently the film had a
small theatrical run, too, but it didn't come to any theaters around my
area.  Even though this film is a B movie, I think that it ends up
looking like it had a much higher budget then it really did.  Part of
the reason for this is that it has a very talented cast.  I highly
recommend this film.  On a scale of zero to five, I give GUN CRAZY a
five.  GUN CRAZY is rated R for explicit language, adult situations, and
violence.
     Drew Barrymore ("2000 Malibu Road," SKETCH ARTIST), I think, is the
most alluring female in movies today.  She has had the same basic type
of character in most of her recent films that I have seen; POISON IVY
(1992 version), FAR FROM HOME, and BEYOND CONTROL: THE AMY FISHER STORY.
She plays a sensuous young female, and she doesn't have to go nude to
portray this character.  I think that she is much better in this role
then actresses that go nude (like Shannon Tweed in NIGHT EYES 2 or Bo
Derek in GHOSTS CAN'T DO IT).  I think that Drew Barrymore's performance
made this film, even though the entire cast is very talented.  She is
excellent in her role and completely believable.
     James LeGros (DRUGSTORE COWBOY, POINT BREAK) is excellent in his
role.  Billy Drago (THE UNTOUCHABLES, DELTA FORCE 2: OPERATION
STRANGLEHOLD) plays a preacher and is excellent.  Joe Dallesandro
(CRY-BABY, WILD ORCHID 2: TWO SHADES OF BLUE) gives a perfectly slimy
performance as Drew Barrymore's mother's boyfriend.  Who ever played the
sheriff also was great.  Ione Skye (GAS FOOD LODGING, WAYNE'S WORLD) has
a great cameo.  She plays a friend of Barrymore's, who is the daughter
of the sheriff.  Even though her part is very small, she brings life to
her character.
     GUN CRAZY is well written, although the basic plot behind the film
is not original.  The basic plot line of the film reminded me of WISDOM
(with Emilio Estevez and Demi Moore).  However some parts of the film
are different.  Also, I enjoyed GUN CRAZY more than WISDOM.

Title
Review for Hear My Song (1991)
100 min., R, Drama , 1991
Director: Peter Chelsom
Cast: Ned Beatty, Adrian Dunbar, Shirley-Anne Field, Tara Fitzgerald,
      William Hootkins, David McCallum
     Adrian Dunbar is going to be evicted from the building where his
club is located.  He promises the landlords that he is going to get
Irish tenor Ned Beatty to sing at the club, and they let him stay open.
Instead of Beatty, Dunbar ends up with an impersonator.  Dunbar loses
the club, his girlfriend Tara Fitzgerald, and his friends.  He sets out
on a voyage to Ireland to try to locate Beatty so he can get Fitzgerald
back.
     HEAR MY SONG is a wonderful film, is well written and beautifully
filmed.  It is well worth going to see if it comes to a theater near
you.  Personally, this film didn't sound the most interesting to me, but
it was playing as a double feature to the other film I went to see, so I
figured I might as well watch this film too.  I was surprised at how
much I liked it.  On a scale of zero to five, I give HEAR MY SONG a
four.  It is rated R for female nudity, adult situations, and explicit
language.
     The locations used for this film were great.  The Irish country
side where Beatty was living looked beautiful.  Ned Beatty, who is
really starting to get old (53, I think) did a great job, even though he
didn't do his own singing.  Some opera singer, I think, did all of the
singing for him.  Dunbar, who I don't think I have ever seen before in
the movies, did a wonderful job and has a potential in movies, at least
in alternative cinema.  Tara Fitzgerald, although she wasn't on the
screen very much, did a memorable performance.  The rest of the
supporting cast also did a great job.
     The film was interesting.  I fully enjoyed watching it and never
got bored.  This is alternative cinema almost at its best.   I highly
suggest that if you have not yet seen this film that you attempt to.  I
don't think that you will be disappointed.  I certainly wasn't.  I feel
that this film should have gotten more exposure than it did.  At least
in my area it only played for four days, and I don't think that that was
near enough time.  I feel that this film probably would have done very
well at a mainstream theater which would have allowed more people to see
it.

Title
Review for Rocky Horror Picture Show, The (1975)
100 min., R, Comedy/Musical/Science Fiction/Cult, 1975
Distributor: CBS FOX (but not currently available for purchase)
Director: Jim Sharman
Cast: Tim Curry, Susan Sarandon, Barry Bostwick, Richard O'Brien,
      Meatloaf, Patricia Quinn, "Little Nell" Campbell,
      Jonathan Adams, Charles Gray, Peter Hinwood
     Straight and naive couple Barry Bostwick and Susan Sarandon are
going on a drive in the woods to visit Adams when one of their tires
blows out.  They return to a castle they had recently passed to see if
they can use a phone to call for help.  At the castle they meet
Transylvanian transvestite Tim Curry, his creation Peter Hinwood, his
servants Richard O'Brien and Patricia Quinn, groupie "Little Nell"
Campbell, and many others.   As the night progresses Barry Bostwick and
Susan Sarandon get loosened up.
     I am a very big fan of THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW and strongly
urge, if you haven't gone to see it, that you do so.  Who knows, you
might surprise yourself and like it.  On a rating scale of zero to five,
I give ROCKY a five.  THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW is rated R for adult
situations, explicit language, adult humor, and brief female nudity.  *A
WORD OF WARNING*, THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW is not for little
children or people who are easily shocked for it contains a lot of
sexual innuendo and a range of other taboo subjects.
     THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW was originally released in the
theaters in 1975 and was a box office bomb.  Since then a cult following
has been established and the movie has started theatrical runs at
midnight.  THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW can still be seen in the
theater on the big screen, and, for those people who don't want to go
out to the movies at midnight, it is on video cassette at those video
stores that got the film when it was available for purchase.  For your
first viewing you may wish to see ROCKY on video because in the theater
there is a lot of audience reaction to the film and some of the lines
will be drowned out.
     THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW is one of those films that gets
better each time you view it.  The first time that I saw ROCKY, I felt
that this was a very bizarre film.  Most of the cast end up wearing
fishnet tights at some point in the film.  This sort of shocked me, and
sort-of turned me off to the film.  I liked the songs a lot though.  The
second time I liked the film a lot more.  I was no longer shocked at all
by the attire of some of the characters in the film.  I found ROCKY to
be a truly original film.  Where else can you find a man who walks
around for almost an hour and forty minutes wearing little more than
fishnet tights and a garter belt?  The film contains wonderful songs
that make you want to sing along, and if you go to the theater to see
ROCKY you will find out that the audience does sing along.  Now THE
ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW is one of my favorite movies.  I have bought
the soundtrack and the video cassette, and have seen the play THE ROCKY
HORROR SHOW three times.
     A big part of ROCKY in the theaters is that all the cult fans call
out reactions to lines in the film, sing along, and, in theaters that
allow it, some people throw things at the screen at certain points like
toilet paper, rice, and water.  Some people dress up like their favorite
character in the film.  Some people dance in the isles.  If you are
lucky, at your theater will be a group of ROCKY fans who act out the
film as it goes along.  In short it's a great deal of fun.  All this
will be missed if you watch the video (however, just before and after
the film on the video cassette there are scenes of theaters playing
ROCKY with the audience participation).  And for those of you
interested, the minister in the beginning of ROCKY was played by Tim
Curry and the three other people in the church were played by Richard
O'Brien, Patricia Quinn, and "Little Nell" Campbell.
     THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW is based on an English play called
THE ROCKY HORROR SHOW that played in London and was written by Richard
O'Brien.  All the music and lyrics for the songs were written by Richard
O'Brien also.  The film was co-written by Jim Sharman (the director of
THE ROCKY HORROR SHOW) and Richard O'Brien.
     Tim Curry (THE HUNT FOR RED OCTOBER, CLUE, IT) plays Dr. Frank-N-
Furter (a scientist).  Frank-N-Furter is the main character in the film.
He is a transvestite from Transsexual Transylvania (Transsexual is a
planet).  Frank-N-Furter is creating the perfect creation, Rocky
Horror, and about to unveil him to a group of Transylvanians when two
strangers show up and threaten taking Rocky away from him.
     Susan Sarandon (PRETTY BABY, BULL DURHAM) plays Janet Weiss (a
heroine).  Janet is one of the two people who get brought into Frank-N-
Furter's castle and exposed to a different view on sexuality.  She falls
in love with Rocky Horror, much to Frank's dismay.  In the beginning of
the film Janet is very uncomfortable in Frank's castle, but as the night
wears on she starts to feel more at home!
     Barry Bostwick (MOVIE! MOVIE!, CAPTIVE, A PARENT TRAP HAWAIIAN
HONEYMOON, SLITHER) plays Brad Majors (a hero).  Brad is the other
person brought into Frank's castle, and he is sexually loosened by
Frank.  He is confused with the castle, yet likes it at the same time.
He just doesn't know how to react to what happens to him.  He and Janet
are engaged to be married.
     Richard O'Brien (FLASH GORDON, SHOCK TREATMENT, JUBILEE) plays Riff
Raff (a handyman).  It is said that Richard O'Brien wrote the role of
Riff Raff for himself.  Whether it is true or not, I don't know.  Riff
Raff is the caretaker of Frank's castle.  He is also from Transsexual
Transylvania.   Riff Raff doesn't care much for Rocky Horror.
     Patricia Quinn (SHOCK TREATMENT) plays Magenta (a domestic).
Magenta is Riff Raff's sister and she is also from Transsexual
Transylvania.  Magenta doesn't like Rocky Horror very much, and she
isn't very pleased with the way Frank treats her.
     "Little Nell" Campbell (JUBILEE) plays Columbia (a groupie).  She
came to Frank's castle because she was in love with Frank.  At Frank's
castle she fell in love with Eddie.  She worships the ground that Eddie
walks on and is very upset with what happens to him.  She seems to
despise Brad and Janet.
     Jonathan Adams plays Dr. Everett V.  Scott (a rival scientist).
Dr. Scott is a former teacher of both Brad and Janet.  He is now a
friend to both of them.  He, apparently, has been investigating Frank
for a period of time and coincidently picks this night, when Brad and
Janet are at Frank's castle, to act.  This action endangers the lives of
Brad, Janet, and Dr. Scott.
     Peter Hinwood (THE ODYSSEY) plays Rocky Horror (a creation).  Rocky
Horror is "born" in the beginning of the film.  Riff Raff and Magenta
terrorize him.  Frank comes after him for sexual reasons and Janet
tempts him.  Rocky is very confused by the whole ordeal and just wants
to get away from it all.
     Meatloaf (ROADIE, WAYNE'S WORLD) plays Eddie (an ex-delivery boy).
Eddie is Columbia's lover and Frank's ex-lover.  Frank needed to get a
brain for Rocky so he took half of Eddie's.  Then he put Eddie in deep
freeze for future use if necessary.  Eddie has the smallest role in the
film, but the one who, in my opinion, is the most liked.
     Charles Gray (DIAMONDS ARE FOREVER, THE MIRROR CRACK'D, SHOCK
TREATMENT, YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE) plays The Criminologist (an expert).
The Criminologist narrates the dreadful story of what happened to Brad
and Janet (The Denton Affair).
     Also for those of you interested, on the walls of Frank's castle
are many famous paintings, like the Mona Lisa.  And the male statues in
Frank's lab have lipstick and fingernail polish on.
     This film has an interesting style.  Events that have happened in
the past are narrated by the Criminologist; yet the scenes with Brad and
Janet are done like they are taking place in the present.  The scenes
with the Criminologist are spliced in the middle of scenes with Brad and
Janet.
     If this film comes to a theater in your area definitely go see it
and don't forget to bring your squirt gun filled with water, (Scott)
toilet paper, and rice.  Remember, in the lines of Frank-N-Furter,
"Don't dream it, be it."

Title
Review for Proof (1991)
     Hugo Weaving is a blind man who doesn't seem to trust anyone.  He
takes photos of what is around him as proof that what is there exists.
He doesn't trust his housekeeper Genevieve Picot, who likes him very
much.  Weaving finds Russell Crowe, who he trusts, to describe his
photos to him.
     PROOF is done by House and Moorhouse Films and is distributed by
Fine Line Features (which is a division of New Line Cinema).  Although
the film's description sounds strange, and initially to me not
interesting, I found PROOF to be a very good film, although I don't
think that it will appeal to everybody.  However, if it comes to your
area, I suggest trying it.  Later this month, PROOF is going to be
released on video.  I feel it is worth seeing.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give PROOF a four.  PROOF is rated R for female nudity, adult
situations, and explicit language.
     The actors all did a good job.  Hugo Weaving was very convincing as
a blind person.  Genevieve Picot was very good as the housekeeper.
Russell Crowe was excellent as the young adult who is befriended by
Weaving.  I don't think that there were any actors in the film that I
felt were miscast.  The film had an interesting idea, which worked well;
however, I wouldn't have wanted to have been the one to describe the
film to the producer!   When I heard what the film was about, I wasn't
quite sure of what to expect.  Thankfully the film was more than I
expected that it could be.
     The script for the film was well written.  There were some places
in the film when the actors came out with some moronic lines, but not
many.  The story moves along rather well.  It did get a little boring in
some places, but those points are few and the interesting parts make up
for the slower ones.

Title
Review for Hook (1991)
140 min., PG, Fantasy, 1991
Director: Steven Spielburg
Cast: Robin Williams, Dustin Hoffman, Julia Roberts, Bob Hoskins,
      Maggie Smith, Charlie Korsmo, Phil Collins, David Crosby, Glenn Close
     A retelling of the widely known fantasy Peter Pan.  This one,
though, has a big twist to it, Peter Pan (going by the name Peter
Banning) is now grown up and is a very successful business man.  So
successful, in fact, that he has no time for his family and has
forgotten about his childhood.  For Christmas, Peter, his wife, and two
children, go to London to visit Wendy.  Wendy has to go and give a
speech and Peter and his wife go with her.  They leave their children
alone in Wendy's house.  When they get back they find the house in
shambles and the children missing.  Attached to the bedroom door, with a
knife, is a note saying that if Peter ever wants to see his children
again he must come to get them, and it is signed Hook.  Peter must
journey to Never Never Land to try to remember his childhood and save
his children.
     HOOK is one of the best films I have seen in a long time!  The
special effects are well done and the story, except in a couple of
places, is very well done.  Those few spots when the script was lacking
didn't hinder my enjoyment of the film though.  The soundtrack, done by
John Williams, fits the film perfectly.  I definitely recommend that you
venture out to your local movie theater and see this film, even at full
price.  On a zero to five scale I give the film a five.  HOOK is rated
PG for explicit language and violence, but is perfectly acceptable to
bring the whole family to.
     Robin Williams plays Peter Pan and does a relatively good job.  As
Peter Banning, Robin Williams did a perfect job.  It was like the role
was written for him, a serious businessman who takes phone calls during
his daughter's play (of "Peter Pan," of course) but yet still finds time
to have fun, like dueling with cellular phones.  As Peter Pan, though,
something was missing.  He didn't quite fit the role.  Over all he did a
very good job, to the best of his abilities, which is the most you can
ask of someone.  And Robin Williams in green tights is a sight to see.
     Dustin Hoffman portrays the ultimate evil, Captain Hook.  He makes
Hook into an evil person but with some compassion.  For instance,
instead of just killing Peter Pan in the beginning when Peter can't
fight, Hook waits to give Peter a chance to make himself a better fighter
so Peter can have a chance.  Part of the reason for this, I am sure, was
to make Captain Hook seem not so scary to little children (I don't know
how well that worked because I went to the 9:30 PM showing and there were
no little children in the audience).  At times Hook will seem a to do
things a little odd, but if you just accept it, it will make the movie
run smoothly and thus makes the movie more enjoyable for you.  At some
spots in the film the script, the lines for Captain Hook could have been
written a little better, but Dustin Hoffman covers quite well in the
slow spots.  Overall Dustin Hoffman puts in a memorable performance.
     Julia Roberts plays TinkerBell, Peter Pan's friend fairy.
Although Julia Roberts would not have been my first choice for the role,
she, like everybody else in the movie, put in a very good performance.
In most of her scenes she was edited in, so she was seen with Peter Pan
or some of the Lost Boys, very effectively.  With the props used I found
myself believing that Julia Roberts was really that small in real life
which means that the special effects in the film are very good.  In my
opinion, TinkerBell is one of the most important roles in HOOK (second
to Peter Pan and Captain Hook) which means that the performance put out
by the actress is very important, and Julia lived up to my expectations.
     Maggie Smith plays Wendy, now grown to the age of eighty-something.
She remembers the days before Peter Pan grew up and when he decided to
grow up she helped him find a home, along with many of the Lost Boys.
In fact the speech she is giving is because she is being honored for her
work with children, which included finding homes for some of the Lost
Boys.  I don't have much to say for Maggie Smith's performance for she
is not on the screen very much but when she is she does a very good job.
Her character provides the sensitivity and compassion that Peter's kids
need and she is also the person who tries to explain to Peter who he
really is, but to no avail.
     Bob Hoskins portrays Smee, Captain Hook's right hand man.  He is
the brains behind most of Captain Hook's devious schemes to capture the
Lost Boys and to kill Peter Pan.  He is not given a chance though to
really express how he feels because Captain Hook steps in when ever he
tries.  Bob Hoskins role was not written so the character would be
really remembered after the film.  He was there mostly, I feel, because
he was in the original Peter Pan story, and for occasional comic relief.
     Charlie Korsmo (of DICK TRACY fame) plays Peter Pan's male child
and I missed who plays Peter's female child.  The two combined put in
good a performance, always fighting and playing, especially when Daddy
is on the phone trying to speak about some important business
information.  But apart the two don't do nearly as well, as proven
towards the end of the film.  Korsmo is a child that has a hard time
forgiving his dad after he has been let down, and this anger towards his
dad becomes very important towards the end of the film.  Peter's
daughter, on the other hand, is quick to forgive her dad, partially, I
feel, because she realizes even though he messes up he still loves her
very much.
     Pop singer Phil Collins shows up for a brief cameo as a police
detective that arrives at Wendy's house to investigate the missing
children.  David Crosby (of Crosby, Stills, and Nash) is one of Captain
Hook's fun loving pirates and, like Phil Collins, doesn't show up very
often in the film.  Glenn Close also shows up for a brief cameo in the
film.
     The biggest mistake in the writing of the film, I feel, is how the
Lost Boys were handled.  Most of Never Never Land has remained the same
way it was from when Peter Pan was there, but for some reason some of
the Lost Boys have been changed to the current times.  The new leader of
the Lost Boys has a punk hairdo and rides around on sort of a skate
board that runs on tracks.  The Lost Boys hide out has been equipped
with a basketball court, and a skate board rink even!  I feel that the
Lost Boys should have been left alone.  Some of the Lost Boys, on the
other hand, were unchanged in the ways that they act and are dressed.
     The sets were really well made, especially the ones for
TinkerBell.  They also really portrayed the fact that Peter Pan was no
longer in the regular world, but in a world that for the most part is
behind the "civilized" world.  The major set mistake was the Lost Boys
hide out.  The Lost Boys hideout is a giant tree on a raised island.
From the far shots the island looks really small, but when the people
are in the hideout, the hideout seems to stretch out for miles.  Also,
how do the Lost Boys make it onto the island.  Never in the film do the
Lost Boys fly and I am sure that they don't always go up the way Peter
did, by a giant sea shell that was raised from the ocean.
     The way the end of the film was handled was predictable and a
little disappointing.  I think that the most effort in a script should
go towards the ending, because for me the ending of a film makes it, or
breaks it.  Almost at the very end the script picks back up again and
just when you think that it has recovered it totally loses it with a
scene with.
     Other than these few mistakes, which you barely even notice when
watching the film, the film is very, very good.  Steven Spielberg's
directing was also very well done.  So run out to the movie theater to
see the film, but allow yourself plenty of time for the movie might sell
out early, and this is one not to miss.

Title
Review for Poison Ivy (1992)
     Sara Gilbert lives in a dysfunctional family with her rich father
Tom Skerritt and her mother Cheryl Ladd.  Ladd is dying and has given up
on life.  Tramp Drew Barrymore, Ivy, shows up in Gilbert's life and
befriends her.  Barrymore moves in with Gilbert and becomes 'one of the
family'.  Barrymore wants all that Gilbert has and tries to get it from
her.
     POISON IVY was released in the theaters back in March or May of
1992 when I was in New York, but was unable to see it at that time.
When I got back to where I live, I waited for a theater around here to
get it, but no one did.  It was just released on video cassette this
month, so I rented it as soon as possible.  I hoped that it would be a
good film, considering how long I had waited to see it, and it was.  I
highly suggest that you try and rent this film, just be sure that you
get this version and not the earlier television film POISON IVY, which
is a totally different film and is also on video cassette.  On a scale
of zero to five, I give POISON IVY a five.  POISON IVY is released in
two versions, an unrated version (which I believe is the European
version) that runs for 93 minutes and contains explicit language, adult
situations, and brief female nudity, and an R rated version that runs
for 91 minutes and, I believe, is missing the scene of brief female
nudity.
     Sara Gilbert ("Roseanne") gives a great performance as the 'victim'
of this film.  She shows that she can give a dramatic performance and
could very possibly have a chance at a good film career.  Drew Barrymore
("2000 Malibu Road," FAR FROM HOME) is obviously the highlight of this
film, and probably will be the biggest draw to audiences.  Her
performance is excellent and she is very convincing as the tramp who
shows up in Sara Gilbert's life and slowly ruins it.  Tom Skerritt seems
to just be along for a free ride in this film.  He isn't on screen for
much of the film, and when he is, his acting is good, but not excellent.
Cheryl Ladd, although she is on the screen for less time than Tom
Skerritt, gives a depressing, but exceptional performance.
     POISON IVY is an interesting movie that is well written.   The
characters are interesting and the movie flows along smoothly.  The
direction, by Katt Shea Ruben is excellent.  I think this is Katt Shea
Ruben's best film since STREETS.  Through the combined effort of
everybody involved in this film, they have taken what could have ended
up as just another B movie and made it into a great film that is
definitely worth watching.

Title
Review for Where Angels Fear to Tread (1991)
114 min., PG, Drama, 1991
Director: Charles Sturridge
Cast: Helena Bonham Carter, Judy Davis, Rupert Graves,
      Giovanni Guidelli, Barbara Jefford, Helen Mirren
     A widowed woman falls in love and plans to get married with a man
from another culture.  Her family doesn't like the marriage and tries to
get her to reconsider.  I know that this is very vague, but I really
couldn't think up a good summary without giving away a lot of the plot.
     WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD has gotten a rave review (that I saw),
but I don't think that it is that good.  It is a good film but it is
slow in some places and over dramatic in others.  On a scale of zero to
five I give WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD a three (with reservations).
WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD is rated PG for adult situations.
     The biggest problem that I found with this film is that it got
rather boring in some places, and too emotional in other places.  I
think that if this film had been trimmed down to an hour and a half it
would have ended up a much better film.
     The actors/actresses do a great job.  I don't think that there were
any whose performance I disliked the performance by.  In that aspect
this film is great, and the only reason that the film ended up with a
three (with reservations) for a rating.  Otherwise it would have ended
up with a two.  I am sure that there are many people who will love this
film, it is just that I am not one of them.  So don't take my word as
the gospel and feel that this film is absolutely terrible.  If this film
sounds really great to you, you will probably love it, but if you go, I
can only suggest matinee prices.

Title
Review for Matinee (1993)
1:43, PG, Comedy, 1993
Director: Joe Dante
Cast: John Goodman, Cathy Moriarty, Simon Fenton, Omri Katz,      
      Kellie Martin, Lisa Jakub, Dick Miller, David Clennon,      
      Kevin McCarthy, John Sayles
     In a small Floridian town, the occupants are worried about being
bombed by the Russians from Cuba.  What better a time for Lawrence
Woolsey, John Goodman, to open one of his new B horror films?  Goodman,
with Cathy Moriarty, one of his actresses, comes to the town to
personally unveil his new "Rumble-vision."  Simon Fenton is new to the
town and likes Lisa Jakub.  Omri Katz is in love with Kellie Martin, but
her ex-con ex-boyfriend wants Katz to stay away from her.
     MATINEE is a love story, spoof of old horror films, and a comedy
about people overreacting in a panic situation.  People from around the
time of the Cuban missile crisis (who like comedies) will most likely
love this film.  Also people who were born after that time, but have had
exposure to old B horror movies, will probably also love this film (I
did!).  On a scale of zero to five, I give MATINEE a five.  MATINEE is
rated PG for explicit language and adult situations.
     The cast for this film I feel does an excellent job.  Rising above
the rest of this cast is John Goodman (ARACHNOPHOBIA, "Roseanne").  He
gives his usual excellent performance.  Cathy Moriarty (KINDERGARTEN
COP, NEIGHBORS) does a great job with her role.  The young cast Simon
Fenton, Omri Katz, Kellie Martin ("Life Goes On"), and Lisa Jakub all
give great performances.   The two men against Woolsey's film, John
Sayles and Dick Miller (FAR FROM HOME, AMAZON WOMEN ON THE MOON) I
think, do a great job and are highlights in the film.   Kevin McCarthy
(THE DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN, INVASION OF THE BODY SNATCHERS [1956 and
1978 versions]) is excellent as an actor in Lawrence Woolsey's film.
     The film shown in this film is great.  It does a wonderful job of
spoofing the horror films from the time (I have seen some from that time
on the late, late, late, late night movies).  The way this film within a
film was done adds a lot to the finished product and especially the end.
The film (both) are very well written and directed, by Joe Dante
(GREMLINS, AMAZON WOMEN ON THE MOON).  The film is photographed
beautifully.

Title
Review for Prom Night IV: Deliver Us from Evil (1992)
95 min., R, Horror, 1992
Director: Clay Borris
Cast: Nikki de Boer, Alden Kane, Joy Tanner, Alle Ghadban,
      Ken McGregor, Brock Simpson, James Carver
     Not so holy priest James Carver starts killing "loose" girls, along
with their boyfriends in the 1950's.  Carver gets stopped by the church
and is hidden away where he can't do any harm.  In the present day Nikki
de Boer, Alden Kane, Joy Tanner, and Alle Ghadban are all graduating
from high school and they skip their senior prom.  Instead they go off
to a secluded house, which, just by chance, happens to be the church
where Carver was during his killings so many years ago.  Carver gets
away from his prison and he goes back to the church and finds the four
there.   He proceeds to try to kill all four.
     PROM NIGHT 4: DELIVER US FROM EVIL is the sequel to PROM NIGHT 3:
THE LAST KISS, which is obvious from the title, but not from the content
of the film.  Other than a brief mention of Jamie Lee Curtis in PROM
NIGHT, this film has nothing to do with the earlier three, which makes
one wonder where the title came from.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give PROM NIGHT 4: DELIVER US FROM EVIL a zero.  PROM NIGHT 4 is rated R
for explicit language, adult situations, violence, and brief female
nudity.
     PROM NIGHT 4 is a completely unoriginal, uninventive slasher film,
which falls into all the cliches of poor slasher films.   The characters
in the film do completely ludicrous things and have moronic lines.  The
gore isn't done very well and there aren't any really good effects.  The
ending has been done so many times before that I could see it coming
from half way through the film.
     The actors in this film do a horrible job.  They are completely
unconvincing, at points to the extent of being funny.   The writing for
this film isn't very well done.  The plot has been done before so many
times, and so much better, that this film just falls flat.  The premise
is rather senseless, although the priest's gasoline holy water is cute.
     Do yourself a favor and don't rent this film, it isn't worth any
price.  Instead watch, or rewatch, the earlier PROM NIGHT films (PROM
NIGHT, HELLO MARY LOU: PROM NIGHT 2, and PROM NIGHT 3: THE LAST KISS).

Title
Review for Northern Lights (1978)
90 min., not rated, Drama, 1978, Black & White
Directors: John Hanson, Rob Nilsson
Cast: Robert Behling, Susan Lynch, Joe Spano, Ray Ness,
      Hellen Ness, Henry Martinson
     NORTHERN LIGHTS is, in my opinion, an incredibly boring film, an
absolute waste of time!  It is about the forming of the Nonpartisan
League around 1917 to help Nebraska farmers get better money for their
crops.  It is mostly narrated by one of these farmers who is trying to
help the Nonpartisan League  get started.
     I saw NORTHERN LIGHTS at my local art/import theater and I can
easily say that it is one of the worst films I have ever seen.  It is
filmed in grainy black and white with mostly just talking which gives it
the appearance, at least, of being a very cheap film.   Many times
during the film, to just barely keep from falling asleep, I found my
self counting the seats in the theater and hoping for it to get over
soon (because I won't walk out of a film in the theaters).  Many people
in the theater did walk out before the film was over, however.
     NORTHERN LIGHTS was first released in 1978 and has never made it to
videocassette.  It just keeps circling around small theaters that get
it.  I highly recommend that if this film comes to a theater in your
area that you miss it.  On a scale of zero to five, I give NORTHERN
LIGHTS a *big* zero.  NORTHERN LIGHTS is unrated and contains nothing
objectionable (or anything interesting for that matter).  I personally
feel that nobody,even if you are interested in this period or the
Nonpartisan League, would like this film.

Title
Review for Medusa: Dare to Be Truthful (1992) (TV)
51 min., not rated, Comedy/Documentary/Music, 1992, B&W/Color,
Made-for-cable-television
Director: John Fortenberry
Cast: Julie Brown, Chris Elliot, Bob Goldthwait, Tom Kenny, Carol Leifer
     This film is comedienne Julie Brown's spoof of Madonna's
documentary MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE.  Brown, a ditsy singer, films her
"Blonde Leading the Blonde" tour and makes it into a movie.   The film
follows Madonna's almost exactly, except the events are comical.  Like
Madonna's, this film is filmed in black and white, except for concert
footage, which is in color.
     MEDUSA: DARE TO BE TRUTHFUL was originally aired on Showtime and
has just been released onto video cassette.  I, who happened to like
MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE, fully enjoyed this film.  I only recommend this
film to people who have seen Madonna's film, because otherwise most of
it will not be as humorous as it could be.  I recommend that if you
haven't seen MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE, then rent the two films on the same
night and watch Madonna's then Julie Brown's.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give MEDUSA: DARE TO BE TRUTHFUL a four.  MEDUSA: DARE TO BE
TRUTHFUL is not rated and contains explicit language and adult
situations.
     This is a great film for those who are fans of the comedienne Julie
Brown, or those that think Madonna is over exposed and riding on a high
horse.  Unfortunately for those of you, who like me, are fans of Bob
Goldthwait, he is not on for very long in this film.  I was a little
disappointed with that, but Julie Brown made up for it.  Chris Elliot
(of the canceled FOX sitcom "Get a Life") does a better job in this
than he did in "Get a Life", but that doesn't say much.  He is not the
main attraction in this film, and I don't think that he adds anything to
it.
     This film is excellently written.  The similarities between this
and MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE are plentiful, except in this film all the
events have been twisted around until they meet Brown's wishes.  This
film is extremely stupid, but I didn't find myself noticing that until I
was finished.  This is certainly not a film that has great significance,
but it is a enjoyable way to spend an hour.

Title
Review for Haunting of Morella, The (1990)
82 min., R, Horror, 1991
Director: Jim Wynorski
Cast: David McCallum, Nicole Eggert, Christopher Halstead,
      Lana Clarkson, Jonathan Farwill, Maria Ford, Gail Harris,
      John O'Leary
     Seventeen years before, McCallum's wife Eggert was burned at the
stake for being a witch.  Eggert had a child before she died, and now
she wants to take over the body of her child, also played by Eggert, so
that she can live again.
     THE HAUNTING OF MORELLA is one of many "adaptations" of Edgar Allan
Poe's stories being released recently, which include BURIED ALIVE
(r.a.m.r. #01131), THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM (r.a.m.r. #01130), and THE
HOUSE OF USHER (which I haven't seen yet).  This film is not part of the
Harry Towers series coming over from Italy.  Instead it is produced by B
movie producer and director Roger Corman.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give THE HAUNTING OF MORELLA a three.  THE HAUNTING OF MORELLA is rated
R for violence, adult situations, and female nudity.
     After looking through all the volumes of Edgar Allan Poe's works in
my local library, I was unable to find anything called "The Haunting of
Morella" or anything with the word Morella in it, or anything that
sounded at all like this movie.  Maybe it is based on some little-known
story he did that I was unable to find.  [It was based on "Morella,"
originally  published in the "Southern Literary Magazine," April 1835,
and your library should get a complete Poe.  -Moderator]
     Most of Jim Wynorski's films, which include TRANSYLVANIA TWIST, NOT
OF THIS EARTH, DEATHSTALKER 2: DUEL OF THE TITANS, and just released
SORORITY HOUSE MASSACRE 2: NIGHTIE NIGHTMARE, have a large amount of
humor thrown in.  That seemed to be missing from this film.  That is too
bad, because that is part of the fun, I feel, of watching a Jim Wynorski
film.
     This film is still fun to watch, and fans of modern B movie horror
films will probably enjoy seeing this film.  There is nothing really
spectacular about this film, the special effects aren't great.  The
actors/actresses manage to pull off the film, although at times I
wondered if some of them would make it through the film because they
were not doing that good a job.  I suggest that you try this film if you
tend to enjoy horror films and can rent it for $2.00 or less.

Title
Review for Black Robe (1991)
101 min., R, Drama, 1991
Director: Bruce Beresford
Cast: Lothaire Bluteau, Aden Young, Sandrine Holt, August Schellenburg,
      Tantoo Cardinal, Frank Wilson, Lawrence Bayne
     Lothaire Bluteau is a French Jesuit missionary.  His job is to
transport a group of Indians from Quebec, Canada to a mission in the
Huron Indian area in the fall/winter time.  On the trip he is supposed
to convert the Indians to Christianity.  Aden Young is a French man in
his twenties who wishes to go along on the trip.  As the perilous trip
starts out the Indians think Bluteau is a demon out to take away their
spirits.  After the trip starts Young falls in love with a young Indian
girl, Sandrine Holt.
     BLACK ROBE is a must-see for anyone who wants a thought-provoking
film.  The film makes you think about religion and the culture of the
people depicted in it.  I enjoyed watching this film very much.  On a
zero to five scale, I give BLACK ROBE a four.  BLACK ROBE is rated R for
female nudity, graphic violence, and adult situations.
     The story is well-written.  It is about a group of Indians who are
being taken away from their homes and moved to a location that they
don't even know about.  On the journey a man who they have never seen
before tries to change them from believing that the dreams that they
have always believed in are false and that only his God is true.  The
journey is a hard one for it is mostly in the winter and the Indians
have little faith in the missionary.
     BLACK ROBE was filmed in breathtaking locations in Canada and
France.  Along with the story, the locations picked for the filming
were perfect.  There are some wonderful displays of nature's wonders.
The filming was done in the late fall and winter so the woods have snow
fall making them all the more beautiful.  And then there is the water
with the reflections of the trees in it as the Indian canoes go by.
     Aden Young's role is a hard one.  If he survives the mission,
Bluteau wants him to travel to France and to go through a mission so he
can become a man of God.  Young falls in love with Sandrine Holt, an
Indian.  Under the Christianity that Bluteau is teaching, Young can't
fall in love with an Indian and have sex with her.
     The Indians in the film speak in their native language to make the
film more realistic.  The dialogue is subtitled on the bottom of the
screen so the audiences will understand what the Indians are speaking.
The French speak in English, except when speaking to the Indians, when
they speak in the Indian's native tongue.
     So, a perfectly wonderful film.  You must go out and see it in the
theaters if it visits your area.  If it has already gone through your
area, or doesn't visit your area, you must check this film out on video
because it is one not to miss.  It is worth full ticket price.

Title
Review for Passenger 57 (1992)
95 min., R, Action, 1992
Director: Kevin Hooks
Cast: Wesley Snipes, Bruce Payne, Tom Sizemore, Bruce Greenwood,
      Elizabeth Hurley, Robert Hooks, Ernie Lively
     Bruce Payne is a British terrorist who is wanted for several plane
bombings.  The FBI catch Payne and transport him by plane to stand trial
in another state.  Payne, and a gang of his terrorists who have been
strategically placed on the plane, take over the plane and hold all the
passengers hostage.  Payne didn't count on passenger 57, Wesley Snipes,
who is one of the best terrorist annihilators in the business.
     PASSENGER 57 is the newest action film out, and will be battling
with Steven Segal's newest film UNDER SIEGE.  I feel that UNDER SIEGE is
better, but this film is definitely worth going to see.  I suggest this
film to fans of "shoot 'em up" action films.  Others will most likely
find this film a big waste of time and money.  I highly recommend
watching this film in the theaters, for it will be much more spectacular
there.  On a scale of zero to five, I give PASSENGER 57 a four.
PASSENGER 57 is rated R for explicit language and violence.
     PASSENGER 57 reminded me somewhat of the AIRPORT movies of the 70's
in which a plane full of people got involved in a tragedy.  That is
about as far as the similarity goes.  There are a few others, but to
disclose them could spoil the movie.  Bruce Payne gives the best
performance in the film.  He fits his role perfectly and is half the fun
of seeing the film.  Wesley Snipes, although he doesn't give the best
performance, is able to handle the film.  This not a dramatic film, so
great performances are not needed (look at Sylvester Stallone, Arnold
Schwarzenegger, and Steven Segal).  He can walk around with a gun in
this picture, and that is all he really needs to do.  Wesley Snipes can
do excellent performances, like in NEW JACK CITY, so I guess he decided
to take it easy in this film.
     The special effects for this film are very well done, and look real
good on the big screen.  The scenes involving the plane and the carnival
will most likely not look quite as good on a small television set, but
other than that, I think the rest of the movie will translate very well.
The film is well written and has all the standard action film equipment:
one very evil bad guy, one super-good good guy, one bimbo (for what ever
reason they are thrown in for), and several people who can die well.

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 3 (1992)
120 min., R, Comedy/Action, 1992
Director: Richard Donner
Cast: Danny Glover, Mel Gibson, Joe Pesci, Rene Russo, Stuart Wilson
     Danny Glover and Mel Gibson are back (unfortunately Glover's cat
and Gibson's dog aren't for some unexplained reason).  Glover is going
to be retiring soon, and doesn't want to mess anything up.  The two come
across a case that is being hidden by Internal Affairs.  They join with
Gibson's female equivalent, Russo, from Internal Affairs, to catch a cop
killer.
     LETHAL WEAPON 3, although it is not as good as LETHAL WEAPON or
LETHAL WEAPON 2, is fun to watch, although it has little substance.  I
recommend this film to fans of the LETHAL WEAPON series.  I don't think
that you will be disappointed.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
LETHAL WEAPON 3 a four.  LETHAL WEAPON 3 is rated R for explicit
language, adult situations, and violence.
     LETHAL WEAPON 3 will soon be coming to video, and most likely that
is the only way left to see it.  This is one of those films that will be
most spectacular on the big screen, so if you have a chance to see it
in the theater, it is worth it.  The story isn't as well written as in
the first two, but Gibson and Glover have enough charm to carry the film
with no problem.
     One thing that I didn't like very much was Pesci's annoying
character, which worked in the second film, but didn't work as well
here.  I think that the film is just using his current star power to
bring more people to see the film.  Not much was gained by his character
(although he did have some great moments) and somebody else probably
could have carried the role.
     The way this series is going, I don't think that there will be a
LETHAL WEAPON 4 (but they may surprise me).  There is a lot more drama
mixed in with the action, and a little less comedy.   There is a heavy
anti-gang message through the film.  The beginning title was creatively
done and I liked it.   Unfortunately, those who end up seeing the film
on video (when it comes out) will miss the full impact of it.
     One new addition to the film was Rene Russo, who acted off Mel
Gibson perfectly.  A lot of the comedy comes from this pair.   Glover's
retiring jokes began to get tiring by the end of the film and I think
that 1/3 of them should have been edited out of the film.  The Mel
Gibson and Danny Glover combination works out great.

Title
Review for Son in Law (1993)
1:36, Comedy, 1993
MPAA rating: PG-13 (explicit language, adult situations, adult
                    humor, violence)
Rating: five (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Steve Rash
Cast: Pauly Shore, Carla Gugino, Lane Smith, Cindy Pickett, Mason Adams,
      Dan Gauthier, Tiffani-Amber Thiessen, Dennis Burkley, Patrick Renna,
      Brenden Frasier
     Carla Gugino graduates from high school and instead of staying in
her small farming town, she goes to college in California.  There she
meets the residential advisor Pauly Shore, who is a city boy.  When
Gugino goes back home for Thanksgiving, she brings Shore with her, and
her parents (Lane Smith and Cindy Pickett) are less than thrilled.  Dan
Gauthier, Gugino's boyfriend from high school, proposes to Gugino.
Gugino isn't ready for anything like this so she makes up the story
that she is engaged to Shore.  She and Shore have to make it look like
they are engaged while her parents try to make it end.
     Forget JURASSIC PARK, CLIFFHANGER, THE FIRM and LAST ACTION HERO,
SON-IN-LAW is the film to see this summer.  SON-IN-LAW is a great
romantic comedy that should please the viewers, especially fans of the
Wiez.  When SON-IN-LAW is long gone and forgotten, the blockbuster
summer films will still be playing and you will have a chance to see
them then.  This film could also make great video fare for those that
are leery of spending seven dollars on it.  Nothing will be lost by
watching it on a television screen.
     Although the basic story line has been done many, many times
before, the film is still fun to watch.  The laughs are plentiful,
especially when the Wiez is around.  The way some of the jokes are done
are new, even though some of the jokes are old.  There are also several
new jokes that, at least, I haven't seen before.  Still, when presented
right, even old material can be funny still.  This film is just
basically a light comedy that is great to see if you are in the right
mood that doesn't contain much violence or any nudity that is
definitely worth full ticket price.
     The cast for this film does an excellent job.  Pauly Shore (ENCINO
MAN) is the star attraction of this film.  He is great, and knows how
to entertain the audience.  Pauly Shore just seems to take over the
entire screen when he is on with expressions and comments that are
hilarious.  This film would definitely not have been as good with
anyone else in this role.  Carla Gugino does a very good job as the
farm girl gone city girl.  She makes her character believable, on some
levels, yet interesting at the same time.  The person who played the
grandfather (Mason Adams, I believe) also does a great job.  The way he
delivered his lines kept me laughing throughout the time that he was on
the screen.  Patrick Renna, who played Gugino's little brother, was a
little annoying, but no where as near as Macaulay Culkin, and for only
part of the time, so I can forgive him.  Tiffani-Amber Thiessen (A
KILLER AMONG FRIENDS, "Saved by the Bell") does a reasonably good job
for the time that she is on screen.  She shows that she may have a
potential in movies if she can get out of the corny young adults
programming on television.  She wasn't given overly much to do in the
film, but what she had, she does a good job with.

Title
Review for Quiet Killer (1992) (TV)
100 min., not rated, Drama, 1992
Director: Sheldon Larry
Cast: Kate Jackson, Al Waxman, Jeffrey Nordling, Chip Zien,
      Barbara Williams, David Hewlett, Jerry Orbach, Howard Hesseman,
      Kathleen Robertson
     Kathleen Robertson comes down with what she thinks is just a cold.
She flies into New York City on a plane.  While on the flight she gets
really sick and when the plane lands Congressman Hesseman brings her to
her house.  Soon after, she dies.  A hospital does an autopsy on
Robertson's body.  Kate Jackson, a doctor at the hospital, finds out
that Robertson died of the pneumonic (bubonic) plague.  Jackson has to
try to stop the spread of the disease before it wipes out the population
of New York City.
     QUIET KILLER is a television film that aired on TV a few weeks ago.
I feel that it is a very good film, and worth mentioning.  It will
probably show up on repeats in a year to two years, or might show up on
video cassette.  I suggest that if you find this film, you see it.  I
give QUIET KILLER a four on a scale of zero to five.  Because this film
was made for television it doesn't contain anything objectionable.
     QUIET KILLER is based on the book THE BLACK DEATH by Gweneth
Cravens and John C. Marr, which I had never heard of before I saw this
film.  The way that the title of the film is done I think is creative.
Germ cells that are supposed to look like the pneumonic plague cells are
moving  inside the letters in the words of the title.  The acting in the
film, I feel, is quite good.
     The reason that I watched this film initially was because Howard
Hesseman starred in it.  I have been a fan of Howard since he did show
"WKRP in Cincinnati."  This is not Howard's best film.  I feel that his
best film was either the television film THE DIAMOND TRAP or POLICE
ACADEMY 2: THEIR FIRST ASSIGNMENT.  In this movie, like most of the
current films Howard has been in, he isn't on the screen very much.    I
really didn't expect this film to be very good because I felt, from the
write-ups on it, that it was going to be boring.  Instead it was a very
suspenseful film that is well written.  The plot doesn't let down at all
during the film which means the film never gets boring.  

Title
Review for Daughters of the Dust (1991)
     The film is about a tribe of African people who used to be slaves
and are now living on a series of islands off the coast of South
Carolina and Georgia.  They have their own culture and speak a mixture
of American and their native tongue.  Their islands are now threatened.
The basic plot behind the film covers one family leaving their island.
     This is going to be a relatively short review because I only
watched half an hour before I got completely bored with this film.
Because of the number of people on the network who disliked this film
compared with those who liked the film I didn't go to see it when it
played at the art theater in my area.   One week later it came on public
television, and I figured I would try it for free.  I found the film to
be incredibly boring, and I am glad that I didn't pay any money to see
the film.   Someone who is really interested in these people might like
this film; I don't know.  On a scale of zero to five I give this film a
zero.  DAUGHTERS OF THE DUST is not rated and doesn't contain anything
objectionable.
     The cinematography was beautiful, and so were the islands.   I
think that this was the best part of the film, and why I lasted half an
hour.  The actors/actresses also did a great job.  The fault lies in the
writing.  The dialogue was boring and the people spoke in a way that was
hard to understand, so it took a lot of concentration to follow the
dialog.
     I don't recommend this film unless you are interested in a
documentary type film on these people or if you will watch a film just
for the photography.  The photography probably looks better in a theater
on a large screen than on a television screen, so if that is your reason
for seeing the film I suggest that you see it in the theater.  If you do
decide to go see DAUGHTERS OF THE DUST, I suggest matinee prices if
available.

Title
Review for Madonna: Truth or Dare (1991)
     When MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE was in the theaters I didn't see any
reviews for it posted, so when I saw it on video I decided that I should
write a review for it.  The film is a documentary about what life is
like for Madonna, backstage on tour.  It covers her Blond Ambition tour
and contains concert footage stuck in between stops on the tour.
     MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE is rated R for explicit language, adult
situations, and female nudity.  I give the film a four on a zero to five
scale.  The film is very well done and is worth checking out from your
local video store.
     When Madonna was on the Blond Ambition Tour in 1990 she taped
everything that happened in her life.  When it was over, the tapes were
looked at and the highlights were put together for the film.  Parts of
the tour that are included in the film are what the dressing rooms were
like just before performance time, and how her dancers got along with
each other.
     This film was quite well done and edited together very well.  The
concert footage was done in color, the part that Madonna taped was done
in grainy black & white, and the rest of the film was shot in black &
white.  The way this all looks when it is put together is surprisingly
well.
     The ads for MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE, when the movie was in the
theaters and just before it came on to video, made the film look like it
was all sexually oriented.  The film has very few sexual spots in it.
     MADONNA: TRUTH OR DARE is interesting to watch and I highly
recommend it to anyone interested in Madonna, or in what it is like for
a performer on tour.  It covers many of the problems that might occur
when an artist is on tour; sudden illness, loss of voice, police
problems, fights between her dancers, etc.

Title
Review for HouseSitter (1992)
105 min., PG, Comedy, 1992
Director: Frank Oz
Cast: Steve Martin, Goldie Hawn, Dana Delany, Peter MacNichol,
      Robert B. Shull, Laurel Cronin, Julie Harris, Donald Moffat
     Steve Martin first meets Goldie Hawn at a party and then later
waitressing at a restaurant.  He gets invited into her house and tells
her about a house he owns that is empty.  The next day, unknown to
Martin, Hawn moves into the empty house.  She starts making up stories
about her and Martin to explain why she is there.  Martin is in love
with Dana Delany, who is in the town that the house is located in.
Martin finds out what Hawn has done and tries to use her to get Delany.
     I saw HOUSESITTER the weekend that it opened and am just getting
around to finishing my review on it.  HOUSESITTER is a very funny film
and is well worth seeing.  I don't know whether to recommend that you
see it in the theater or wait for the video.  The film will lose nothing
on video, but if you can't wait to see it you would be better off going
to the theater to see it.  I give HOUSESITTER a four on a scale of zero
to five.   HOUSESITTER is rated PG for adult situations and explicit
language.
     HOUSESITTER is the first of two films coming out this summer with
Goldie Hawn, the second is DEATH BECOMES HER.  I have always been a fan
of Goldie Hawn's films and sometimes of Steve Martin's, so I hurried out
to see this one.  Both Goldie Hawn and Steve Martin did a great job
acting.  They were both funny, but not in an obnoxious sort of way, like
Steve Martin sometimes is.  Dana Delany does a great job in her
supporting role and adds a lot to the film.  The two bums, Robert B.
Shull and Laurel Cronin, I think, were excellent.  Peter MacNichol's
character was, in my opinion, a very annoying character, but then again
that is all MacNichol seems to play.  Steve Martin's father, I don't
know who played him, was excellent  and very convincing.  The jokes in
this film were, for the most part, hidden under the surface and just sat
there allowing you to laugh if you caught it and if you missed it there
is another waiting just around the turn of the film reel instead of
forcing you to laugh like slapstick comedies do.
     The film is well written and doesn't have many holes in it.  It
definitely keeps you entertained.  The characters are interesting and
well molded.  They seem to come alive on the screen and do their own
things.  The sets and locations are great.  The town where the house is
located looks like any little town and is simple in its ways.  The house
itself I don't think was well designed, however, at least I wouldn't
want to live in it (maybe it's just me).

Title
Review for Chjin densetsu Urotsukidji (1989)
1:45, Animated/Action/Science Fiction, 1989, available in English
& Japanese versions
MPAA rating: NC-17 (adult situations, female nudity (drawn),      
                    explicit language, rape, graphic violence)
Rating: four (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Hideki Takayama
Voices of: Christopher Courage, Rebel Joy, Danny Bush, Lucy Morales,
           Rose Palmer, Randy Woodcock, Bick Balse, Jurgen Offen
     A god is born to the human world every 3,000 years that will bring
peace to three worlds; the world of the humans, the world of the
demons, and the world of the half-beasts.  This god is called the
Overfiend, and his time has come.  Beings from the half-beast world
have been waiting for the arrival of the Overfiend, so they can protect
him.  Beings from the demon world have also been waiting for the
Overfiend's coming so they can destroy him.  Now the two start a battle
to see if the Overfiend survives or not.  The humans, though, have no
knowledge of what is about to happen.
     UROTSUKIDOJI: LEGEND OF THE OVERFIEND is definitely worth a
rental, even if just to see what this film is all about.  UROTSUKIDOJI
is available on Anime 18 videocassette and may now be available at a
video store near you.  The version that I saw is the English language
version.  The voices listed are those of the English language version,
I assume that the Japanese version has different voice talents.  The
video cassette also mentions the conclusion to the film, UROTSUKIDOJI
2: LEGEND OF THE DEMON WOMB coming soon.  This film is Japanese
animation at it's best, but a word of warning, like the videocassette
box states in big lettering, this film is not for children.
     The animation for this film is extremely well done, much better
than what most U.S. studios are putting out.  It is animated so that it
looks quite realistic, down to putting "sunlight" on the "camera
lens".  These small details make the film more enjoyable to watch.
     The story, if nothing else, is certainly an interesting one.  I
don't think I have ever seen anything like this film before.  I found
the story to be a gripping one, filled with surprise twists and
pleasing ideas.  The film does run about fifteen minutes too long for
the material it has.  The characters don't get developed really well,
but that doesn't hurt the film too much.

Title
Review for Cool World (1992)
100 min., PG-13, Animated/Comedy, 1992
Director: Ralph Bakshi
Cast: Kim Basinger, Gabriel Byrne, Brad Pitt
     Brad Pitt is on a motorcycle with his mom when a drunk driver hits
the bike.  Pitt's mother is killed but Pitt survives.   A cartoon
scientist brings Pitt to Cool World, a world of cartoons (where cartoons
are called Doodles and humans are called Noids).  Several years later
Doodle Holli Would (Kim Basinger) wants to get to the Real World
(Earth).  She brings cartoonist Gabriel Byrne to Cool World to get him
to make love to her.  If Byrne makes love to her, she will be able to go
to the Real World.  Pitt, now a Cool World police officer, tries to make
sure that Byrne doesn't make love to Basinger.
     I found COOL WORLD to be an excellent cartoon and much better than
any of the other films by Ralph Bakshi that I have seen (HEY GOOD
LOOKIN', STREETFIGHT (originally titled COONSKIN), and I think LORD OF
THE RINGS).  I fully recommend this film to anybody who has a bizarre or
twisted taste in films.  This film is, like actor Brad Pitt described it
in an interview, "Roger Rabbit on acid."  I give COOL WORLD a five on a
scale of zero to five.  COOL WORLD is rated PG-13 for adult situations,
adult humor, and explicit language.  No, this is not a nice little
animated film to bring your small children to.   Because of some of the
scenes, this film is also not one to go to if you are easily grossed
out.  I will not go into details but some of them are really funny (esp.
in the cop chase).
     The animation in this film is in the traditional Bakshi style,
crude but good, which is part of the reason that I tend to enjoy his
films.  His animation has a style of its own, which some people don't
seem to like.  Cool World is interestingly designed with its twisting
buildings that go up above the clouds and twisting roads that go all
over the place.  I feel that Cool World was well designed as a cartoon
world, especially with all the cartoons on the streets bringing sadistic
harm to other cartoons.  Maybe one cartoon is chasing another with an
axe or a safe falls on a doodle, etc.  This is an obvious jab at modern
cartoons that are aired on the television.
     The way that the sets for the live action were designed were
creative.  The sets, in Cool World only, were made to look like a
cartoon, with only two dimensions.  When the camera went sideways on a
set, it looked like a piece of paper, flat.  I also enjoyed how the live
characters interacted with the cartoons, yes I know it has been done
many times before but I still enjoy it.
     Unfortunately I have to agree with Rick J. Rauser (r.a.m.r. #01431)
that COOL WORLD will have a short stay in the theaters.  I don't think
that for the most part people are still enjoying films like this.  Most
people, I feel would rather go and see a film like BATMAN RETURNS.  I
recommend that if you are planning to see this film that you see it soon
before it leaves the theaters because it really is worth seeing.  I
recommend seeing this film in a theater because there is always so much
going on on the screen that some of the movie will be lost on a
television screen.
     The actors do a great job with their roles.  Kim Basinger does a
great job as Holli Would, a sultry but egocentric person (Jessica Rabbit
comes to mind).  She just has a way of making the character come to
life.  Brad Pitt is good as the cop who really wants to be a Doodle.
Gabriel Byrne also puts in a good performance as the cartoonist who
becomes obsessed with making love to his creation, Holli Would.  The
wide number of Doodles are great, some nice, some evil; most with a
comic twist to them that enlivens them.  I also love the sentence on the
top of the posters for the film "Holli Would if she could."

Title
Review for Buffy the Vampire Slayer (1992)
     Donald Sutherland goes to high school cheerleader Kristy Swanson
and tries to convince her that she is the chosen one to fight vampire
Rutger Hauer and his assistant Paul Reubens.  After he convinces her
that she is the chosen one he tries to teach her in the ways of vampire
slaying.
     If you are in the mood for a serious film or a horror film, BUFFY
THE VAMPIRE SLAYER is not for you.  BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER is mainly a
teenager/college student comedy film.  Most adults, unless you are stuck
in the Peter Pan Syndrome, will find this film a waste of time, and
money.  I highly recommend this film to high school and college
students, but not to adults.  If you are a Peter Pan adult, I suggest
matinee prices only.  On a scale of zero to five, I give BUFFY THE
VAMPIRE SLAYER a four.   BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER is rated PG-13 for
adult situations, explicit language, violence, and adult humor.
     I have always thought that Luke Perry, "Beverly Hills, 90210," had
no acting ability, and after seeing this film I have seen nothing to
change my mind.  The only reason that I can see that he was put in this
film was to attract teenage girls so they can "oh" and "ah" him when he
is on the screen.  Thankfully his part is well-written and he isn't a
key actor in this film.
     Paul Reubens, the famous Pee-Wee Herman (who I don't think will
ever work as Pee-Wee again), shows signs of becoming a real actor.  I
have never been a fan of Pee-Wee Herman and I hated Pee-Wee's Playhouse.
I also extremely disliked his acting in Cheech and Chong's NICE DREAMS.
He looks and sounds nothing like Pee-Wee, and thankfully, acts nothing
like him.  If he keeps it up he might have a future in films!
     Kristy Swanson does a good job as Buffy, and I think that she is
the cutest vampire basher you will ever see.  She does an exceptional
job in the beginning of the film as the "I'm better than everybody else
cheerleader."  Donald Sutherland, I think, has one of the best
characters in his career.  Usually I am not taken with his characters,
like the college professor in NATIONAL LAMPOON'S ANIMAL HOUSE, but I
liked his character in this film.   There isn't much to say about Rutger
Hauer.  He is not on for much time at all and never really got any
character development.  The film could have spent a little longer on
him.
     The film was well written, and towards the end Paul Reubens has one
of the best scenes in the film.  The film was not scary.   I will assume
that it was not meant to be.  If it was, they messed up.  Who ever wrote
the part for the principal must have just come out of high school.  His
"Don't look at me as administration, look at me as a party animal"
speech is very typical, at least in my high school, of those in power.
I wish that the film had been longer.  Just about the time I really
started to get into it, the film was starting to wind down.
     One last note, you should stay through the beginning of the end
credits because they contain a few funny scenes.

Title
Review for FernGully: The Last Rainforest (1992)
75 min., G, Animated/Fantasy, 1992
Director: Bill Kroyer
Voices of: Tim Curry, Robin Williams, Christian Slater,
           Samantha Mathis, Richard "Cheech" Marin, Tommy Chong,
           Tone-Loc
     In Fern Gully fairies fly around helping the plants grow.  One
fairy (voice of Samantha Mathis) gets curious about humans.  She learns
from Batty, a bat, (voice of Robin Williams) that there are humans
nearby.  She goes to see what they are like and, by mistake, ends up
shrinking one.  She brings him back to Fern Gully so his size can be
fixed.  Another fairy (voice of Christian Slater) gets jealous of the
human getting all of Mathis's affections.  The fairies find out from the
human that other humans are going to be cutting down Fern Gully.  They
find out that evil Hexxus (voice of Tim Curry) is behind the cutting
down of Fern Gully and try to stop Curry.
     FERN GULLY...THE LAST RAINFOREST is a very good film with
*important* messages behind it.  One message is that our forests are
important and should be protected.  The other message is that testings
on animals in labs is bad for the animals and shouldn't be done.  I
highly suggest that you go see this film, and if you have children you
can bring them along too.  They may miss the messages, but will enjoy
the animation and the story.  I give FERN GULLY...THE LAST RAINFOREST a
five on a scale of zero to five.  FERN GULLY is rated G which means it
contains nothing objectionable.
     The animation is well done.  It is not nearly as good as what the
Disney studios do, but I liked it better than what the Don Bluth studios
do.  Fern Gully is really colorful and looks like a very nice place.
The land of the humans and the forest that has been leveled looked very
dreary and sad.  The tree-cutting machines, although they look quite
comical, are drawn looking sinister with dark tinted colors.
     The voice talent is from a good set of known actors/actresses.  Tim
Curry (THE ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW) plays the evil monster of smog,
smoke, etc., that is out to level Fern Gully.  Tim Curry seems to be on
a roll with voices recently.  He was a voice on the premiere of the
television show "Capitol Critters", which I think is now extinct, the
premiere of the television show "Fish Police", which I also think is
extinct now, and an episode of "Dinosaurs".  Robin Williams (HOOK) does
the comical bat who has been used for too many human lab experiments.
Christian Slater (PUMP UP THE VOLUME) is a macho, but jealous, fairy.
Samantha Mathis (PUMP UP THE VOLUME) is the fairy of Slater's interests.
Tone-Loc (THE ADVENTURES OF FORD FAIRLANE and a rapper) does the lizard
that shows up early in the film.  Richard "Cheech" Marin and Tommy Chong
(a.k.a. the drug comedy team Cheech & Chong) do a drugless routine as
Stump and Roots.
     The music is okay, but not as good as the recent BEAUTY AND THE
BEAST and THE LITTLE MERMAID.  It does have a rock beat to it.  At least
the people who do the singing can sing (don't laugh, I have seen some
musicals in which no one in the cast can sing).  The movie is rather
short (only an hour and a quarter in length), which is too bad because I
really enjoyed the movie and wish that it had lasted longer.

Title
Review for Highway to Hell (1991)
90 min., R, Comedy/Science Fiction, 1992
Director: Ate De Jong
Cast: Patrick Bergin, Adam Storke, Chad Lowe, Kristy Swanson,     
      Pamela Gidley, Jarrett Lennon, C.J. Graham, Richard Farnsworth,
      Gilbert Gottfried, Lita Ford, Anne Meara, Amy Stiller,
      Ben Stiller, Jerry Stiller
     Chad Lowe and his girlfriend Kristy Swanson are going to Las Vegas
to get married.  Along the way, they leave the highway and start to
travel on a small side road.  They are warned by a gas station owner
about a section of the road, and not to stop along it.  Both Lowe and
Swanson fall asleep on that chunk of the road and get stopped by cop
C. J. Graham, Hell-Cop.  Graham travels that section of road, and brings
pretty young virgin girls to Hell.  Graham kidnaps Swanson and brings
her to Hell.  Lowe goes to Hell and has to get Swanson away from Graham
before Graham gets Swanson to Hell City.
     HIGHWAY TO HELL is a combination of the MAD MAX films and BILL AND
TED'S BOGUS JOURNEY (although the way Hell looks is different).  The
similarities to the MAD MAX films are the frequent car chases with
unusual vehicles, abnormal weapons, unusual gangs and people, and both
films take place in deserts.  The similarity to BILL AND TED'S BOGUS
JOURNEY is the type of humor used in the film, especially by Gilbert
Gottfried (ALADDIN, THE ADVENTURES OF FORD FAIRLANE) and Ben Stiller
("The Ben Stiller Show").  Ben Stiller is not on screen for very much of
the film, unfortunately, and Gilbert Gottfried is on for even less than
Stiller.  Both Gottfried and Stiller are great, although people who tend
to find Gilbert Gottfried annoying will hate his character.
     I found HIGHWAY TO HELL to be a great B movie.  The movie is fun to
watch and the story is interesting.  Chad Lowe (APPRENTICE TO MURDER, AN
INCONVENIENT WOMAN) gives a good performance.  Kristy Swanson (BUFFY
THE VAMPIRE SLAYER, MANNEQUIN ON THE MOVE) really makes this film.
Patrick Bergin (SLEEPING WITH THE ENEMY, ROBIN HOOD [1991 TV film]) is
excellent.  He also is a great asset to this film.  Adam Storke (MYSTIC
PIZZA, THE PHANTOM OF THE OPERA [1989 TV film]) gives the worst
performance in the film, but part of that is the way his character was
written.  I wish that they had cast someone else for his role.  He
didn't seem to be with the film, he seemed to have something else on his
mind when he was doing his scenes.  Pamela Gidley (THRASHIN', "Angel
Street") is completely wasted in this film.  Her performance is wooden.
     I think that HIGHWAY TO HELL is definitely worth renting from your
video store, if you like B movies.  If you tend to hate B movies, then
you will probably find this film to be a complete waste of time.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give HIGHWAY TO HELL a four.  HIGHWAY TO HELL
is rated R for explicit language, adult situations, violence, and female
nudity.

Title
Review for Hard To Die (1990)
1:17, Horror, 1993
MPAA rating: none (female nudity, explicit language, adult        
                   situations, violence)
Rating: zero (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Jim Wynorski
Cast: Robyn Harris, Lindsay Taylor, Debra Dane, Melissa Moore,    
      Bridget Carney, Orville Ketchum, Karen Chorak, Jurgen Baum, 
      Bob Sheridan, Carolet Girard, Forrest J. Ackerman
     Five girls spend a day in a closed building doing inventory when a
strange box gets delivered there (is this starting to sound familiar?)
by mistake.  The girls accidentlly open the box (big surprise, huh!)
and release an evil spirit of a killer that kills the girls off one by
one (betcha didn't see that one coming!).
     HARD TO DIE, I found out while watching the film, is a sequel to
SORORITY HOUSE MASSACRE 2: NIGHTIE NIGHTMARE (r.a.m.r.# 1521).  Two of
the actresses from SORORITY HOUSE MASSACRE 2 are in this film, Robyn
Harris and Melissa Moore, but they play different characters here.
Orville Ketchum is also back as (get ready for this) Orville Ketchum
(yes, the same character from number two).  Yes, he is also built like
a tank in this film too.  I'm telling you, a nuclear bomb detonated
next to this man wouldn't harm him at all!  The before mentioned three
were the only actors from part two that I thought could act, well they
seemed to have lost that ability.  Thankfully, for my sanity, I also
saw the film WARLOCK, which undid all the ill effects that I got from
this film.
     The story for this film is completely ridiculous and has many
elements from many cheapo low budget horror flicks.  Any good moments
that this film fails to make are even more destroyed by the story
line.  The film is so pathetically predictable that every moment has
already been figured out, analyzed, and discarded before it happens.
There is no point in this film that any suspense is ever afoot.  While
we are on the subject of the story, the story also provides every
chance it can to disrobe an actress.  The film goes to the extent of
putting a shower in the manager's office.  I'm sorry folks but this is
completely unnecessary, ridiculous, and hurts the story more (if that
is still possible).
     The script for this film is completely pathetic.  The lines the
actresses come out with are completely horrible.  The only thing that I
think could have happened is that the actors made up the script as they
went along.  Here is an example of the wonderful dialog.  The scene is
two girls have just entered a gun store and have picked out a *really*
big gun.  The line is "My dad used to be a Marine, I bet I can work
it."  This line has got to be a contender for the bad line hall of
infamy.  Now, we fast forward for a few minutes until just after a big
plan (?!!?) has been presented.  One comment from an actress is "Not a
lot of strategy involved, but I like it."  I'm afraid folks that this
is about as good as they get.
     Now lets talk about the great special effects for this film.  This
obviously wasn't a big concern of the film makers.  The killing scenes
are so obviously faked that they go to the point of threatening the
viewer's intelligence.  A girl gets hacked with a knife and enough
blood comes out to do one FRIDAY THE 13TH movie.  Are we trying to see
how unrealistic we can get?  The continuity department was obviously
asleep (along with the viewers) when watching this film.  In one shot,
actress has cloths on, camera angle changes, actress seems to have lost
clothing.  Very impressive trick!
     The one (half?) plus that this film has going for it, is that in
many places it is unintentionally hilarious.  The incompetence behind
the film makes it incredibly funny, and so the viewer can get some
enjoyment (?!!?) from the film.  However, this doesn't make it worth
the rental fee of over a penny.  In the acting department, the only
thing I can say is two thumbs squared and one head down.  I would
normally do a detailed paragraph on this topic, but there is no point
here because there is nobody that I was impressed with in the least.
Oh well, win some, lose some.

Title
Review for Waxwork II: Lost in Time (1992)
     I was just going to review the new film WAXWORK 2: LOST IN TIME,
but I figured while I was at it I might as well write one for WAXWORK as
well, so here goes...
     Deborah Foreman and Michelle Johnson get invited to the premiere
opening of a wax museum run by David Warner.  Warner tells them that the
showing is at midnight and they can bring four friends with them.
Johnson and Foreman invite four friends but two chicken out.  The two
remaining are Zach Galligan and Dana Ashbrook.  Galligan and Foreman
leave after they find out that Ashbrook and Johnson had left the wax
museum, but the next morning Galligan and Foreman find out that Ashbrook
and Johnson never got home.  Galligan suspects that they never left the
waxwork and finds out that Warner is trying to bring hell to Earth.
     WAXWORK is an excellent horror film with a neat new idea (at least
I haven't seen it before).  I highly recommend that you see this film;
it is definitely worth a rental.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
WAXWORK a four.  WAXWORK is not rated but contains explicit language,
violence, and adult situations.   There is also an R rated version of
WAXWORK out, but the only version I have been able to see, or find for
that matter, is the unrated uncensored version.  There is nothing really
bad in the uncensored version so I would recommend that you watch that
one for it will contain more than the R rated version, at least that is
what I would assume.
     The part that I like the most about WAXWORK is how it combines old
horror films with this new one.  I like the idea of when a person walks
into an exhibit they get transported into a world where that exhibit is
going on.  It is also interesting that some of the worlds, like the
NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD exhibit, are in black and white, like in the
original version.
     The sets are very well done, and look like the films that they are
pretending to be.  The script is very well written and the acting is
great.  Most of the people in this film end up with cameos because they
are only in one waxwork exhibit.
                          WAXWORK 2: LOST IN TIME
104 min., R, Horror/Science Fiction/Comedy, 1991
Director: Anthony Hickox
Cast: Zach Galligan, Monika Schnarre, Martin Kemp, Bruce Campbell,
      Michael Des Barres, Jim Metzler, Sophie Ward, Marina Sirtis,
      Billy Kane, Joe Baker, Juliet Mills, John Ireland,
      Patrick Macnee, David Carradine, Alexander Godunov,
      Kate Murtagh, Drew Barrymore
The opening paragraph contains spoilers for WAXWORK.
     This sequel to WAXWORK starts off right where WAXWORK left off with
Zach Galligan and Monika Schnarre (played in WAXWORK by Deborah Foreman)
leaving the burning waxwork.  Schnarre is put on trial for the murder of
her father, which was really done by a zombie hand that escaped from the
waxwork.  Galligan finds a time key, that allows you to travel forward
or backwards in time, and they try to travel back in time to try to
prove that such thing as a zombie hand could exist.
     WAXWORK 2 is, I feel, just as good as WAXWORK and a true sequel.
Unlike the first film, the idea for this one is a bit recycled, the last
time I remember this idea being used was in BILL AND TED'S EXCELLENT
ADVENTURE, but it is still fun to watch.   Before watching this film, I
suggest you should watch, or re- watch, WAXWORK because it is important
to remember what happened in the first film.  In fact, the ending scenes
of WAXWORK are the opening scenes for this one to remind you what
happened at the end.  On a scale of zero to five, I give WAXWORK 2 a
four.   WAXWORK 2 is rated R for explicit language, adult situations,
and violence.
     WAXWORK was, what I thought, a film that would be impossible to
make a true sequel to.  I consider a true sequel to be a film that
continues a story.  Like SHOCK TREATMENT was not a true sequel to THE
ROCKY HORROR PICTURE SHOW but POLICE ACADEMY 2: THEIR FIRST ASSIGNMENT
was a true sequel to POLICE ACADEMY.   WAXWORK 2 is a true sequel, and I
feel that it is just as good as the original film (something that is
very rare).  I hope that there will be no more WAXWORK films because I
don't think they could make another good one, but I may be wrong.
     It took me a while to rent WAXWORK 2 because my local video store
was out every time I went in.  I am glad that I finally got to see it
for I definitely think it is worth watching.  Unlike WAXWORK this film
is partially a spoof of horror films.  The climatic sword fight through
monster films is priceless, and I feel it is worth watching the film for
that if nothing else.
     The film was very well written and well acted.  Many of the actors
have cameos because they are in one scenario and not in others, but they
all do a good job.  The cinematography was great.  I especially liked
the parts where, when the people went into old films, the picture became
black and white.  The sets were very well done and all together the film
is technically above most horror films today.

Title
Review for Pussbucket (1991)
105 min., not yet rated, Horror/Musical, 1991, Black & White
Director: Lisa Houle
Cast: Terrence Fleming, Eric Hammer, Brian Sullivan, Gina Cammarota,
      Madeline Virbasius, Walter Prince, Ultra Lavish, Evelyn Rosa,
      Onyx Coale, Dion, Steve Green, Steven Deal
     Two religious maniacs, Judas (played by Terrence Fleming) and
Corned Beef (played by Eric Hammer), are visited by two aliens, Madeline
Virbasius and Dion.  Virbasius, dressed as the Virgin Mary, tells the
two to kill people for Jesus and to drain the puss from their heads and
bring it back to them.  Fleming and Hammer set out to bring "the Virgin
Mary" back as much puss back as possible in a bucket (hence the title).
     I was lucky enough to see an advance showing of this film from
somebody who was involved in its production.  PUSSBUCKET is based on the
Broadway musical and is done by Blessed Elysium Productions.  It is
going to be distributed by Film Threat Video, and I don't know when it
will be made available.  PUSSBUCKET, which is currently not rated, I
expect will end up with an R rating.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
PUSSBUCKET a three (with reservations).  PUSSBUCKET contains explicit
language, adult situations, and violence (it actually contains one scene
of graphic violence with a prosthetic breast, but it is so obviously
fake, it don't count it).
     PUSSBUCKET is an interesting grade Z film.  It is shot in grainy
black and white and is obviously an amateur production with a *very* low
budget.  I think the biggest problems with the film are: it is
amateurishly filmed with a lot of jerky motions; a lot of close-ups that
end up going too close; and the film is about half an hour too long.
Other than that PUSSBUCKET is an interesting film that will reward the
patient viewer with some wonderful moments.
     Two parts of the film that were particularly good was the
television evangelist, Steve Green, with his 1-900-DIAL GOD number, and
the news anchor man, Steven Deal.  The songs in the film, what few there
are, are great.  Unfortunately it doesn't look like all the  songs from
the Broadway show made it into this film (I haven't seen the Broadway
show, but I only remember three songs from the film, and I am sure the
Broadway musical contained more than that).
     Unfortunately for the film, some of the scenes are so badly
photographed and the sound is so poor that it is unclear what is going
on and that drags the film down.  I don't recommend this film for
everybody, but only those with an open mind and a taste for the bizarre.
I don't know what the release availability of this film is going to be.
If it comes to your video store for a cheap enough rate, you might be
interested in trying it.

Title
Review for Beauty and the Beast (1991)
85 min., G, Musical/Fantasy, 1991
Directors: Gary Trousdale, Kirk Wise
Voices of: Paige O'Hara, Robby Benson, Richard White, Jerry Orbach,
           David Ogden Stiers, Angela Lansbury
     A prince gets a curse put on him that turns him into a beast (voice
of Robby Benson).  If, by the time an enchanted rose flower dies, he
hasn't fallen in love with a girl, and she in love with him, he will
stay a beast forever.  If he falls in love and a girl falls in love with
him he gets to become a prince again.  Belle (voice of Paige O'Hara)
gets forced to stay in the Beast's castle and the two start to fall in
love with each other.
     BEAUTY AND THE BEAST is a *very* good film, and, if you haven't
gone to see it yet, I highly suggest you go out to see it.  The
animation is perfect, much better, I think, than in the Don Bluth films.
When I was watching this film I sometimes forgot that I was watching an
animated film.  It has been quite a while since I have seen a full
animated film this good.  I almost had decided to wait for this film to
show up on video but I decided to go see it in the theaters.  I am
really glad that I did because if the Disney Studios are smart they
won't release this film on video and keep releasing it only in the
theaters.   The last full animated film that I liked this much was
FANTASIA last April in the theaters.  The songs are wonderful.  They
were written by Alan Menken and the late Howard Ashman (whom this film
was dedicated to in the end), who have also done THE LITTLE MERMAID and
LITTLE SHOP OF HORRORS.
     I found that for the most part BEAUTY AND THE BEAST was much better
than THE LITTLE MERMAID.  I found that the story is much better for
BEAUTY.  THE LITTLE MERMAID was a bit too perfect for me.  For some
reason I seem to like BEAUTY's songs more, I don't know why.  The
animation though was just as good, I feel, as in THE LITTLE MERMAID.
     The voices I feel were well cast.  Robby Benson has a gruff yet
caring voice that was perfect for the beast.  Paige O'Hara, I feel, had
a voice sweet enough to be the beautiful Belle.   Richard White did the
boasting Gaston who wants to marry Belle at any cost.  Angela Lansbury,
Jerry Orbach, and David Ogden Stiers were among the talented voices that
did the enchanted furniture in the Beast's castle.  Angela was
Mrs. Potts, Jerry was Lumiere, and David was Cogsworth.
     Speaking of the voices, the characters themselves were wonderfully
done: Cogsworth as the enchanted clock that was always worrying if what
he was doing might anger The Beast; Lumiere as the little candelabra who
doesn't worry about what he is doing as long as he thinks that he is
doing right; Mrs. Potts as the caring and nurturing teapot who cares
about Belle and wants to make sure that she is happy at the Beast's
castle; Chip as the little chipped tea cup that is always wondering what
is going on; Belle the beautiful girl who despises Gaston and starts to
fall in love with the Beast; Gaston as the boasting man who believes
that every woman wants him and refuses to accept the fact that Belle
doesn't; the Beast who gets very angry easily and feels that he will end
up being a beast for the rest of his life; Belle's eccentric inventor
father who everybody laughs at; and the buffoon who is always hanging
around Gaston.
     BEAUTY AND THE BEAST is perfect family fare, and I highly recommend
it to anyone to go see.  I give BEAUTY AND THE BEAST a five on a scale
of zero to five.  BEAUTY AND THE BEAST is rated G which means it
contains nothing objectionable.

Title
Review for Lawnmower Man, The (1992)
144 min., R, Science Fiction/Horror, 1992
Director: Brett Leonard
Cast: Jeff Fahey, Pierce Bronsnan, Jenny Wright, Geoffrey Lewis
     Pierce Bronsnan is a scientist who is working on Virtual Reality,
which is a simulator that opens you up to a computerized dimension.  He
has been using monkeys for these experiments, but now he wants to use a
human to see what the effect would be.  Mentally retarded Jeff Fahey is
Bronsnan's lawnmower man.  Fahey loves to play with Bronsnan's computer
simulators.  Bronsnan starts using Fahey for his experiments, without
telling him what he is doing, and with disastrous results.
     THE LAWNMOWER MAN is a combination of science fiction and horror,
mostly the science fiction though.  It uses the new technology of
Virtual Reality, which I don't know too much about.  It has some
wonderful computer animation (I'll get back to this later), good special
effects, and a good plot.  On a scale of zero to five, I give THE
LAWNMOWER MAN a four.  THE LAWNMOWER MAN is rated R for explicit
language, violence, adult situations, and brief female nudity.
     THE LAWNMOWER MAN is one of two Stephen King films coming to the
theaters in the next few months.  The other film of his is called
SLEEPWALKERS (Columbia Pictures) and is scheduled to be released on
April 10.  THE LAWNMOWER MAN has been released by New Line Cinema and is
"based" on a short story by Stephen King.  A small hint of Stephen
King's short story shows up towards the end of the film, but other than
that, THE LAWNMOWER MAN has nothing to do with Stephen King's short
story.  In fact, Stephen King's short story has nothing to do with
Virtual Reality at all.
     The Virtual Reality segments are done with computer graphics and
are very well done.  The way that the colors and the shapes all blend
together makes THE LAWNMOWER MAN seem different than most other horror
movies.  The Virtual Reality segments make the film almost an art film,
for the Virtual Reality takes up most of the film.  If all that you are
interested in is the Virtual Reality segments, it might make it more
worth your money to go see a matinee.  This film definitely won't hold
up very well on video.
     The one thing that really upsets me about THE LAWNMOWER MAN is that
both the advertisements for the film, and the film itself, state right
on the title "Stephen King's The Lawnmower Man."  Yet barely any of the
film is actually "Stephen King's The Lawnmower Man"; most of it is just
"The Lawnmower Man."  I get upset when a film states that it is taken
from a certain person's work and isn't, like "Edgar Allan Poe's THE PIT
AND THE PENDULUM."  Some Stephen King films have been direct
translations of the novel, like IT and CARRIE.  Others like THE
LAWNMOWER MAN and THE RUNNING MAN have very little to do with the novel.
I feel such movies should say "Inspired by the Stephen King short story
THE LAWNMOWER MAN" or something like that.

Title
Review for Bed & Breakfast (1992/I)
104 min., PG-13, Comedy, 1992
Director: Robert Ellis Miller
Cast: Roger Moore, Talia Shire, Colleen Dewhurst, Nina Siemaszko,
      Ford Rainey, Jamie Walters, Stephen Root
     Talia Shire runs a Bed and Breakfast with her daughter Nina
Siemaszko and her mother-in-law Colleen Dewhurst.  One day Siemaszko
finds Roger Moore washed up on the beach outside of their house.  They
take him in and find out that he has amnesia.  Dewhurst makes him the
handyman for the Bed and Breakfast.
     BED AND BREAKFAST was filmed in York Beach, Maine in either 1989 or
1990, I believe.  Since I live just down the seacoast from there and
remember reading and hearing a lot about the filming, when it came to
the local theaters I had to go and see it.  I enjoyed this film and
highly recommend that you attempt to see it.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give BED AND BREAKFAST a four.  BED AND BREAKFAST is rated PG-13
for explicit language and adult situations.
     This film was not what I was expecting.  I was expecting through
what I had seen in the local papers some sort of drama about New England
life.  I was pleased that instead, the film was a good natured comedy.
BED AND BREAKFAST has now been released on video cassette, so it
shouldn't be too hard to find.
     I found this film very enjoyable to just sit back and watch.  The
film has a great cast.  Roger Moore (THE NAKED FACE, LIVE AND LET DIE)
is great as the stranger.  Talia Shire (THE GODFATHER, COLD HEAVEN) is
wonderful as the mother who is trying to keep Nina Siemaszko going
straight.  Colleen Dewhurst (THE BOY WHO COULD FLY) is exceptionally
great as Talia Shire's mother.  I think that Colleen Dewhurst was the
best out of the entire cast.  Nina Siemaszko (WILD ORCHID 2: TWO SHADES
OF BLUE) is very good as Talia Shire's daughter.  For the teenage girls
there is Jamie Walters ("The Heights"), who does what he does best,
looks cute for the girls.  This film is very well written and is
beautifully photographed.  The director, Robert Ellis Miller, does a
great job, getting excellent shots to go with the film.

Title
Review for Twin Peaks: Fire Walk with Me (1992)
134 min., R, Drama, 1992
Director: David Lynch
Cast: Sheryl Lee, Ray Wise, Madchen Amick, Dana Ashbrook,
      Phoebe Augustine, David Bowie, Eric DaRe, Miguel Ferrer,
      Pamela Gidley, Heather Graham, Chris Isaak, Moira Kelly,
      Peggy Lipton, David Lynch, James Marshall, Jurgen Prochnow,
      Harry Dean Stanton, Kiefer Sutherland, Lenny Von Dohlen,
      Grace Zabriskie, Kyle MacLachlan, Michael Anderson
     Most of this movie centers around Sheryl Lee's (as Laura Palmer)
fall from sanity because of parental abuse and drug use.  The film shows
the events leading up to Lee's death.  Much of the movie is spent in
hallucinations and weird dream states.
     TWIN PEAKS: FIRE WALK WITH ME is David Lynch's prequel to his
television series "Twin Peaks."  I have been a fan of David Lynch since
I saw his film WILD AT HEART, one of my favorite films.  I unfortunately
missed this film when it was in the theater, and it was just released on
video cassette.  I enjoyed this film very much.  I missed Lynch's series
"Twin Peaks," but since the series is on video, I plan to see it now.
On a scale of zero to five, I give TWIN PEAKS: FIRE WALK WITH ME a four.
TWIN PEAKS: FIRE WALK WITH ME is rated R for female nudity, explicit
language, adult situations, and violence.
     This film is one of the weirdest movies that I have ever seen.
David Lynch has created a film that leaves sanity behind in the first
ten minutes, at which point it takes you into a dark, strange world
where only Lynch is in charge of your fate.
     Sheryl Lee is great as Laura Palmer who looses her grip on the
world because of drugs.  Moira Kelly (THE CUTTING EDGE, BILLY BATHGATE)
is excellent as Laura Palmer's best friend.  Kiefer Sutherland (THE
VANISHING, 1969) and Harry Dean Stanton (PARIS TEXAS, WILD AT HEART) are
very good as two special agents who appear in the beginning of the film.
Kyle MacLachlan (THE DOORS, DUNE) shows up briefly as special agent Dale
Cooper.  David Lynch, himself, has a brief role as Special Agent
Cooper's boss.  Pamela Gidley (THRASHIN', HIGHWAY TO HELL) can be seen
briefly as a corpse.  One of my favorite characters in this film was the
dream man (listed in the credits as "The man from another world"),
Michael Anderson.  There is no reason for David Bowie (LABYRINTH, THE
MAN WHO FELL TO EARTH) to be in this film, or get a spot in the opening
credits.  All he does is walk down a hall and sit in a seat.
     At some points this film reminded me of Peter Greenaway's films; at
times it seemed more like a psycho drama; and at other times more like
an anti-drug school health film.  This is one of those movies that you
will either love, or find to be a pointless confusing waste of
celluloid.  I happen to have enjoyed this film very much.

Title
Review for Children of the Corn II: The Final Sacrifice (1993)
98 min., R, Horror, 1993
Director: David F. Price
Cast: Terence Knox, Paul Scherrer, Ryan Bollman, Christie Clark,
      Rosalind Allen, Ned Romero
     The police find out what happened to all the adults in the town of
Gatlin.  The police move all the children to a neighboring town.  A
reporter, Terence Knox, and his son, Paul Scherrer, go to the Gatlin
area so that Knox can do a story on what happened in Gatlin.  Knox and
Scherrer stay at a Bed and Breakfast run by Rosalind Allen, who has
brought in Ryan Bollman (one of the children from Gatlin).  Bollman gets
possessed by "He who walks behind the rows" and tries to get the
children in the town to kill all the adults.  Knox begins investigating
what happened and starts coming up with some mysterious information,
while Scherrer is falling in love with Christie Clark.
     The film says that CHILDREN OF THE CORN 2: THE FINAL SACRIFICE is
"based" on the short story "Children of the Corn" by Stephen King.
Actually the film has nothing to do with the story except for the fact
that it tells the furthering story.  However this is an entertaining
film.  I can recommend this film to fans of horror films.  I don't think
that this film will be in the theaters for long.  In my area, on opening
weekend, it had just a 9:30 PM showing, so if you plan on seeing this
film you should do so soon.  On a scale of zero to five, I give CHILDREN
OF THE CORN 2 a four.  CHILDREN OF THE CORN 2 is rated R for explicit
language, adult situations, and graphic violence.
     CHILDREN OF THE CORN 2 is well done and suspenseful at times.  The
special effects for this film are excellent.  CHILDREN OF THE CORN 2 is
very well written, and the actors don't end up with too many moronic
lines, a fatal flaw that hits many horror films.  This film is not
exceptionally gory, however, those with weak stomachs will dislike some
scenes.  I also liked how the opening credits looked.  I thought they
were done excellently and improved the film.
     The cast for this film is excellent and, unlike many low budget
horror films, can actually act.  My two favorites out of the cast are
Ryan Bollman and Christie Clark.  Both give the best performances in the
film.  Paul Scherrer, also, does a good job.  Terence Knox is good and
Rosalind Allen is not on the screen very much.
     CHILDREN OF THE CORN 2: THE FINAL SACRIFICE is worth full admission
price and is definitely worth going to see (plus it is the only horror
film playing currently in many areas unless you count KNIGHT MOVES as a
horror film).  You may want to leave the children at home though (you
don't want to give them any bad ideas, do you?).

Title
Review for Stay Tuned (1992)
     John Ritter is a tv-aholic.  Salesman Jeffrey Jones shows up at
Ritter's door one night and lets him have a free trial of a satellite
disk.  The disk eats Ritter and his wife, Pam Dawber.  They end up in a
television world, where if they survive for 24 hours, they get sent back
to their house.
     STAY TUNED is a very funny comedy, that makes up for Ritter's last
two mega-bombs PROBLEM CHILD and PROBLEM CHILD 2.  I recommend this
film to any fan of slapstick comedy or any movie buff.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give STAY TUNED a four.  STAY TUNED is rated PG for
adult situations.
     I think the thing I disliked the most about this film was the
beginning credits.  They tried to make fun of the opening credits of
some action and science fiction films.  I think that they could have
been better.  The beginning of the end credits was cute though.  The
names of upcoming television shows, like "Unmarried with Children" (one
of the lamer ones), are put on the screen, so you may want to stick
around.
     Some of the humor is Mel-Brookish in nature, especially the
Salt-n-Pepper video.  The film was constantly amusing and often
hilarious, but I doubt that it will do as well as similar films, like
HOT SHOTS! and THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR, considering some
of the other films out in the theaters, like UNFORGIVEN, SINGLE WHITE
FEMALE, and TWIN PEAKS: FIRE WALK WITH ME.  Most likely this film will
find its audience when it is released on video cassette (and laser
disk).  None of the film will be lost on video cassette, so if you want
to wait for the video and see other current hits your viewing of the
film won't be harmed.
     I suggest that if you are planning to watch this film, that you try
to avoid seeing any commercials for it because they spoil parts of it
(e.g., "Driving Over Miss Daisy").  If you plan to see the film, I
suggest that you go see it soon because it has just left the theaters in
my area, and will probably be doing the same in your area soon also.

Title
Review for Freddy's Dead: The Final Nightmare (1991)
89 min, R, Horror, 1991
Director: Rachel Talalay
Cast: Robert Englund, Lisa Zane, Shon Greenblatt, Lezlie Deane,
      Yaphet Kotto, Roseanne Barr, Tom Arnold, Alice Cooper
      Supposedly the last Elm Street film finds Freddy, Englund, in a
problem.  He has killed off all the kids but one in his hometown of
Springfield.  This one kid is Freddy's only link to kids everywhere
else.  The kid escapes the town of Springfield.  The kid gets amnesia on
the road and when he gets picked up and brought to a children's shelter
all he can remember is that his dreams can kill him.  All he has with
him is some money, some pills to keep him awake, and a newspaper
clipping from the town of Springfield.  One of the staff at the
children's shelter wants to bring the kid to Springfield to see if
anything sparks the kid's memory there.  The staff member is warned by
Kotto, a dream psychologist, that the kid's dreams are dangerous and
may, somehow, be linked to the town of Springfield.
      FREDDY'S DEAD: THE FINAL NIGHTMARE is rated R for explicit
language and graphic violence.  I give the film a three (on a zero to
five scale).  It has good 3-D effects which were not as good as FRIDAY
THE 13TH - PART 3 and CAPTAIN EO (the film that is currently being shown
at The Epcot Center building "Journey into Imagination").  FREDDY'S DEAD
has reasonably good special effects, but they aren't up to the level of
the effects in A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET 5: THE DREAM CHILD.
      The ads for FREDDY'S DEAD: THE FINAL NIGHTMARE say "See Freddy die
in Freddy Vision."  These ads should be taken literally, as you find out
when you get the 3-D glasses.  The 3-D glasses state on them that the
glasses should only be put on when the girl in the film puts hers on, so
it turns out that only the last fifteen minutes are in 3-D.  The 3-D
effects, like I said before, are quite good.  The one part of the 3-D
that I was disappointed in was that the 3-D scheme used was the old red
and blue glasses instead of the new polarized technology.
      This is the first NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET film not to start the
title with A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET.  The film is almost a parody of
the Elm Street series instead of being a true sequel.  Robert Englund
puts nice comic touches into the gruesome Freddy, but the film is not
nearly as good as the first Nightmare film.  Roseanne Barr and her real
life husband Tom Arnold have a cameo as a husband and wife team in
Springfield and metal rocker Alice Cooper has a cameo as Freddy's
father.  If you are a fan of the Elm Streets series I urge you to see
FREDDY'S DEAD in the theater because the video will probably not be in
3-D.  If you are not a fan of the series and are interested in seeing a
funny Nightmare movie or you are interested in "Seeing Freddy bite the
big one" you might go see it at the theater, or you might wait for it to
come to video.

Title
Review for Return of the Killer Tomatoes! (1988)
This review is part two of a series which, in order, includes
ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES, RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES:
THE SEQUEL, and KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK!.
98 min., PG, Comedy, 1988
Director: John De Bello
Cast: Anthony Starke, George Clooney, Karen Mistal, Steve Lundquist,
      Charlie Jones, John Astin, "Rock" Peace, Frank Davis,
      Ian Hutton, John De Bello
     The tomato war is over and now tomatoes are illegal in the United
States.  Many young people smuggle tomatoes into the States because they
don't know the dangerous side to tomatoes.  Anthony Starke is a pizza
delivery boy, who creates and delivers pizzas that contain no tomatoes.
Evil doctor Gangrene, John Astin, is trying to make human soldiers from
tomatoes that will rule the world.  Beautiful Karen Mistal and Fuzzy
Tomato, a mutant tomato that has hair, escape from Austin's laboratory
and they go to Starke for help.  Starke and George Clooney, his friend,
have to stop Astin and his evil scheme.
     RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES: THE SEQUEL is the sequel (surprise!
surprise!) to the horrible film ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES.  It is
followed by the pitiful film KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK!  Actually
RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES is not really a true sequel to ATTACK OF
THE KILLER TOMATOES!, but instead makes fun of ATTACK and B movies in
general.  On a scale of zero to five, I give RETURN OF THE KILLER
TOMATOES a four.  RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES is rated PG for adult
situations and brief female nudity.
     The acting in this film is much better than in the first one.  John
Astin, of the television show "The Addams Family" (not the movie), gives
a great performance as the evil doctor.  As well as being sinister,
Astin makes his character amusing.  Karen Mistal, CANNIBAL WOMEN IN THE
AVOCADO JUNGLE OF DEATH (despite its title, a very good film), is
beautiful and a great actress.  She does a great job in her role,
though some people may say an actor or actress in a B movie can't do a
great job.  FT (Fuzzy Tomato), no matter how unrealistic, is, just
possibly, the best part of this film.  The worst actor in the film is
"Rock" Peace.  His performance makes me wonder how he ever got a role
in this series.
     The film does a great job of making fun of B movies.  Some of the
best parts were about running out of money and commercial placement.
The film also does a great job of making fun of ATTACK OF THE KILLER
TOMATOES, but those jokes will probably only be caught by people who
have seen the original film.  I highly recommend this film to any B
movie fan or movie buff (whether you liked ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES
or not).
     One last note, sadly one of the few funny gags from ATTACK OF THE
KILLER TOMATOES, the carrot joke, is re-used at the end of this film,
making it no longer funny.  I wish John De Bello had left it out of
this one.

Title
Review for Miracle, The (1991)
     Because there is no way I can see to give a summary of the film
without giving away a little of the film, the summary of the film is
right after the spoiler warning.
     THE MIRACLE is a very good film, and I highly recommend going to
see it in the theater or renting it, depending on what is available in
your neighborhood.  It doesn't make a difference in which way you see
the film.  THE MIRACLE has been released on video cassette and is also
still playing in some third run theaters.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give THE MIRACLE a four.   THE MIRACLE is rated PG for adult situations
and explicit language.
     *Contains minor spoilers for THE MIRACLE*
     Teenager McCann sees D'Angelo one day on a beach in his home town.
He falls in love with her, so he tries to get her to go out with him.
She is hesitant because she is his mother, which McCann doesn't know.
D'Angelo can't tell McCann that she is his mother, but doesn't want him
to hate her.
     THE MIRACLE is not trying to be a real somber drama, as the title
might suggest to you.  When I went to see this film, I was really
worried that it was going to be some boring overdramatic film.  It was
part of a double feature and I wanted to see the other film so I figured
that I might as well see both.  I was surprised at how good this film
was.
     The actors and actresses in the film do a great job.  The only
person in the cast that I had previously heard of is Beverly D'Angelo
(who plays Clark's wife in the NATIONAL LAMPOON'S VACATION series).  The
director, Neil Jordan (MONA LISA, WE'RE NO ANGELS), did a great job.  I
have only seen one of his films, HIGH SPIRITS, in the past, which was
not as good as this one.   The script is well written and keeps up
interest through the film, although there are a few slow spots.

Title
Review for Addams Family, The (1991)
100 min., PG-13, Comedy, 1991
Director: Barry Sonnenfeld
Cast: Raul Julia, Anjelica Huston, Christopher Lloyd, Christina Ricci,
      Elizabeth Wilson, Judith Malina, Dan Hedaya, Jimmy Workman
     Raul Julia and Anjelica Huston head the bizarre Addams family.
Julia has a fortune in money hidden in his gigantic house.  An evil
family wants to take Julia's money.  They send in Christopher Lloyd, who
looks just like Julia's brother, Uncle Fester who disappeared twenty
years before.  Lloyd has to fit in with the Addams family in order to
find out where the money is hidden.
     I found THE ADDAMS FAMILY to be a very good and funny film.  THE
ADDAMS FAMILY is slapstick comedy, but not as good as THE NAKED GUN 2+:
THE SMELL OF FEAR.  On a zero to five scale I give it a four.  THE
ADDAMS FAMILY is rated PG-13 for explicit language and adult situations.
     THE ADDAMS FAMILY, until just recently, has been playing in most of
the big theaters, it is now playing in the smaller theaters, and will
soon be coming to video.  I just saw the film at a reduced rate, and
found it worth the money.  I highly recommend if you are a fan of comedy
you watch this film at a small theater or wait for the video.  Not
everybody will like this film however.  My father gave up on the film
after about ten minutes because he said that the film was pointless,
plotless, and filled with corny gags.  My mother was not very impressed
with the film either because she said that it had a stupid plot, was
pointless, and during the entire film she laughed only four times.
However, I know several people who enjoyed the film very much.   So,
because of the wide range of reaction to the film you might want to wait
for the video so that you don't feel that you wasted your money.
     THE ADDAMS FAMILY is based on an old black-and-white television
show by the same name.  The actors/actresses have been changed.  I have
never seen the television show so I don't know if it is like the film,
but episodes have recently come out on video because of the popularity
of the movie and I plan to rent them to see if they are any good.
     My favorite character/thing in the film was the hand; I also feel
that it was the most likable thing in the film.  I liked the idea of
having just a hand and giving it personality, however, it is totally
unrealistic, and that might turn some people off from the film.  I also
really liked the Addam's neighbor.  He's not on for much time but was
funny when he was on.  The two kids Pugsly and Wednesday (played, in
order, by Jimmy Workman and Christina Ricci) were cool, but not as good
as the rest of the cast.  I felt their roles were under written.  Raul
Julia and Anjelica Huston were ... well ... bizarre.   And Christopher
Lloyd (Dr. Emmett Brown in the BACK TO THE FUTURE trilogy) was good, and
funny, as the fake Uncle Fester.

Title
Review for Suddenly, Last Summer (1993) (TV)
82 min., not rated, Drama, 1992, Made-for-British-television
Director: Richard Eyre
Cast: Maggie Smith, Natasha Richardson, Rob Lowe, Moira Redmond,
      Richard E. Grant, Gillian Raine, Rosaleen Liehan, C. P. Wilson
     Natasha Richardson witnessed the death of her homosexual cousin the
summer before.  She has been saying some nasty things about him.  Maggie
Smith, her aunt, gets doctor Rob Lowe to come to Smith's house to
lobotomize Richardson, saying that she is crazy.  Lowe talks to
Richardson and finds out that she may not be so crazy.
     SUDDENLY LAST SUMMER was made for the BBC.  SUDDENLY LAST SUMMER is
based on the play by Tennessee Williams, which was also made into a film
in 1959 starring Elizabeth Taylor and Katherine Hepburn.  SUDDENLY LAST
SUMMER is a great film.  I definitely suggest that you try to see it.  I
give SUDDENLY LAST SUMMER a five on a scale of zero to five.  I didn't
see anything *too* objectionable in SUDDENLY LAST SUMMER.
     The costumes for this film are excellent.  They set the film
perfectly.  The script is excellent.  The sets used for the film are
also excellent.  I especially like how the garden looked.   This was my
introduction to Tennessee Williams work, and I am pleased to say that I
enjoyed it immensely.  I wish that American television would make films
this good.
     The cast for this film is perfectly picked.  Maggie Smith (HOOK) is
excellent.  She makes her character come alive.  Rob Lowe (ABOUT LAST
NIGHT..., ST. ELMO'S FIRE) is good, however, out of the cast, I liked
his performance the least.  Natasha Richardson (THE HANDMAID'S TALE) is
great.

Title
Review for Cape Fear (1991)
135 min., R, Horror/Suspense, 1991
Director: Martin Scorsese
Cast: Robert DeNiro, Nick Nolte, Jessica Lange, Juliette Lewis,
      Gregory Peck, Robert Mitchum, Martin Balsam, Joe Don Baker,
      Fred Dalton Thompson
     Years ago Nolte was the lawyer for illiterate DeNiro who brutally
raped a sixteen-year-old girl.  DeNiro went to prison on a lesser charge
of battery.  Now DeNiro has gotten out of prison and has moved into the
town where Nolte lives with his wife Lange and their fifteen-year-old
daughter Lewis.  DeNiro starts terrorizing Nolte and his family but in
such a way that the law can't touch him.
     CAPE FEAR, like the film DEAD CALM, is more of a suspense film
than a horror film.  I found CAPE FEAR to be a very good, suspenseful,
film.  Part of the impact of this film is seeing it on a large screen.
For instance in the film there is a storm scene which will not be nearly
as spectacular on a television set.  For this reason I highly suggest if
you are one of the few people who hasn't seen this film that you go to
see it at a theater, if any theaters in your area are still playing it.
On a scale of zero to five, I rate CAPE FEAR a four.  CAPE FEAR is rated
R for graphic violence, explicit language, and adult situations.
     CAPE FEAR was in most of the large theaters near the end of 1991
and it had a long theatrical run before leaving most of the theaters in
early 1992.  Small theaters, like the one I saw it in, are now getting
CAPE FEAR, and it will be coming out on video soon.  
     The photography, using reverse (negative) images in the beginning
and at the very end of the film is well done.  It added an arty aspect
to the film, although in the middle of the film they used the reverse
image in a scene and that didn't fit in as well.  The opening credits
for the film were also well done with the water rippling and the
pictures superimposed.
     For the most part the script for the film was well done.  The one
part that I really didn't like about the script was how indestructable
Robert DeNiro's character was.  I don't think that prison could really
have toughened him up enough to just come walking back after some of the
things that happen to him in the film.  I don't want to mention the
things here so that I don't give away parts of the film for those of you
who haven't seen CAPE FEAR.  Juliette Lewis's character was especially
well written, and well acted.  I found that she did a very convincing
job.  Nick Nolte and Jessica Lange did a very spectacular job of the
sometimes fighting husband and wife.
     CAPE FEAR is based on a 1962 black-and-white drama also called CAPE
FEAR by J.  Lee Thompson.  It starred Gregory Peck, Robert Mitchum, and
Martin Balsam, all of whom have cameos in this film.  I haven't seen
the earlier version of CAPE FEAR so I can't comment on how closely
related they are.  Both versions are based on a novel by John
D. MacDonald [titled THE EXECUTIONERS  -Moderator].

Title
Review for Broadway Bound (1991) (TV)
106 min., not rated, Drama/Comedy, 1992
Director: Paul Bogart
Cast: Anne Bancroft, Hume Cronyn, Corey Parker,
      Jonathan Silverman, Jerry Orbach, Michele Lee
     BROADWAY BOUND takes place in Brighton Beach, New York in 1948.
Brothers Corey Parker and Jonathan Silverman are working on a sketch
that they think might get them into television writing.  Michele Lee,
Parker's aunt, tries to convince Hume Cronyn, Parker's grandfather, to
move to Florida with his wife.  Cronyn doesn't want to because he likes
it on Brighton Beach.  Anne Bancroft (Parker's mother) and Jerry
Orbach's (Parker's father) marriage is threatened by their frequent
arguments.
     BROADWAY BOUND was written for television by Neil Simon based on
his play.  It is a sequel to Simon's earlier play BRIGHTON BEACH
MEMOIRS, which was made into a movie in 1986.  Jonathan Silverman was
Eugene in the movie version of BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS.  In BROADWAY
BOUND, Jonathan Silverman plays Stan, Eugene's older brother.  BROADWAY
BOUND continues the story from BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS, which was set in
the 1930's.
     I found BROADWAY BOUND to be both a funny and touching film.  Like
most of Neil Simon's plays, BROADWAY BOUND has dramatic roots.  The
family is in danger of being broken up.  The sons are trying to get into
television comedy writing which at times gets them all stressed out.
The parents are having problems living together and are constantly
fighting.  This causes a conflict with the boys too, because they are
aware of the fighting but aren't supposed to talk about it.  The
grandfather's wife, who the grandfather hasn't lived with for years, has
to move to Florida because she can't take the cold winters and one of
his daughters wants him to go down to live with his wife because his
daughter thinks that he is getting too old for cold winters too.  But
yet, though out the film there are comedy bits thrown in such that they
don't take away from the dramatic part of the film but provide a relief
so that the drama doesn't get too heavy and bog you down.
     BROADWAY BOUND is heavier on the drama than BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS
was and a little bit lighter on the comedy.  I definitely recommend
BROADWAY BOUND for any fan of Neil Simon or anybody who saw BRIGHTON
BEACH MEMOIRS and liked it.  This would probably not be the best film
for someone who easily gets depressed because there are some very sad
scenes in the film.  On a scale of zero to five, I give BROADWAY BOUND a
four.  BROADWAY BOUND is made-for-television, ABC to be specific, so it
doesn't contain anything objectionable.  Because it is made-for-
television, if you missed it, you will either have to wait for it to be
repeated, find a friend who taped it, or watch to see if it comes to
video in several months.
     BROADWAY BOUND is one of those films that is written so well you
actually start believing that the people in it are real.  In fact, this
film may be semi-autobiographical since BRIGHTON BEACH MEMOIRS was
semi-autobiographical.  Because the characters are so believable, I
found my self feeling sorry for one of them when something went wrong
and happy when something went right.  That is one of the things that
made me like this movie.

Title
Review for Captain Eo (1986)
     Michael Jackson is "Captain Eo," the leader of a space crew.   They
have messed up every mission given to them.  If they mess up one more
time, it will be their last mission.The crew is being sent to a planet
to bring a gift of peace to the ruler of the planet.  "Captain Eo" is
playing, and has been for several years, at Walt Disney World's Epcot
Center.  It is directed by Francis Ford Coppola, the director of THE
GODFATHER trilogy, and is presented to you in the polarized 3-D
technology.  
     I'm not writing a review on this film, per se, but just giving
some comments on it.  This film, I think, makes good use of the 3-D.  It
uses a few of the old 3-D tricks of shooting things out over the
audiences' heads, but mostly the 3-D is used to give the film depth.
This use of depth makes the film seem more realistic.
     Since I first saw "Captain Eo" several years ago, Disney has added
"in-theater effects."  I feel that these "in theater effects" were a big
mistake.  Some of the effects are lights flashing in the back of the
theater to simulate gun fire and smoke coming out from under the screen.
I found the flashing lights to be very distracting and the smoke covered
up part of the screen.
     The film has a good message behind it, well, don't all Disney
films.  The message in "Captain Eo" was to have world peace.   This
message is presented primarily in song form.  The songs are well done
and are sung by Michael Jackson, who has a good voice when he uses it.
The overall quality of the film is very good and I would suggest that if
you are ever in Epcot Center you go and watch the film.

Title
Review for Baxter (1988)
82 min., not rated, Drama, 1991, In French with English subtitles
Director: Jerome Boivin
Cast: sorry, missed them
     The life of a dog, as told by a dog.  The dog, Baxter, travels from
owner to owner trying to find one he likes.  The first owner is an old
lady who just sits around all the time doing nothing fun and worrying
about when she is going to die.  The second owners are a couple of young
lovers.  The final owner is a sadistic boy who is really into Naziism.
     I found BAXTER to be a generally unappealing film.  It does,
however, seem to have a message behind it.  I feel that Baxter
represents the average person.  The old lady represents people who have
given up on life.  The lovers represent people who feel that life is
nothing but fun and that they don't have any responsibility.  The boy
represents overachievers, and sadistic fanatic.  Baxter has to find
where he fits in.  I think he represents the human race trying to find
where they fit in.  With all things considered, I give BAXTER a two on a
scale of zero to five.  BAXTER is unrated but contains female nudity,
adult situations, violence, and explicit language.
     The dog picked to portray Baxter is a not very attractive looking
dog.  This gives the film an unpleasant feel.  There is really nothing
bad to say about the acting.  The actors/actresses seem to do a good
job, but the characters they play are not very pleasant:  the old lady,
who has given up on life moping around; the two lovers, who at first
only care about themselves; the boy, who is brilliant, psychotic, and
brutal.  Speaking of the boy, his character is especially chilling.
Being psychologically able to do some of the things he does is almost
unthinkable.  The settings for the film are grim and unpleasant to look
at too.
     I don't recommend that you go see this film, or if you do that you
go to a very cheap showing so that you don't come out thinking that you
wasted your money.  I really didn't enjoy it very much.   One last note,
this film is not for animal lovers, because of what happens to some
animals in the film.

Title
Review for Jason Goes to Hell: The Final Friday (1993)
1:29, Horror, 1993
MPAA rating: R (graphic violence, female nudity, explicit
                language, adult situations)
Rating: three (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Adam Marcus
Cast: John D. LeMay, Kari Keegan, Allison Smith, Steven Culp,
      Billy Green Bush, Leslie Jordan, Richard Gant, Kane Hodder,
      Erin Gray, Steven Williams
     Kane Hodder (the infamous Jason Voorhees) gets blown up at the
beginning of this film.  His body gets destroyed, but his evil soul
lives on, travelling from body to body until he can get his body back.
Hodder returns to Crystal Lake for much bloody mayhem and is followed
by a bounty hunter who knows how to kill Hodder for good.
     JASON GOES TO HELL: THE FINAL FRIDAY is the ninth entry in the
FRIDAY THE 13TH series.  This film is supposed to be the last film of
the series, but isn't that what the producers said about FRIDAY THE
13TH - PART 4: THE LAST CHAPTER?  I expect that if this film does well
at the box office then yet another one will soon be on the way.  I only
recommend this film to fans of the series, and then only at matinee
prices or off videocassette (when it is released).
     JASON GOES TO HELL, unfortunately, does not live up to the rest of
the series.  Like the earlier film FREDDY'S DEAD: THE FINAL NIGHTMARE,
this film is almost a spoof of the genre and of the FRIDAY THE 13TH
series itself.  At some times the film is intentionally funny and at
other times it is unintentionally amusing.  This film isn't believable
at any level, but what the hell -- if you wanted believable you
wouldn't have gone to see this film in the first place.
     This film keeps up with the gore content of the series, which
could repulse some unexpecting viewers.  The gore effects are well done
and complement the film.  They don't look cheap and should satisfy all
the gore freaks in the audience, because, lets face it, if you are
going to see this film you aren't going to see an Oscar winning
screenplay, you are going for the buckets of blood that shall be
spilled.  The script could have been written better, but as far as
horror movies go, the writing isn't that bad.  The film is predictable
in too many spots, but does have a few surprises in store for the
viewer.  The score isn't overly memorable, but suits the film.  It
doesn't sound that much different from the other FRIDAY THE 13TH films,
which could be that they were all done by the same person (Harry
Manfredini), but it does add a slight chill at the appropriate
moments.
     The acting in this film isn't going to exactly win any Oscars
either.  Kane Hodder (playing Jason for a third time) does a good job
for the little time he is actually on screen.  The rest of the cast
isn't overly spectacular, but aren't extremely bad either.  They are
basically just a normal B-grade horror film cast that can scream on
cue.

Title
Review for Casualties of Love: The Long Island Lolita Story (1993) (TV)
1:40, not rated, Drama, 1993, Made-for-American-Television
Director: John Herzfeld
Cast: Jack Scalia, Alyssa Milano, Phyllis Lyons, Leo Rossi,
      J. E. Freeman, Peter Van Norden, Lawrence Tierney, Anne DeSalvo,
      Michael Bowden, John Perry, Nicky Corello
     Alyssa Milano plays the notorious Amy Fisher in this adaption of
the controversial story.  Milano supposedly started an affair with Jack
Scalia (Joe Buttafuoco) and ended up attempting to kill his wife
Phyllis Lyons (Mary Jo Buttafuoco).
     CASUALTIES OF LOVE: THE 'LONG ISLAND LOLITA' STORY, CBS's version
of the Amy Fisher story, aired back on January 3.  The film is
currently set to be released on video cassette on April 7 (the same
time as NBC's AMY FISHER: MY STORY, r.a.m.r.# 1664). Of the three Amy
Fisher films, CASUALTIES OF LOVE is by far the best.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give CASUALTIES OF LOVE a five.  The video cassette
version will contain some scenes that were too racy for television.
     The cast for this film is excellent and ends up being above the
normal television film cast.  Alyssa Milano (CRASH COURSE, LITTLE
SISTER) is great as Amy Fisher.  She even did better than Drew
Barrymore (ABC's BEYOND CONTROL: THE AMY FISHER STORY), who tends to be
excellent in this kind of role.  Jack Scalia was very good as Joey
Buttafuoco.  I think that he did better in that role than the actors in
the other two versions.  I wasn't too impressed with Phyllis Lyons
acting.
     CASUALTIES OF LOVE is written from and biased towards Joe and Mary
Jo Buttafuoco's point of view, so it is biased towards their point of
view.  If you are only going to watch one of the Amy Fisher films when
they get released on video cassette, I suggest that you choose this
one.  I don't know how much of it is true, but it makes for good
viewing.

Title
Review for Attack of the Killer Tomatoes! (1978)
This review is part one of a series which, in order, includes
ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES, RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES:
THE SEQUEL, and KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE BACK!.
87 min., PG, Comedy, 1978
Director: John De Bello
Cast: David Miller, George Wilson, Sharon Taylor, Jack Riley,
      "Rock" Peace, John De Bello, Ernie Meyers, Ron Shapiro,
      Jerry Anderson, Eric Christmas, Al Sklar, Robert Matzenauer
     Across the Unites States tomatoes start attacking people.  The
U. S. government forms a special group of "specialists" to go and stop
the tomatoes.  The tomatoes grow in size and threaten the U.S.  The
"specialists" aren't doing the best job.
     ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES could, quite possibly, be the worst
movie ever made, but then again what can you expect from a film that has
the quote "Surely ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES has to be some kind of
camp classic" (H. J. Weeks - ARTWEEK) on the back of the video box.  I
can't recommend this film to anyone, even fans of B movies, which I am.
This is the type of film that gives B movies a bad name.  I doubt this
is any kind of camp classic.  This film was followed by two sequels,
RETURN OF THE KILLER TOMATOES: THE SEQUEL, and KILLER TOMATOES STRIKE
BACK! (and maybe one called KILLER TOMATOES EAT FRANCE).  On a scale of
zero to five, I give ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES a zero (unfortunately
my scale doesn't go any lower).  ATTACK OF THE KILLER TOMATOES is rated
PG for explicit language.
     I don't think I can think of anything good about this film.  There
were exactly two scenes which I liked, the master of disguise hanging
out with the tomatoes and the carrot joke.  I laughed three times during
the entire film.  The acting in the film is pathetic.  The
actors/actresses show no talent at all.  The story is horribly written,
and isn't even funny.  At the very least the film could have been
minutely amusing, but it was just stupid.  The idea of tomatoes eating
people is preposterous, they don't have any mouths.  Two big questions
crossed my mind while I was watching this film, "How do the tomatoes
move without any feet?", and "Why am I watching this horrible film?"
Then when the movie was over a third question crossed my mind, "Why did
John De Bello make this film?"  At least I came up with an answer to
that one, obviously he wanted to punish his audience.

Title
Review for Under Siege (1992)
100 min., R, Action, 1992
Director: Andrew Davis
Cast: Steven Segal, Tommy Lee Jones, Gary Busey, Erika Eleniak,   
      Colm Meany, Andy Romano, Patrick O'Neal, Michael Des Barres
     Aboard a heavily armed warship, the captain's, Patrick O'Neal,
birthday is coming up.  The crew plans a surprise party for O'Neal and
brings aboard a centerfold girl, Erika Eleniak, and a band.
Unfortunately for them, the band is a gang of revolutionists lead by
Tommy Lee Jones, who take over the ship.   The only man on board who can
stop them is the cook, Steven Segal.
     I just saw Steven Segal's newest film UNDER SIEGE and loved it.  I
highly suggest that you go and see this film.   I think that it is
Segal's best film yet.  This film is all that the television
advertisements made it out to be, and much more.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give UNDER SIEGE a five.  UNDER SIEGE is rated R for explicit
language, graphic violence, and brief female nudity.
     The special effects for this film are great.  This film is a lot
gorier than most of Segal's earlier films, but the gore doesn't feel out
of place.  In my opinion, it only adds to the film.  The sets for the
film are excellent and really place the film well.  This is definitely a
film to see in the theaters, because it will lose so much on a small
screen.
     Segal gives his normal unemotional performance, that I feel makes
him the popular actor that he is.  He seems to have no problem running
around a warship breaking people's arms and the like.  Tommy Lee Jones
gives the best performance in this film as the crazy revolutionist.  His
performance is extremely realistic, and at some points even scary.  Gary
Busey also played a person who is not entirely there.  Like Tommy Lee
Jones, Busey gave an excellent performance.  Erika Eleniak was a
surprise in this film; she started out as the typical action movie bimbo
that Hollywood seems to stick into most of this kind of film.  At first
the only reason that I thought that she was put in the film was to
provide the one brief scene of gratuitous nudity, but part way through
the film she changed and actually became a use to Segal.
     There isn't much to say about the writing.  It is of the usual
"slam bam" action film quality.  It doesn't hurt or help the film much
at all.  The direction by Andrew Davis, who has done ABOVE THE LAW which
also starred Steven Segal, is good and certainly doesn't hurt the film.

Title
Review for Terminator 2: Judgment Day (1991)
     In THE TERMINATOR there is a very bleak version of the future.  The
nuclear war has already happened (in the year 1997), and some survived.
Those who have survived face even a tougher battle.  Machines now have
artificial intelligence and can run themselves.  They see the errors in
the ways of humans, so have set out to cease their existence.  The
humans, though, have a leader, a man named John.  The machines, afraid
that John will lead the humans to victory, had sent Arnold
Schwarzenegger, a Terminator T800 robot, back in time to 1984.  His job
is to kill off Hamilton who is going to give birth to John.  The humans
learning of the machines move send back in time a human to stop the T800
(who was played by Michael Biehn).  The T800 failed it's mission.
     In TERMINATOR 2 the machines are now desperate to kill off John
(who is played in TERMINATOR 2 by Furlong).  They send back a Terminator
version T1000 (played by Patrick) to kill off Furlong, now ten.  The
humans in an effort to stop the T1000, send back the T800 model of the
Terminator robots (played again by Schwarzenegger).
     On a 0 to 5 scale I give this film a 5.  The special effects in the
film, done by Industrial Light & Magic I have heard, were exceptional
(they should be for the $88 million budget the film had).  The film is
nowhere near as brutal as Arnold's tend to be, but don't be worried
though because there is still a considerable amount of violence in it.
I suggest seeing the film while it is still in the theaters for it will
lose some of its impact on a small television screen; it is well worth
the $7 for the ticket.  For more on the film for those of you who have
already seen the film you can see the next page.
     TERMINATOR 2 is rated R for explicit language and graphic violence.
     WARNING - the following may contain spoilers that may hinder your
enjoyment of watching TERMINATOR 2 and/or may spoil the end.
      The plot on the whole was quite well done although in a couple
spots it was obvious what was going to happen.  Like at the metal works
at the film's finale it was quite obvious where Robert Patrick was going
to end up.  The other place that comes to mind that was a bit obvious
was the inevitable end of the poor guy who, unintentionally, made the
robots who will fight the humans for the earth.
      Linda Hamilton plays the psycho role of John's mother to the
extreme.  I feel that she has seen too many films with Jack Nicholson
in them.  If she is really as crazy as shown in the film maybe she
should be in a mental institution.  The T1000 robot, made of a liquid
metal, could have better used its ability in some of the fight/chase
scenes.  But if it did Arnie might not have lasted through the film.  My
only other compliant is the boy, John, is supposed to be ten years old.
From his behavior I would have put his age at around sixteen.  Other
than those few problems, which don't distract from the viewing pleasure,
the film is one of the best I have seen in a long time!

Title
Review for Popcorn (1991)
93 min., R, Horror, 1990
Distributor: RCA/Columbia
Director: Mark Herrier
Cast: Jill Schoelen, Tom Villard, Dee Wallace Stone, Derek Rydell,
      Malcolm Danare, Elliott Hurst, Ivette Soler, Freddie Marie Simpson,
      Kelly Jo Minter, Karen Witter, Ray Walston, Tony Roberts
     The University of California is cutting the funding for their film
department.  The students taking film courses are upset, of course.  Not
to let this get in their way, the students decide to raise the money on
their own.  They decide to run a horror show that consists of three old
horror films.  They use an old theater that is going to be torn down in
three weeks.  While they are setting up they are visited by Walston,
who shows up with a suitcase of props.  He tells the students that the
films they are showing are total turkeys, but they can liven them up
with in-theater effects.  The students like the idea and Walston helps
them.
     At the same time Schoelen, who is a film student, starts having a
recurring bad dream about a man who goes after this little girl with a
knife.  Schoelen writes down what happens in the dreams so she can make
a film about it.  Her mother, Stone, hears about the dreams and starts
receiving strange phone calls.  Stone then wants the two to move but
Schoelen refuses for three reasons.  One is the horror show, another is
that she says that she can't run from her dreams, and the last is that
she has a feeling that something is going to happen at the horror show
related to the dreams and she wants to be there.
     POPCORN was out in the theaters in early 1991 and is now out on
video.  POPCORN is a very entertaining horror film that doesn't contain
much gore.  I give POPCORN a four on a zero to five scale.  POPCORN is
well worth watching, especially if you are a fan of horror or a fan of
Jill Schoelen, like I am.  POPCORN is rated R for explicit language,
adult situations, and violence.
     In this day very gory horror films, like LEATHERFACE: TEXAS
CHAINSAW MASSACRE III, and FRIDAY THE 13TH - PART n, are very popular
with the teenage audience.  POPCORN is a deviation from that kind of
film.  I'm not saying that gory films are not enjoyable, I enjoy them
very much.  It is just that sometimes you need a relief from all the
gore.  POPCORN is this relief.
     Most of the cast for this film is unknowns, like most many films.
The few knowns are Jill Schoelen (THE STEPFATHER, RICH GIRL), Dee
Wallace Stone (CRITTERS, SECRET ADMIRER), Kelly Jo Minter (HOUSE PARTY,
THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS), Karen Witter (BURIED ALIVE, MIDNIGHT), and
Ray Walston (PRIVATE SCHOOL ...FOR GIRLS, FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH,
PAINT YOUR WAGON).  But the entire cast puts in a big group effort.
While being chilling, POPCORN is also funny but not in a way that takes
away from the film.

Title
Review for People Under the Stairs, The (1992)
     Brandon Adams's family is being evicted from their ghetto apartment
by the cruel landlord because they are three days late on the rent
payment.  Adams and two other older boys, to get the money for the rent,
plan to rob the landlord's house.  They go and case the house and one of
the boys goes in to get a layout of any alarm systems.  When he does not
come out and the landlord leaves the house, they suspect him of trying
to steal all the money for himself.  They break into the house to find
him and find that they are trapped by the house, and those who lurk in
it.
     THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS is rated R for explicit language and
graphic violence.  I give the film a five on a zero to five scale.  THE
PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS is a definite must see for any fan of horror or
any fan of Wes Craven's work while it is still in the theaters.  I
recommend the film at full price.
     Being a big fan of Wes Craven's work I rushed out to the theater to
see THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS.  Wes Craven is the director of great
horror works such as DEADLY BLESSING a horror film about a girl that is
being terrorized by a religious group, THE SERPENT & THE RAINBOW a
voodoo horror film, SHOCKER a horror film about a man who was killed and
can travel through television sets and kill people, a television film
called CHILLER about a man who was cryogenically frozen who defreezes
and starts killing people, the now famous original A NIGHTMARE ON ELM
STREET film, and many others.  Each of Wes Craven's works are unique and
this one is no different.
     Craven's films, instead of being slasher films, have substance to
them.  I'm not saying that I dislike slasher films, I'm just saying that
Craven's films are different than most of the "modern horror films."
THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS does have graphic violence, but the main
point of the film is not to see how many people can be slaughtered; the
emphasis is more on the actual scare factor.  So, I recommend THE PEOPLE
UNDER THE STAIRS to anyone who wishes to see a good horror film but does
not like slasher films.  Like some of Wes Craven's work--excluding
SHOCKER, A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET, DEADLY FRIEND, and SWAMP THING--THE
PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS could possibly happen, which makes the movie all
the better.
     THE PEOPLE UNDER THE STAIRS, like most films, will lose some of its
impact when seen on a small screen television.  The special effects in
the film are very well done.  The house has a sinister look to it even
in the daytime.  Did anyone else who saw the film notice that the house
has the same basic floor plan of Freddy's house from A NIGHTMARE ON ELM
STREET?   The actors all put in good performances.  In a horror film
most people think that how good the actor's performance is has nothing
to do with the quality of the horror film, but it does.  If an actor
doesn't believe what he's acting then the people watching the film will
never believe it either.  So often, to save money, the actors in a
horror film have no ability which, in my opinion, harms the finished
product.  However, even though the cast of this film was mostly unknown
to me, the actors in the film have real ability.  The only actor in the
film that I recognized was Kelly Jo Minter.  I have seen her in films
like HOUSE PARTY, NEW JACK CITY, A NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET 5: THE DREAM
CHILD, and POPCORN.

Title
Review for Rich Girl (1990)
97 min., R, Comedy/Romance, 1991
Distributor: RCA/Columbia
Director: Joel Bender
Cast: Jill Schoelen, Don Michael Paul, Sean Kanan, Ron Karabatsos,
      Paul Gleason, Cherie Currie, Bentley Mitchum, Melanie Tomlin,
      Trudi Forristal, Ann Gillespie, Gail Neely, Dennis Holahan
      Young rich Jill Schoelen gets sick of her father Gleason using his
connections to get her what she wants.  In protest she leaves his house
and gets herself a small apartment.  She doesn't have any work
experience, so Schoelen ends up getting a job as a waitress at a club
run by Karabatsos.   There, while working, she sees singer Don Michael
Paul and falls in love with him.  Don Michael Paul has little schooling
and a police record.  Gleason doesn't like Schoelen's relationship with
Don Michael Paul and aims to break it up.
      I found RICH GIRL to be very entertaining.  I give it a four on a
zero to five scale.  I recommend this film more to teenagers and people
in their early twenties because I feel that they would enjoy the film
more than adults.  RICH GIRL is rated R for explicit language, adult
situations, violence, and female nudity.
      RICH GIRL was in the movie theaters in April of 1991, and I didn't
see it.  To my knowledge there were no reviews posted on it.  In
mid-December RICH GIRL came to video and that's when I saw it.
      I really enjoyed RICH GIRL and feel that it is a very good film.
The acting in the film is good and the plot is somewhat original, but
very enjoyable.  The comedy comes in small bursts around the romantic
moments in the film.  RICH GIRL has a good rock soundtrack.
      RICH GIRL is sort of like a reverse roll PRETTY WOMAN where Jill
Schoelen is the rich person (like Richard Gere in PRETTY WOMAN) and Don
Michael Paul is the poor one with little schooling (like Julia Roberts
in PRETTY WOMAN).  RICH GIRL is not quite as good as PRETTY WOMAN.  The
video box cover for RICH GIRL also seems to resemble the video box cover
for PRETTY WOMAN.
      For some reason RICH GIRL was not very popular in the theaters,
which I can't understand.  I don't think that RICH GIRL came to any
theaters in my area.  The reason that I know when RICH GIRL was in the
theaters is because I was on vacation in Washington D.C.  and there were
ads for the film on the sides of most of the MetroBuses there.  Most
video stores will only get one or two copies (mine got one), which means
that some people won't even give it a chance.  Don't be one of those
people.
[Moderator's note:  Ken is right; there were no reviews.  The February
1992 PREMIERE magazine discusses it (among other films) as having
suffered from an incredibly bad publicity campaign.  The posters were so
obscure that no one had any idea what the picture was about, and hence
no interest was generated.]
.


Title
Review for Monache di Sant'Arcangelo, Le (1973)
     In the 1800's, Sisters (in the religious sense) Tina Romero and
Susana Kamini get possessed by the devil.  They start trying to spread
Satanism.  A Father (religious) and a doctor try to stop Romero and
Kamini before they can create more devil worshipers.
     MARK OF THE DEVIL - PART 3: INNOCENCE FROM HELL is distributed by
Fame Home Video, and I believe it was released this year.  The film is
also available on Neon home video under the title INNOCENCE FROM HELL.
To the best of my knowledge, both prints of the film are the same.  MARK
OF THE DEVIL 3 is a rather bizarre horror film, which may be why I liked
it so much.  On a scale of zero to five, I give MARK OF THE DEVIL 3 a
four.  MARK OF THE DEVIL 3 is rated R for female nudity, male nudity,
adult situations, and graphic violence.  Although both video cassette
boxes (Fame and Neon home video) say the film runs for 93 minutes, the
actual running time is 75 minutes.
     THE MARK OF THE DEVIL series is known for its graphic violence, but
by today's standards the gore is quite tame.  The film is incredibly low
budget, but still is fun to watch.  This film is banned in nearly 19
countries (which is quite a step down from the first, which was banned
in 36 countries) although I really can't see any reason for it.  Maybe
it had something to do with the satanic theme.
     The acting in the film is rather pathetic, but that is what makes
this film what it is.  There is almost no special effects and those they
have aren't done as well as they could be.  The only good effects was of
the blood.  The film seemed to do that rather well, then again, that was
the major draw to the series back in the early seventies.  I only
recommend this film to people who have slightly warped tastes.
     After seeing this film it makes me want to see the rest of the
series, which I hope to do soon.  I have heard that the earlier films
are even better (and gorier) so I have high expectations.  This film is
definitely not for one that is easily offended.  It contains several
scenes that could greatly shock, or effect, many people.
     The opening credits are done extremely cheaply and are almost
unreadable in some places.  If my memory serves my right the ending
credits were completely skipped.  At some points I could really see the
cheapness of the equipment (some of that could be the old technology
though).  There are some scenes that don't fit too well in the film.
One that comes to mind is in the very beginning, a woman is looking
around a completely unscary room while "spooky" music is playing.  I
think that the makers should have attempted to make the scene a bit
spookier (or cut it).
     I wish that the film had been longer.  I was really enjoying the
film and then it came to the ending.  The ending seemed to be a little
too quick, like the film was getting too long for the makers and they
decided to end it quickly.  It probably should have been stretched to
fit five to ten more minutes.  I highly doubt that there will ever be
another sequel to this series because good gore films are going down the
drain and "family values" stuff seems to be spreading.

Title
Review for Children of the Night (1992)
1:32, R, Horror, 1992
Director: Tony Randel
Cast: Karen Black, Ami Dolenz, Peter DeLuise, Evan MacKenzie,
      Maya McLaughlin, Josette DiCarlo, David Sawyer, Garrett Morris
     Ami Dolenz and her friend Maya McLaughlin go to a flooded crypt in
an abandoned church to go swimming.  Dolenz loses ha cross necklace.
The cross falls to the bottom of the flooded crypt and awakens a vampire
that hasn't been taking care of it's complexion.  The vampire takes care
of McLaughlin but Dolenz escapes.  Dolenz and Peter DeLuise, a school
teacher who was going to become a man of the cloth, are the only people
who can stop the vampire.
     CHILDREN OF THE NIGHT (1992 version, not to be confused with the
1985 television film) was just recently released on video cassette.
This film might be worth renting if you like comedies and find it for a
cheap enough rate.  On a scale of zero to five, I give CHILDREN OF THE
NIGHT a one (if viewed as a horror film) or a three (if viewed as a
comedy).  CHILDREN OF THE NIGHT is rated R for explicit language, adult
situations, and violence.
     This film reminds me very much of Stephen King's film SLEEPWALKERS,
not in subject, but in how the film turns out.  This film is supposed to
be a horror film, but anyone viewing the film with that in mind will be
sorely disappointed.  If this film is viewed as a comedy, I think that
it will be enjoyed much more.  If viewed as a spoof of vampire films,
CHILDREN OF THE NIGHT isn't bad, however, it is not as good as BUFFY THE
VAMPIRE SLAYER.
     Out of the cast, Garrett Morris (CAR WASH, EARTH ANGEL, CRITICAL
CONDITION) is definitely the best.  He has most of the comic lines that
were supposed to be comical.  Morris, the former "Saturday Night Live"
cast member, once again proves his comic greatness.  Karen Black (AUNTIE
LEE'S MEAT PIES, ZAPPED AGAIN!)  is definitely the worst.  I have never
liked Karen Black's acting and this film has done nothing to improve my
opinion of her.  Peter DeLuise (FREE RIDE) is not bad in his role, but
he could be better.  Ami Dolenz (SHE'S OUT OF CONTROL, MIRACLE BEACH)
usually does a great job in comedies.  However, in this film she looks
completely out of place.  She ends up being the "typical horror movie
bimbo".
     This film is not very well written, which is rather obvious
considering the film was supposed to be a horror film and it ended up
being a comedy.  Some of the cast has completely moronic lines,
especially Karen Black.  All Ami Dolenz character seems to be written to
do is to stand around and scream.  On the other hand, the special
effects are great.

Title
Review for Delicatessen (1991)
104 min., not rated, Drama/Comedy, 1991, French w/ English subtitles
Directors: Jean-Pierre Jeunet, Marc Caro
Cast: Dominique Pinon, Marie-Laure Dougnac, Jean-Claude Dreyfuss,
      Karin Viard, Rufus, Ticky Holgado, Silvie Laguna, Jaques Mathou,
      Jean-Francois Perrier, Anne-Marie Pisani, Howard Vernon,
      Chick Ortega
     In the post-apocalypse future, when fresh meat is almost impossible
to come by, Jean-Claude Dreyfuss runs a delicatessen/apartment house.
Dreyfuss gets meat for his delicatessen by getting handy men to come to
the apartment building, and after they have done some work, Dreyfuss
slaughters them.  After clown Doninique Pinon's partner is killed by
roving savages for meat, he goes to work for Dreyfuss as a handyman, not
knowing what his fate is going to be.  Marie-Laure Dougnac, Dreyfuss's
daughter, falls in love with Pinon and tries to save him from Dreyfuss.
     I found DELICATESSEN to be an extremely enjoyable film, and highly
recommend it to anyone who has a taste for the bizarre.  I have been
waiting since I saw the first review on DELICATESSEN for it to come to
my local art/import theater so I could see it because it sounded really
good.  I am pleased to say that after seeing the film I am really happy
that I went to see it.  It was better than I expected it to be.  On a
scale of zero to five I give DELICATESSEN a five.  DELICATESSEN is not
rated but contains violence, explicit language, and adult situations.
     The actor who I felt did the best job is Chick Ortega, who played
the mailman.  His character seemed to really have depth.  I also
thought that his character was one of the neatest, although all the
characters in the film were fascinating, and bizarre, in their own way.
The acting in the film was great.  The story line was well written.
All of the characters in the film were interesting, but weird.  I felt
myself wanting to know more about each one.  They were each unique, yet
they were all alike.  I really got drawn into this film and I would have
gone to see it again, but before I got a chance to go back the film had
finished its run as it only played for seven days.  If this film comes
to a theater near you, I highly suggest that you go see it.  I loved it
and I am not the biggest fan of foreign films.
     The scenery was bleak, yet interesting.  The world that was created
is MAD-MAX-like, which could be expected because they are both post-
apocalypse.  I found myself wondering though, what was beyond the
delicatessen, or if it was all wasteland.  The one part of the film that
I found rather hard to accept was how bad the technology was.  None of
the items used by anybody was new.  It was, I would estimate, pre-50's.
Is the film implying that all of the new technology will be wiped out
with the nuclear war?
     One last note, this film is subtitled and the language spoken is
the original language.  I prefer subtitled film to dubbed films because
it annoys me when the mouths are saying something different than what I
hear.  Those people who hate subtitling will probably get annoyed with
this film and might prefer to wait for a dubbed video cassette version
as one will probably show up.

Title
Review for Husbands and Wives (1992)
120 min., R, Comedy/Drama, 1992
Director: Woody Allen
Cast: Woody Allen, Mia Farrow, Juliette Lewis, Sidney Pollack,
      Judy Davis, Liam Neeson, Cristi Conaway, Blythe Danner
     Woody Allen's newest film, HUSBANDS AND WIVES, focuses mainly on
two couples.  The first couple, Allen, and often co-star, Mia Farrow,
are having problems with their relationship, but neither wants to break
it to the other.  The second couple, Sidney Pollack and Judy Davis, are
breaking up.
     HUSBANDS AND WIVES is definitely not one of Allen's best films.
The only people who I can suggest this film to are big fans of Woody's
work, and for those I can only recommend that they see it on video
cassette.  On a scale of zero to five, I give HUSBANDS AND WIVES a two.
HUSBANDS AND WIVES is rated R for explicit language, adult situations,
adult humor, and brief female nudity.
     The biggest problem with this film is the camera techniques used.
The film at least looks like it was shot with a hand held camera, so
motion is very jerky.  At some points when the camera pans to follow
somebody moving, it moves so quickly that everything becomes blurry.  If
more professional looking camera techniques had been used, the film
would probably have gotten a rating between a three and a four (with
reservations).
     The other main problem with this film is that at some points it
seems to want to be a comedy, whereas in others it seems to want to be a
drama.  If the film had been evened out so that the comedy and drama was
equal in each scene, the film would have ended up much better.  If
viewed as a drama, forgetting about the few comic bits and ignoring the
horrendous feeling I got from the camera work in the opening scene,
HUSBANDS AND WIVES is able to squeak a three out of me.
     One other distraction that comes to mind is the frequent jump cuts
that disrupt the viewing.  All of the cast does a wonderful job and in
that aspect this film is perfect.  Another good aspect of the film is
the documentary type style that Woody uses.  It is original and makes up
for some of the lousier parts of the film.  The hand held camera works
in the rooms with the interviewer because I got the feeling that I was
there in the room watching what was going on.
     I much preferred Woody's other film that was released this year in
my area, SHADOWS AND FOG, although that didn't get as good reviews from
the critics.  My suggestion, rent the video for HUSBANDS AND WIVES (when
it comes out, of course) along with your favorite Woody film (mine is
EVERYTHING YOU EVER WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT SEX* BUT WERE AFRAID TO ASK)
which will make up for the disappointing parts of this film.

Title
Review for Naked Lunch (1991)
120 min., R, Drama, 1991
Director: David Cronenberg
Cast: Peter Weller, Judy Davis, Ian Holm, Julian Sands, Roy Scheider,
      Monique Mercere, Nicholas Campbell, Robert A. Silverman
     During 1950's in New York City bug exterminator Peter Weller gets
introduced to injecting bug powder into himself by his wife Judy Davis.
He gets addicted and starts hallucinating.  He sees giant bugs which
start controlling his life, as he sinks lower and lower.
     I really can't recommend this film to anyone, because most people
will hate this film.  It is really bizarre and at some points it seems
to be a pointless jumble of nothing.  Other people will probably really
like this film.  I personally felt the film was okay, it wasn't the best
film I have ever seen, but I thought that it was worth watching.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give NAKED LUNCH a three.  NAKED LUNCH is rated
R for explicit language and adult situations.
     NAKED LUNCH is very bizarre, especially when Weller is under the
influence of the bug powder, and I think that this turned a lot of
people off on the film.  The bugs were well created, especially the
typewriter bug.  I think that a lot of thought went into the design and
it greatly improved the film.  Peter Weller (ROBOCOP) put in a wonderful
performance, along with the rest of the cast.
     I think that the bugs were the best part of the film.  As I
mentioned earlier, they were really creative.  I don't think that I have
ever experienced a film like this one before.  I got the feeling during
the film that I was the one high on the powder and the movie was my
hallucination (I know this isn't true because other film reviews on it
have come out.  Philosophy students might want to argue that this isn't
proof, but it is to me.).
     I haven't yet read the book NAKED LUNCH by William S. Burroughs,
but I have heard it has little to do with the film.  NAKED LUNCH is now
out on video, but I would suggest that if the film sounds interesting to
you that you seek out an art theater that is still playing it.  I saw
the film at my local art theater, and after thinking about it, I feel
that a lot of the impact of the film has will be lost on video
cassette.  If the film doesn't sound interesting to you, I would suggest
that you don't bother to see it, even off video cassette, because you
probably wouldn't like it.

Title
Review for Chaplin (1992)
149 min., PG-13, Drama, 1993
Director: Richard Attenborough
Cast: Robert Downey, Jr., Moira Kelly, Anthony Hopkins, Milla Jovovich,
      Dan Aykroyd, Geraldine Chaplin, Kevin Dunn, Kevin Kline,
      Diane Lane, Penelope Ann Miller, Paul Rhys, John Thaw,
      Marisa Tomei, Nancy Travis, James Woods
     Robert Downey, Jr., plays the legendary Charlie Chaplin.  This
film traces the life of Charlie Chaplin, starting with his entrance into
show business.  Most of the film is spent covering Chaplin's movie
career and sex life.
     CHAPLIN is an excellent film, which I highly recommend that you
see.  Although the film is almost two and a half hours long, it doesn't
slow down or get boring.  CHAPLIN is very well done and mixed with
comedy (which is appropriate because Charlie Chaplin was a comedian) so
that it doesn't get over dramatic.  This film is very well written.  On
a scale of zero to five, I give CHAPLIN a five.  CHAPLIN is rated PG-13
for female nudity, explicit language, and adult situations.  How this
film managed to get a PG-13 rating, I don't know.
     I expect that, at least, one cast member will be nominated for an
Academy Award (an Oscar).  The entire cast is superb.  Robert Downey,
Jr., (1969, TUFF TURF) was an excellent choice to play Charlie Chaplin.
He does an excellent job and brings life to Chaplin.  Moira Kelly (THE
CUTTING EDGE, LOVE LIES AND MURDER) has a double role in this film.  She
plays Charlie Chaplin first love and his last love.  She does an
excellent job with both roles.  Anthony Hopkins (THE BOUNTY, SILENCE OF
THE LAMBS) does an okay job as a fictional character.  He was put in the
film so Charlie Chaplin would have somebody to tell his life story to.
I don't think that Anthony Hopkins added anything to this film.  Milla
Jovovich (RETURN TO THE BLUE LAGOON, KUFFS) plays Charlie Chaplin's
underage lover.  Milla Jovovich gives a very good performance.
     Dan Aykroyd (DRIVING MISS DAISY, NEIGHBORS) is great as the film
maker who starts Charlie Chaplin in films.  Aykroyd has a comical
character and is a great asset to the film.  Geraldine Chaplin (BOLERO
[1982 version], DR. ZHIVAGO), who is Charlie Chaplin's daughter, plays
Charlie Chaplin's mother in the film.  She does an outstanding job, and
I hope to see her get nominated for an Academy Award.  Kevin Dunn (ONLY
THE LONELY) gives a good performance as J.  Edgar Hoover.  He doesn't
add much to the film though.  Kevin Kline (A FISH CALLED WANDA, GRAND
CANYON) gives an excellent performance, per his usual, as an action film
actor.  Kevin Kline adds a lot to the film.  Diane Lane (LONESOME DOVE,
THE OUTSIDERS) plays another one of Charlie Chaplin's lovers.  She does
a great job.  Penelope Ann Miller (DOWNTOWN, KINDERGARTEN COP) is great.
Paul Rhys (VINCENT AND THEO) is very good as Charlie Chaplin's brother.
James Woods (ONCE UPON A TIME IN AMERICA, THE HARD WAY) is on briefly as
a lawyer.

Title
Review for Desperate Rescue: The Cathy Mahone Story (1992) (TV)
98 min., not rated, Drama, 1993, Made-for-American-Television
Director: Richard Colla
Cast: Mariel Hemingway, Clancy Brown, Jeff Kober, James Russo,
      Lindsey Haun, Andrew Masset, Graham Beckel, Laura Innes,
      Maria O'Brien
     Andrew Masset, Mariel Hemingway's ex-husband, abducts their
daughter Lindsey Haun and goes to his home country of Jordan.  The
United States government won't help Hemingway get Haun back, because by
Jordanian laws Masset has all rights over her.  Hemingway hires three
ex-Delta Force commandos to help her get back her daughter.
     DESPERATE RESCUE: THE CATHY MAHONE STORY aired on NBC on January
18.  I expect because of the high quality of this film, that it will be
repeated again, and may possibly be released on home video.  DESPERATE
RESCUE is an excellent film that I highly recommend you attempt to see.
DESPERATE RESCUE is of such high quality, that it doesn't look like a
television film, but like a theatrical release.  This film appears to
have a large budget, which the film makers used very well.  I give
DESPERATE RESCUE a five on a scale of zero to five.
     The performances in this film are excellent.  Especially Mariel
Hemingway ("Civil Wars", STEAL THE SKY); and Clancy Brown (BAD BOYS,
HIGHLANDER), Jeff Kober (THE FIRST POWER), and James Russo (COLD HEAVEN,
BEVERLY HILLS COP), who played the ex-Delta Force commandos.  Lindsey
Haun also gives a great performance and Andrew Masset gives a very good
performance.
      The locations used for this film are excellent.  DESPERATE RESCUE
was partly filmed in Israel, where some of the film actually takes
place, and the scenery is beautiful.  The buildings used, of which I
expect most really exist, are excellent and the vehicles used are great.
     DESPERATE RESCUE is very well written and kept up my interest
throughout the film.  The film starts out a little slow, but the rest of
the film more than makes up for it.  The film is based on a true story.
How closely the film follows what really happened, I don't know.

Title
Review for Other People's Money (1991)
90 min, R, Comedy, 1991
Director: Norman Jewison
Cast: Danny DeVito, Gregory Peck, Penelope Ann Miller, Piper Laurie
     Danny DeVito owns a business that buys up businesses that are worth
more money dead than alive.  Then, after the business has been bought
up, the company liquidates the business and makes money.  DeVito sets
his sights on a small company based in Rhode Island called New England
Wire and Cable, which is making very little but could be worth a lot of
money.  When the owners of New England Wire and Cable find out what
DeVito plans to do they hire lawyer Penelope Ann Miller to help save the
business.
     OTHER PEOPLE'S MONEY is rated R for explicit language, adult
situations, and adult humor.  I give OTHER PEOPLE'S MONEY a three on a
zero to five scale.  This film is not Danny DeVito's best film, but, it
is not his worst.  (His worst film, in my opinion, was a 1972 Italian
film called LADY LIBERTY which was directed by Mario Manicelli.)  I don't
suggest seeing OTHER PEOPLE'S MONEY for full price but it is well worth
seeing at a matinee price or you might want to wait until OTHER PEOPLE'S
MONEY comes to video.
     One of the two major problems with this film is that it tries to be
a comedy while also trying to be a drama.  In some cases this would
work, but not totally in this film.  The film tries to portray a serious
message and then makes you laugh.  What usually ends up happening is
that people forget the message that they just heard.  The other problem
that I think hurt this film is that when an actor becomes a star, the
film industry figures that anyone will go see the film.  The film
industry doesn't put as much money into writing the film as they maybe
should hoping that the star can carry the film.  That might be the case
for this film.
     Don't get me wrong, OTHER PEOPLE'S MONEY is a very funny film, it
just could have been better.  Danny DeVito is able to carry the film
through the slow spots it hits and Penelope Ann Miller puts in a great
performance.  In short, okay film especially if you are a big fan of
Danny DeVito.

Title
Review for Cook the Thief His Wife & Her Lover, The (1989)
123 min., NC-17, Drama/Comedy, 1990
Director: Peter Greenaway
Cast: Richard Bohringer, Michael Gambon, Helen Mirren, Alan Howard,
      Tim Roth, Liz Smith
     Almost all of this film takes place in a fancy restaurant.  Thief
Michael Gambon owns a very fancy French restaurant and dines there
nightly with his wife Helen Mirren.  Helen Mirren spies diner Richard
Bohringer in the restaurant.  Richard Bohringer and Helen Mirren start a
nightly affair in various parts of the restaurant, while Michael Gambon
is dining in the main dining room room.  The head cook at the restaurant
hides Helen Mirren and Richard Bohringer's activity from Michael Gambon.
     I think that THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE, AND HER LOVER is
British director Peter Greenaway's most famous film to date (partially,
I think, because it was one of the first films to receive the NC-17
rating).  I was first exposed to Peter Greenaway with his film
PROSPERO'S BOOKS, which I hated.  Because of a recommendation from a
reader, I then tried his film DROWNING BY NUMBERS, which I thought was
great.  So, after what I thought of DROWNING BY NUMBERS, I thought I
would try another one of Greenaway's films, namely this one.  I am
pleased to say that I liked this film very much.
     I can't recommend this film to the average film goer, because you
would probably hate it.  I can recommend this film to those who have had
exposure to Greenaway's work and enjoyed it, those who enjoy weird films
(like SANTA SANGRE), those who are bored with modern cinema, and those
who like to try different types of films.  Those of you who have seen
PROSPERO'S BOOKS and disliked it still might want to give this film (and
DROWNING BY NUMBERS) a try for I feel that they are very different.  On
a scale of zero to five, I give THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE, AND HER
LOVER a four.  THE COOK, THE THIEF, HIS WIFE, AND HER LOVER is rated
NC-17 for male nudity, female nudity, violence, explicit language, and
adult situations.
     Don't let the NC-17 rating scare you away from this film.  Like
the films WHORE, SANTA SANGRE, and HENRY AND JUNE, this is not a porno
film.  If the NC-17 rating does scare you, I believe that there is a cut
R rated version, which you could try to find.  This is, however, not a
film for the squeamish because there are several scenes that are
disgusting (nothing that is anything worse than some of the things that
Monty Python has done in the past).  I saw this film on video cassette,
and as with other films by Greenaway, this film is best seen on a big
screen.  I don't believe that this film is still playing in theaters, so
you will most likely have to see it on video cassette.
     One of the things that Peter Greenaway plays with in this film is
colors.  When watching the film pay attention to the different colored
rooms, or areas, and the furnishings and clothing.  Also pay close
attention to a person's clothing when they change rooms.  I think that
this idea is clever, and makes the film seem different.  The sets were
very well designed to go according to the different color schemes in
this film.  Also Greenaway made very good use of colored lights,
especially in the kitchen.
     The people in this film are great.  Several of the people in this
film I have never seen before, but they did an excellent job.  Richard
Bohringer was excellent as "The Lover."  His best scene is when Michael
Gambon first goes over to talk to him.  Michael Gambon (MOBSTERS) was
great as "The Thief."  I think that he gave the best performance in this
film.  His character was extremely rude and vulgar, and Gambon seems to
fit this role perfectly.  Helen Mirren (WHERE ANGELS FEAR TO TREAD) was
good as "His Wife."  Her performance changed perfectly when she changed
from being with Michael Gambon to being with Richard Bohringer.  The
person who played "The Cook" (Alan Howard, I think) was also great.  Tim
Roth (ROSENCRANTZ AND GUILDENSTERN ARE DEAD) as one of Michael Gambon's
acquaintances, even though he was not around for much, was excellent.
Writer/Director Peter Greenaway has made an excellent film that makes me
want to find the other films by him that I have not seen yet.

Title
Review for Amy Fisher: My Story (1992) (TV)
99 min., not rated, Drama, 1992, Made-for-television
Director: Bradford May
Cast: Noelle Parker, Ed Marinaro, Boyd Kestner, Pierrette Grace,
      Lawrence Dane, Kate Lynch, Kathleen Laskey
     I am sure that everybody has heard the story by now, but will
briefly go over it just in case somebody missed it.  Long Island
teenager Amy Fisher (Noelle Parker) met Joe Buttafucco (Ed Marinaro),
who worked at an autobody shop.  Fisher and Buttafucco started to have an
affair with, in the end, will have Fisher attempting to kill Joe
Buttafucco's wife so she can have Joe to herself.
     AMY FISHER: MY STORY is the first of three television films that
are being aired about the Amy Fisher story.  AMY FISHER: MY STORY is
told from the side of Amy Fisher.  The film is supposedly based on facts
as stated by Amy Fisher.  How much of the film is fact and how much is
fiction, I don't know, but the film makes good watching.  This film was
very well done and even if very little is actual fact, I enjoyed
watching it.  On a scale of zero to five, I give AMY FISHER: MY STORY a
four.
     After the Amy Fisher story became known in May of '92, three of the
four major television networks rushed to film the story first.  NBC won,
with this film, the other two networks ABC, with BEYOND CONTROL: THE AMY
FISHER STORY starring Drew Barrymore, and CBS, with CASUALTIES OF LOVE:
THE 'LONG ISLAND LOLITA' STORY starring Alyssa Milano, will be airing
theirs on the same night a week after NBC ran this film.  I will attempt
to view the other versions as well and do reviews on them.
     The actors and actresses in the film do a good job.  Noelle Parker
(ERNEST SAVES CHRISTMAS, TWISTED) does an exceptionable job as Amy
Fisher.  As well as doing such a good job, Parker looks more like Amy
Fisher than the other two actresses that have been picked.  Her
performance as Amy Fisher was completely convincing, and the backbone to
the film.  Ed Marinaro gives an outstanding performance as Joe
Buttafucco.  Even though his character is a complete sleaze, Marinaro's
performance gives him some humanity.
     The film seems rather well written.  However, from what I have read
in articles and heard on the news, Amy Fisher was not exactly as she was
written.  She evidently had more bad habits than the film showed, but
the film might have been trying to be nice to her (it is giving her side
of the story).

Title
Review for Revenge of the Nerds III: The Next Generation (1992) (TV)
96 min., not rated, Comedy, 1992, made for television
Director: Roland Mesa
Cast: Robert Carradine, Ted McGinley, Curtis Armstrong,
      Julie Montgomery, Gregg Binkley, Richard Israel,
      Morton Downey, Jr., John Pinette, Grant Heslov,
      Henry Cho, Tim Conlon, Bernie Casey, Jamie Cromwell,
      Larry B. Scott, Brian Tochi, Mike Greenwood
     Adams College, the site of the original nerds movie, is now run by
nerds.  The Tri-Lambda fraternity is now number one and Alpha Beta, the
very popular jock frat from the original film, is now the lowest of the
frats.  Robert Carradine, one of the original nerds, is now married to
Julie Montgomery, jock Ted McGinley's girlfriend from the original, and
working at the Computer Center at the College.  Carradine refuses to
admit that he was a nerd in his past and tries to hide it from himself
now.  His son Gregg Binkley is now going to Adams as a freshman and has
joined the Tri-Lambda frat.  McGinley gets put in as dean of the
College, and since he hates nerds, starts a war against them.  He has
the Alpha Beta's start war against the Tri-Lambda's and causes a war
between the jocks and the nerds.
     REVENGE OF THE NERDS is one of the best films that I have ever
seen.  REVENGE OF THE NERDS 2: NERDS IN PARADISE is quite possibly the
worst film that I have ever seen.  I figured that REVENGE OF THE NERDS
3: THE NEXT GENERATION couldn't be as bad or worse than NERDS 2; I was
wrong!  It sucks!  It is pathetically worse than awful!  There is no way
that I can recommend this film to anybody unless you are a couch potato
that will watch anything; it is just a piece of garbage.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give NERDS 3 a zero.
     The beginning of the problem lies in its story line, which was
written by Steve Zacharias and Jeff Buhai.  It starts out as a carbon
copy of REVENGE OF THE NERDS, with two nerds in a car going to Adams
College figuring out what time they will reach the campus (sound
familiar?).  At this point I was starting to ask myself, what have I
gotten myself into?  Now, here comes the *big* difference, the
fraternities have changed their roles.  Wow, I am thinking, a lot of
work went into this film!  Now the rest of the film is based on the war
between the frats and Robert Carradine having to remember that he is a
nerd (which you will remember he did at the end of the first film--boy
is he forgetful!).  The war, which is the high point of the film, isn't
even very interesting.  In the first film the war was great; the pigs at
the party, the panty raid, the fake initiation, the pies.  None of this
stuff here, now we will resort to throwing people into pools and writing
"nerd" onto the back of someone's head.  Interesting stuff, huh?  Now,
during this war we are supposed to root for these nerds.  In the first
film there was no problem with that because they were cool people, but
in this film they are just stupid.  Then came along Booger, Curtis
Armstrong, from REVENGE OF THE NERDS, just maybe my favorite character.
Now I figured that the film will get going good.  No chance, not even
his role was well written.  He had lost all of his charm.  Now comes the
big finale, and if you are still awake at this point you deserve a
medal; if not, don't feel bad, you don't miss anything.  I am glad that
I rewatched REVENGE OF THE NERDS before viewing this film, that way I
can remember a time when the nerds were funny and great to watch.  Let's
hope nobody gets the bright idea (?) to write a REVENGE OF THE NERDS 4:
NERDS GETTING PUT DOWN AT THE WORKPLACE or something like that.
     The acting, in nerds, jocks, nerd alumni, and jock alumni is
horrible.  Even the experienced (?) actors in the film (Robert
Carradine, Ted McGinley, Curtis Armstrong, Julie Montgomery, and Morton
Downey, Jr.)  look pathetic.  It doesn't look like anyone tried too hard
to make this film look good.  The new nerds are about as convincing as a
banana pretending to be a pineapple.  I don't know where they got these
actors but they must not have tried too hard.  When Morton Downey, Jr.
came on the screen I figured that he would put a little effort into his
role, but that was wishful thinking.  Now, you would expect something
from Robert Carradine, a two-time nerder.  After he falls flat and
Curtis Armstrong comes on I said now the movie has been saved.  Now I
am saying maybe Downey, Jr.'s acting isn't that bad after all!  I have
never thought much of Ted McGinley ("Married...  with Children") but in
this film he seems to be trying the hardest.  Poor Julie Montgomery
(billed as Julia Montgomery) the script doesn't give her a chance to do
anything.  Maybe she could have saved this film, but by this time I
think it had sunk into the pit of no return.
     The sets were rather good.  They were the best part of the film I
think.  They looked realistic and that is good enough.  The
cinematography was okay, but nothing really spectacular.  If you missed
this film when it ran on Monday night on the Fox Television Network,
don't feel sorry for yourself--consider yourself lucky.  If you did
watch it, I feel sorry for you, and if you stayed through the entire
film, you are a very strong person.  If you like the nerds, I suggest
watching REVENGE OF THE NERDS again and forgetting about this one (and
REVENGE OF THE NERDS 2: NERDS IN PARADISE for that matter).
     Spoilers: only read on after seeing the film (or if you aren't
going to bother seeing the film you may continue).
     The biggest letdown in the film, at least for me, was the ending.
First of all I could see it coming from a mile away and knew just about
what was going to happen.  That really spoiled the *BIG (??)* climax.
Then when the old frat mates of Robert Carradine came in I was very
disappointed for a few reasons.  First of all Anthony Edwards, who
played Carradine's best friend, didn't come back; instead they had a
cheap imposter, Mike Greenwood, who looks nothing like Edwards.  Second
of all, the only frat mates who showed up were the homosexual, Larry B.
Scott, the oriental, Brian Tochi, the little smart dude, Carradine's
father, Cromwell, and the leader of the Tri-Lambda national office,
Bernie Casey.  What happened to all the other people?  Did they think
that we would just forget about them?  Most likely I think that those
actors, and Anthony Edwards, didn't want to have anything to do with
this mess and listened to Nancy Reagan and "Just Said No."

Title
Review for Hot Shots! (1991)
[The names on the From:- and by-lines are correct; this is by a family
member of the account owner.  -Moderator]
90 min, PG-13, Comedy, 1991
Director: Jim Abrahams
Cast: Charlie Sheen, Cary Elwes, Valeria Golino, Jon Cryer,
      Lloyd Bridges, Kristy Swanson, Bruce A. Young
Synopsis: Hot-shot Sheen was kicked out of the Air Force when he
endangered another recruit.  The Air Force goes to the Indian
reservation he is now living at to ask him to come back.  On his way
back to the Air Force base he sees Golino.  He falls in love with her
but she is currently seeing another man in the Air Force.  Sheen makes
it to the Air Force base where personnel are being briefed on the next
assignment.  Some of the men want Sheen taken off the mission because he
is a hot shot.  An evil organization wants to keep Sheen on the mission
to make the Air Force look bad.  Sheen tries to win over Golino in his
spare time.
      The film is rated PG-13 for explicit language, adult situations,
violence, and adult humor.
      Sorry it took so long to get this film review out.  I saw HOT
SHOTS on its opening night and I have not had time since then to do the
review on it.   I recommend running out to the theater to see it, while
it is still there, if you liked THE NAKED GUN 2-1/2 as it is much in the
same style.  This was written by Jim Abrahams and Pat Proft (who wrote
for the "Police Squad!" television series).  The director, Abrahams, has
also done the slapstick films AIRPLANE! and TOP SECRET!.  If you liked
either of these films I recommend seeing this film.  This is unlike
Abrahams' more recent comedies like WELCOME HOME ROXY CARMICHAEL and BIG
BUSINESS.  I give this film a four on a zero to five scale.
      Most of the scenes shown in the advertisements for the movie
happen during the credits (e.g., the man roasting his hot dog in the
jet's after-burner).  In the next ninety minutes the jokes come one
after another.   Lloyd Bridges (who was also in AIRPLANE! and the not
as good sequel AIRPLANE 2: THE SEQUEL) plays the commander of the
mission.  As we find out by the end of the film (and had probably
guessed earlier) Bridges has had most of his body replaced with metal,
from accidents in the war, which leads to 1/3 of the jokes.  Some of
these may start to wear on you though.  Half of the comedy in the film
is based on Charlie Sheen and Cary Elwes both fighting over Valeria
Golino.  Sheen and Golino have what may be the most interesting sex
scene in movie history, the two of them and an array of vegetables.

Title
Review for Amy Fisher Story, The (1993) (TV)
1:42, not rated, Drama, 1993, Made-for-American-Television
Director: Andy Tennant
Cast: Drew Barrymore, Anthony John Denison, Harley Jane Kozak,
      Tom Mason, Laurie Paton, Ken Pogue, Linda Darlow
     Drew Barrymore plays Amy Fisher (the Long Island Lolita) who was
accused of attempting to murder Mary Jo Buttafuoco because Fisher was
having an affair with Mary Jo's husband Joe (Anthony John Denison).
     BEYOND CONTROL: THE AMY FISHER STORY is ABC's version of the Amy
Fisher case.  Even though this was supposed to be the best of the Amy
Fisher movies, CBS's CASUALTIES OF LOVE: THE 'LONG ISLAND LOLITA' STORY
was better.  BEYOND CONTROL aired on January 3 and is scheduled to be
released on video cassette on March 31.  I only suggest watching this
version if you are a fan of Drew Barrymore, or you have seen the other
two versions and still don't know who Amy Fisher is!  On a scale of
zero to five, I give BEYOND CONTROL a four.  The video cassette version
(which I believe is being released under the name THE AMY FISHER STORY)
will contain scenes that ABC was unable to show on television.
     The cast for this film is of normal television film quality.  Drew
Barrymore (GUNCRAZY, FAR FROM HOME) who normally would be excellent in
this role, wasn't up to her normal standards.  I was expecting more
from her in this role and was disappointed in the performance that she
gave.  Anthony John Denison was reasonably good as Joey Buttafuoco.  He
didn't hurt, nor help, the film.  Harley Jane Kozak (ARACHNOPHOBIA,
NECESSARY ROUGHNESS) gave the best performance in this film as the
reporter who is investigating the Amy Fisher case.
     BEYOND CONTROL, instead of being one sided like NBC's AMY FISHER:
MY STORY (r.a.r.m.# 1664) and CBS's CASUALTIES OF LOVE:  THE 'LONG
ISLAND LOLITA' STORY, is from court testimony and doesn't appear to be
biased.  Of the three versions, I felt this one had the weakest
writing.  I suggest that you watch CASUALTIES OF LOVE (which is
currently set to be released on video cassette on April 7) instead.

Title
Review for Basic Instinct (1992)
130 min., R, Mystery, 1992
Director: Paul Verhoeven
Cast: Michael Douglas, Sharon Stone, Jeanne Tripplehorn,
      George Dzundza, Bruce A. Young, Stephen Tobolowsky
     A retired rockstar is found dead, stabbed multiple times with an
ice pick, after having sexual intercourse.  The only suspect that the
police can come up with is Sharon Stone, the rockstar's lover (not
girlfriend).  When the police bring her in for questioning her alibi is
that about six months before she had published a book that described the
killing exactly the way it happened.  Cop Michael Douglas feels that
Stone did the killing and is intent on proving it.  He finds out right
after he starts his investigation that Stone is writing another book,
about a cop that falls for the wrong woman.  As Douglas does his
investigation, Stone starts playing with him and messing with his head.
     For the most part BASIC INSTINCT is a very enjoyable film to watch.
Because of a few problems that I will describe later, I only suggest
that you go to see BASIC INSTINCT for matinee prices.  BASIC INSTINCT
keeps you guessing the entire time that you are watching the film.  It
introduces two characters that might have done the deed, and I found
myself switching my suspicion back and forth as the film went on.  On a
scale of zero to five, I give BASIC INSTINCT a four.  BASIC INSTINCT is
rated R for female nudity, graphic violence, explicit language, adult
situations, and adult humor.
     Recently, some people have been slamming this film, but I don't
think that it is really that bad.  Sure, it has its problems, but while
watching the film you don't realize most of them.  The film runs along
rather smoothly (except for the fact that the projectionist messed up
and I ended up with a ten-minute intermission in the middle of the film
while the mistake was being corrected) except for the very end.  There
the film almost falls apart and becomes muddled and confusing.  For this
reason that I suggest that you go to a matinee performance, and that way
you won't feel cheated after seeing the end.
     There are some plot problems as the film progresses, but for the
most part they are minor ones.  The problems really don't harm the
viewing of the film.  There are also a few things that I wish had been
explained more thoroughly that were hinted at during the film, but that
doesn't really hinder the film either.  For the most part, unless you
go to the theater expecting a cinematic marvel, you won't really end up
being too disappointed with the final product.
     A few of the characters introduced in the film don't really seem to
serve a purpose.  The character is introduced and then is mostly
discarded.  I feel that either these characters should have been left
out or they should have been added to so that they fit into the film
better.  Others are introduced briefly, and then used quickly, and then
discarded.  These characters should have also been better written so
that they fit into the film better.  It would have made a much cleaner
finished product.
     Another plot problem is a lot of the incidents that happen in the
film are too perfect.  Too many things happen at exactly the right time,
that in real life would have never happened that perfectly.  This really
should have been corrected to try to make the film more believable.  I
know that I have really been ragging on this film and it may sound like
I really didn't enjoy the film too much.  Actually, I did enjoy the film
a lot and am not upset that I went and saw it.  The acting in the film
is wonderful.  Michael Douglas and Sharon Stone don't have as much
charisma as they could, but they make do.  There are several unexpected
twists in the plot that catch you off guard and most of the questions I
came up with in the film were answered.  For the most part I feel that
Paul Verhoeven did a good job directing the film.  For most of the
scenes good camera angles were used to show you enough so that you know
what is happening, but don't show you enough to give away so much that
you can tell what is about to happen next.
     Joe Eszterhaz wrote the screenplay and he did a rather good job.
He could have left out a few of the liberal sex scenes that were
scattered through the film and tightened up the ending a bit so that it
made more sense.  For the slow parts in the film Joe seemed to feel that
a solution is a sex scene, which doesn't fix the problem.  It just
momentarily puts it off, but it comes back later.  I feel that if he had
smoothed out the screenplay so it wasn't quite as choppy, the film would
have been much better.  Maybe I am really being hard on the screenplay,
but I feel that it is one of the most important parts of a film, so I
feel that it should have half a decent effort put into it.
     The score by Jerry Goldsmith is very well done.  It really seemed
to capture me and pull me a bit into the film.  It isn't distracting and
overpowering so as to pull your attention away from the film, but rather
is used to focus you more intensely on some scenes and to prepare you
for something to happen.  The cinematography is well done in the film
and helps make the film more enjoyable.
     This is probably not a film that you will want to bring young
children to.  There is a considerable amount of gratuitous nudity
throughout the film, some rather graphic deaths, and some rather coarse
language.  There has been a lot of controversy over the depiction of
lesbians and bisexuals in this film, and I really don't see what all the
fuss is about.  They don't really put down lesbians or bisexuals.
Neither do they state that they all become murderers.  So I really don't
think that it is worth all the bother that has been given to it.  
     There is some Hollywood stereotyping done through the film, which
was a bit of a downfall for me.  The males seem, somehow, superior to
all the females in the film, and the females usually use their sex to
get what they wanted.  This was more of a problem for me than the
lesbian part.  In some parts of the film it almost totally puts down
women by making it look like they have to use their bodies to get what
they want.  I really don't think that this is fair to women, and some
women after seeing the film will be disgusted at the stereotyping.
     This is the part that I feel was the biggest put-down in the film.
Women have worked to get themselves above exploitation level and then
something like this comes along and just puts them down.  I really feel
that someone should have seen the stereotyping in the film before it was
released and had it written out for the most part.  The stereotyping, I
feel, is more of a degradation to women in general, not just lesbians or
bisexuals, but to the entire female population.
     So use your discretion on whether to go to a late night performance
and pay more.  I do think that the film is worth watching even though I
came down on the film so hard.  It is just that the film has flaws, like
any film.  And the flaws in this film are much more noticeable after
you have seen the film, than in some that I have seen.  Some of you
might wait until the film comes to video before seeing it.  There is
nothing that would really be lost on a small screen so there is nothing
wrong with this.  You should definitely go to see this film though.
Whether you see it on video or not is your choice, but it is definitely
a good movie and definitely worth seeing.

Title
Review for Newsies (1992)
125 min., PG, Musical/Comedy, 1992
Director: Kenny Ortega
Cast: Christian Bale, David Moscow, Luke Edwards, Max Casella,
      Marty Belafsky, Arvie Lowe, Jr., Aaron Lohr, Trey Parker,
      Gabriel Damon, Robert Duvall, Bill Pullman, Ann-Margaret,
      Michael Lerner
     In 1899 in New York City, newspaper publisher Robert Duvall decides
to raise the cost of his newspapers to the "newsies," the people who
stand on street corners selling the papers.  The "newsies" won't be able
to survive with the new price.  Christian Bale, the leader of the
"newsies" with the help of smart David Moscow and newspaper writer Bill
Pullman leads a strike of the "newsies" until the price is brought back
down.
     NEWSIES is a very good film in the grand Disney film tradition.
Definitely one to bring your kids to, or yourself if you don't have any
kids.  This is one film that I recommend that you definitely don't miss.
On a scale of zero to five, I give NEWSIES a five.  NEWSIES is rated PG
for violence.
     I saw NEWSIES in a sneak preview at one of my local theaters.  It
is being released to theaters everywhere on April 10.  NEWSIES is the
latest film by the Walt Disney Studios.  The music is written by Alan
Menken, who most recently did Disney's THE BEAUTY AND THE BEAST (with
Howard Ashman), and the lyrics were written by Jack Feldman.  The music
for NEWSIES is very good.  The choreography for this film was done by
Kenny Ortega (who also directed the film), and he seems to have done a
very good job.  It reminds me of all those old musicals where many
people are on the screen dancing and singing.
     Like in most Disney films, the villains are totally evil and the
heros are totally good.  In NEWSIES, the villains are Robert Duvall, the
newspaper publisher, Michael Lerner, the newspaper distributor, and the
person who runs the local juvenile detention center.  The heros of the
film are Christian Bale, the leader of the "newsies," David Moscow, his
friend and fellow "newsie," and newspaper writer Bill Pullman.
     The performances in NEWSIES were great, but the person that I felt
was the best actor/actress in the film was Michael Lerner.   His
character was a real weasel (in fact the "newsies" have nicknamed his
character Weasel), always looking out for himself first and nobody else
second.

Title
Review for Woman's Tale, A (1991)
100 min., PG-13, Drama/Comedy, 1991
Director: Paul Cox
Cast: Sheila Florance, Gosia Dobrowolskia, Chris Haywood, Norman Kaye,
      Ernest Gray, Myrtle Woods
     This film is a segment in the life of an old woman, Sheila
Florance.  She embraces life with great hopes, and in ways that would
shock other people her age.
     I was surprised at how good A WOMAN'S TALE was.  It didn't look
very interesting to me, but it was part of a double feature and I wanted
to see the other film (THE DOUBLE LIFE OF VERONIQUE).  I enjoyed A
WOMAN'S TALE and suggest that you go to see it, whether you are a young
adult, a senior citizen, or in between.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give A WOMAN'S TALE a four.  A WOMAN'S TALE is rated PG-13 for adult
situations and female nudity.
     The cast in this film is great, especially Sheila Florance.  
Sheila Florance, I think, holds this film together.  Her character is
unlike what most people perceive old people to be like and Sheila
Florance seems to jump into the role.  With a different actress in the
role that Sheila Florance had, I think that this film would not have
been as good as it turned out to be.  Unfortunately, I have heard,
Sheila died shortly after the film's original release.  Gosia
Dobrowolskia is the woman who watches over Sheila Florance.  She did a
very good job, but doesn't hold the film together the way Sheila
Florance does.  The man who plays Sheila Florance's next door neighbor
(I don't remember who played him) also did a great job.  He also helps
hold the film together.  I think that the actor who was chosen to
portray him was perfectly picked.
     The film successfully combines comedy with a bleak, at least to
some people, subject.  The end result is an interesting film that makes
the viewer think while watching the film.  The film is very well
written, and provides interesting characters.  The scenes in the film
flow together smoothly and the film doesn't get too dark about the
subject of death, which otherwise could have bogged this film down.

Title
Review for Night on Earth (1991)
128 min., R, Comedy, 1992
Director: Jim Jarmusch
Cast: Winona Ryder, Gena Rowlands, Giancarlo Esposito,
      Armin Mueller-Stahl, Rosie Perez, Isaach de Bankole,
      Beatrice Dalle, Roberto Benigni, Paolo Bonacelli,
      Matti Pellonpaa, Kari Vaananen, Sakari Kuosmahen,
      Tomi Salnela, Lisanne Falk
     The film takes a look at five cab drivers, in five cities (Los
Angeles, New York, Paris, Rome, and Helinski), in one night.  The first
city, Los Angeles, has cab driver Winona Ryder taking Gena Rowlands from
the airport to her house in Beverly Hills.  The second city, New York,
has cab driver Armin Mueller-Stahl, who has just come to the U.S. from
East Germany, who can't drive a cab, and who doesn't know New York, pick
up black Giancarlo Esposito, who takes over as the driver so he can
reach his destination.  The third city, Paris, has black cab driver
Isaach de Bankole, who picks up blind Beatrice Dalle, who complains
about everything.  The fourth city, Rome, has cab driver Roberto
Benigni, who picks up priest Paolo Bonacelli, and starts confessing to
him in the cab.  The fifth city, Helinski, has Matti Pellonpaa, who
picks up three drunks, Kari Vaananen, Sakari Kuosmahen, and Tomi
Salnela, and tells them a sad story.
     For the most part, NIGHT ON EARTH is a very funny comedy.  The
cities of Los Angeles, New York, and Rome are great.  Unfortunately,
the cities of Paris and Helinski are rather boring.  Thankfully, the
funny cities make up for the two boring ones making this film definitely
worth seeing.  On a scale of zero to five, I give this film a four.  It
would have gotten a five, if it hadn't been for Paris and Helinski.  If
this film was trying to be a drama, I guess Paris and Helinski would
have fit in to the film, but then the rest would not fit.  In my area at
least, the film was advertised as a comedy, and I really don't see how
Paris and Helinski fit into a comedy, unless they are some really black
segments that I didn't get.  Anyway, I highly suggest that if NIGHT ON
EARTH comes to a theater in your general area, and you like comedies,
that this film is worth full ticket price.  NIGHT ON EARTH is rated R
for explicit language and adult situations.
     I think that this film is completely original; at least I can't
remember any others like this one.  I also think that it was a great
idea.  I think that all the actors/actresses were well picked, except
for the blind girl, Beatrice Dalle, who was in the Paris segment.  The
rest of them do a great job.  Even though I didn't like the Paris
segment, I think that Isaach de Bankole did the best job in this film.
Winona Ryder had an interesting role as the tomboy taxi driver.
     Even though you didn't know any of the people's history when each
segment started, the characters were well enough written, for the most
part, that you became interested in them, and for some, like Armin
Mueller-Stahl's character, I found myself wanting to see some more of
their adventures.  Unfortunately, others, like Kari Vaananen, Sakari
Kuosmahen, Tomi Salnela, Matti Pellonpaa, Isaach de Bankole, and
Beatrice Dalle's characters I found to be so dry, boring, and sometimes
self centered (especially Dalle's) that I didn't care at all about them.
The drunks I especially hated, I really can't say why, but for some
reason I really disliked them (the cab driver too!).  Oh well, it was
still a good film.

Title
Review for Robot Ninja (1990)
80 min., not rated, Action, 1989
Director: J.R. Bookwalter
Cast: Michael Todd, Bogdan Pecic, Maria Markovic, Floyd Ewing, Jr.,
      Bill Morrison, James L. Edwards, Michael Kemper, Jon Killough,
      J. R. Bookwalter, Burt Ward, Linnea Quigley, Scott Spiegel,
      David DeCoteau
     Todd is the artist of a comic strip about a robot ninja.  One
night he sees a couple raped and murdered by Markovic and her gang.  He
gets inventor Pecic to create a Robot Ninja suit and then he goes after
Markovic and her gang.
     My local video store just got ROBOT NINJA and as I am a fan of
Linnea Quigley, I checked it out immediately.  First off, Linnea is only
on for about five minutes.  Second, the film is a piece of garbage.  The
acting in the film is horrible.  The actors don't even look like they
care about how well the film comes out.  Not even Linnea ended up
looking good.  The film is worse than Linnea's earlier film THE BLACK
ROOM, which I thought was pitiful.  Third, the film is actually only an
hour and nine minutes long.  The other eleven minutes are the end
credits, which are the only good part of the film.  The credits have a
bit of humor thrown into them, especially the part where it says no
copying the film and that the film is in no way connected to anyone
living or dead.
     Fourth, the script was horribly written.  I had no feelings for any
of the characters.  Markovic's character is a big b**ch and Todd's
character is a complete jerk.  Todd really has no reason to go after
Markovic as he didn't even know the couple killed.  In DEATH WISH, it
was Charles Bronson's daughter and wife, but here there is absolutely no
connection between  Todd and the couple.  The actors' lines in some
parts of the film are incredibly moronic.
     Fifth, there is no end to the graphic violence.  Graphic violence
is fine when it fits into the film, but ROBOT NINJA seems to be written
around the violence.  The violence starts about five minutes into the
film and doesn't stop until the end of the film.  The gore is overdone
to an extreme.  Apparently J.R.  Bookwalter feels that the MPAA rating
system harms the creative process, so he didn't submit ROBOT NINJA for a
rating.  This is probably just as well for Mr. Bookwalter considering,
I think, that ROBOT NINJA would have received an NC-17 for graphic
violence, which would have killed most of the films potential audience.
     Technically speaking, the film is still pitiful.  The sound effects
weren't well done.  For example, at one point a person is kicking and
the sound of the kick happens before the leg moves.  The music is sad,
it doesn't even sound good (most of it was done by Mr.  Bookwalter on an
Amega).  The sound quality is low grade and it looks like the film was
shot on a hand held video recorder.
     ROBOT NINJA easily wins as one of the most awful films that I have
ever seen.  I could continue on and on about the deficiencies of this
film but I wouldn't want to waste your time or mine.  I am disappointed
in David DeCoteau, director and producer of B movies, for being the
executive producer of this film.  This makes a new low for him and for
Linnea Quigley for being in this film.  I don't recommend watching this
film even for free.  On a scale of zero to five, I give ROBOT NINJA a
zero.  ROBOT NINJA is unrated but contains graphic violence, explicit
language, and rape.

Title
Review for Blade Runner (1982)
2:05, R, Science Fiction/Action/Cult, 1992 (BLADE RUNNER was
first released in 1982)
Director: Ridley Scott
Cast: Harrison Ford, Rutger Hauer, Sean Young, Daryl Hannah,
      Edward James Olmos, Joanna Cassidy, Brion James, M. Emmet Walsh,
      William Sanderson, Joe Turkel, James Hong
     Harrison Ford is a hired Replicant hunter, who is forced out of
retirement by M. Emmet Walsh to find four escaped Replicants, robots
that look like humans and have artificial intelligence.  The replicants
have a life span of four years and their leader Rutger Hauer is trying
to find a way to make them live longer.
     BLADE RUNNER: THE DIRECTOR'S CUT is better than the original.
Harrison Ford's annoying voice-overs have been removed and some of the
scenes have been rearranged.  I recommend this film to fans of the
original BLADE RUNNER.  Those who disliked BLADE RUNNER will probably
not like BLADE RUNNER: THE DIRECTOR'S CUT.  BLADE RUNNER: THE
DIRECTOR'S CUT will probably have a greater impact if seen in the
theater.  The flying scenes will also be more dramatic in the theater.
On a scale of zero to five, I give BLADE RUNNER: THE DIRECTOR'S CUT a
five.  BLADE RUNNER: THE DIRECTOR'S CUT is rated R for female nudity,
adult situations, explicit language, and graphic violence.
     Ridley Scott (ALIEN, BLACK RAIN) has created a dark and dreary
film that will certainly not be liked by all people.  The original
version has become a cult film.  All of the cult fans of the original
version should also enjoy this version.  The film is very well written
and held my interest throughout.  There aren't many science fiction
films that I can watch the number of times that I have this one.  The
sets used for this film are excellent, however I think that someone
went overboard with the Coca-Cola name placement.
     Harrison Ford (PATRIOT GAMES, INDIANA JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE)
is great in his role.  This film is another example of why Harrison
Ford became the star that he now is.  Daryl Hannah (MEMOIRS OF AN
INVISIBLE MAN, SUMMER LOVERS) wasn't a big name star when this film
originally was released.  She is quite spectacular in her role as one
of the Replicants.  Rutger Hauer (BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER, FLESH +
BLOOD) is excellent.  He can make quite a sinister person.  Sean Young
(NO WAY OUT, SKETCH ARTIST) is good as the Replicant that Harrison Ford
falls in love with, although out of the cast, I think that she was the
weakest actress.  Brion James (ANOTHER 48 HRS., TANGO & CASH) does a
good job in his short role as a Replicant.  M. Emmet Walsh (MISSING IN
ACTION, RED SCORPION), as per his usual, does a great job with his
role.  I think Joanna Cassidy (DON'T TELL MOM THE BABYSITTER'S DEAD,
MAY WINE) was also a rather weak actress in this film.

Title
Review for Shadowzone (1990)
88 min., R, Horror/Science Fiction, 1989
Director: J.S. Cardone
Cast: David Beecroft, James Hong, Shawn Weatherly, Miguel Nunez,
      Lu Leonard, Frederick Flynn, Louise Fletcher, Maureen Flaherty,
      Robbie Rives
     In an isolated complex under the ground, a group of scientists, who
are doing experiments with dreams accidentally kill one of the
volunteers.  David Beecroft gets sent to investigate the death.  When he
arrives there, he finds out that the scientists have released a monster
from a dream dimension into the complex by mistake.  All of them are
stuck under the ground while the monster slaughters them.
     SHADOWZONE is done by Full Moon Entertainment and is distributed by
Paramount home video.  SHADOWZONE is a rather well done horror film,
that has some slight problems.  I recommend this film to people who
liked the ALIEN series.  On a scale of zero to five, I give SHADOWZONE a
three.  SHADOWZONE is rated R for female nudity, male nudity, explicit
language, and graphic violence.
     SHADOWZONE was released in 1989, but my local video store just
recently obtained it.  SHADOWZONE was never released theatrically, I
have heard that none of the Full Moon Entertainment films are ever
released to the theaters.  The biggest problem with SHADOWZONE is that,
although it seems to try hard to be original, it looks to me like a
rip-off of ALIEN.  It has the animal element, this time a monkey, but
the monster is different.  This monster can change it's size (and many
other things).
     For the most part the characters were well written.  The person who
I think the writers goofed with was James Hong's character.  For a smart
scientist, he seems to do some rather stupid things.  The
actors/actresses all do a great job however, which makes the movie all
that more enjoyable.  Another problem with the film is that the monster
comes through a dream door from a dream dimension.  For me it is a bit
hard to accept the fact that a dream dimension can send material objects
into the real world (although the film somewhat covers that aspect).
     Another problem with the film is that I felt ripped off with the
ending.  It doesn't fit with the continuity of the film and looks like
it was hastily written.  They should have worked harder on the ending.
The film did, however, make the underground laboratory seem spooky and
foreboding.

Title
Review for My Own Private Idaho (1991)
102 min., R, Drama, 1991
Director: Gus Van Sant
Cast: River Phoenix, Keanu Reeves, James Russo, William Richert,
      Rodney Harvey, Michael Parker, Flea, Chiara Saselli, Udo Kier
     River Phoenix is a narcoleptic (a disorder in the brain that causes
the person to go into a temporary coma-like state at times) street
hustler.  River Phoenix decides to try to find his mother, who he hasn't
seen for years.  He goes on the journey with his friend Keanu Reeves,
who is the son of the mayor.  Along the way the two have a problem
trying to locate River Phoenix's mother because she moved around a lot.
Also along the way they are  followed, it seems, by gay Udo Kier.
     I saw MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO several weeks ago and am just getting
around to writing my review on it.  I have found out that it is coming
to video around April 22 and would like to discourage people from
wasting their money renting this film.  I found both the story and the
acting to be pitiful.  By the end I hated River Phoenix's character and
hoped that he never met his mother just because I wasted my time sitting
though the film.  MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO is rated R for explicit language,
adult situations, and female nudity.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
MY OWN PRIVATE IDAHO a one.
     The only redeeming quality that this film has, and the only reason
this film even received a one, is the cinematography -- especially the
Idaho sequences.  Those I found to be impressive to watch, but,
unfortunately that wonderfulness will be lost on a small screen.  So, if
you must watch this film, which I highly don't recommend, then watch it
in a theater, but in a relatively cheap theater so you don't waste too
much of your money.  The acting, I found, in this film was crude.  It
looked like the actors called in the performances instead of really
being there.  I felt no sympathy for any of the people in the film, not
a bit.

Title
Review for Mr. Baseball (1992)
105 min., PG-13, Comedy, 1992
Director: Fred Schepisi
Cast: Tom Selleck, Dennis Haysbert, Ken Takakura, Art La Fleur
     Tom Selleck, a major league ball player, is in a slump.  His team
trades him to a Japanese team.  In Japan, Selleck finds that many of the
customs are different than in the U.S., and he must learn to cope with
them.
     MR. BASEBALL is a funny, but pointless comedy.  This is a movie
just to go, watch, and have fun, no thought required.  In other words, I
loved it.  I suggest that fans of comedies see this film.  It doesn't
matter whether you see this film in the theater or on video cassette, it
will be just as good either way.   If you go to the theater, I suggest
matinee prices only.  I expect this film to be a box office bomb, and
then will be a hit on home video, just because so many good films are
out or coming soon that this one will get left behind.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give MR. BASEBALL a four.  MR. BASEBALL is rated PG-13
for explicit language, adult situations, and adult humor.
     Tom Selleck hasn't had a really good film since THREE MEN AND A
BABY that I have seen.  This film isn't going to make him a star again,
but it is on the right track.  The advertisements made this film look
like the stupidest film of 1992, so, of course, I went out to see it; it
was, and so I loved it.
     One basic problem with the film is that it tried to get emotional
at the end and that didn't fit with the rest of the film.  The beginning
of the film is about the society differences between America and Japan.
The end turns into a love tale between Selleck and a Japanese woman.
Unfortunately the humor lags there and the film starts to drag along.
The baseball part is absolutely hilarious and made the film worth going
to.
     All the people in the film do a great job, although that isn't
hard.  And the direction, by Fred Schepisi (THE RUSSIA HOUSE), is well
done.  The film has an original idea (at least I haven't seen it before)
that works.  If only the film had been cut by fifteen minutes, I think
it would have ended up much better.

Title
Review for Crying Game, The (1992)
     Stephen Rea is part of a terrorist organization in Ireland that
kidnaps soldier Forest Whitaker.  When Whitaker dies, upon Whitaker's
request, Rea goes to England to tell Whitaker's girlfriend what
happened.
     THE CRYING GAME has been in limited distribution and has just
opened nationwide.  This is a *must see* movie.  It is the best film
that I have seen in 1993.  On a scale of zero to five, I give THE
CRYING GAME a five.  THE CRYING GAME is rated R for explicit language,
adult situations, graphic violence, and brief male nudity.
     The writing for this film is great.  I am pleased to see that Neil
Jordan (MONA LISA, THE MIRACLE) has not yet conformed to Hollywood's
typical film standards.  This film is full of surprises and twists,
which make it well worth going to see.  Don't wait for the
videocassette for this film.  See it before you hear about the film's
surprises, because not knowing them makes the film all the more
enjoyable.
     The following may contain mild spoilers; read on with caution.
     THE CRYING GAME has been nominated for six academy awards; Best
Picture, Best Actor (Stephen Rea), Best Supporting Actor (Jaye
Davidson), and Film Editing (Kant Pan).  I feel that this film will
probably win at least one of the Oscars, probably Best Picture.
     The entire cast for this film is perfect.  Stephen Rea is great.
He makes his character completely believable and interesting.  Forest
Whitaker (DIARY OF A HITMAN; GOOD MORNING, VIETNAM), even though he is
not on the screen for much, is excellent.  He makes his character come
alive.  Jaye Davidson is great, and surprising.  Miranda Richardson
(DAMAGE, ENCHANTED APRIL) makes her character cruel and heartless.
Adrian Dunbar (HEAR MY SONG) gives a good performance as the leader of
the terrorist organization.  The man who plays the English bar keep is
excellent and reminds me of Robert Englund in "Nightmare Cafe."

Title
Review for Distinguished Gentleman, The (1992)
120 min., R, Comedy, 1992
Director: Jonathan Lynn
Cast: Eddie Murphy, Lane Smith, Sheryl Lee Roth, Joe Don Baker,
      Victoria Rowell, Grant Seud, Kevin McCarthy, Charles S. Dutton,
      Victor Rivers, Noble Willingham, James Garner, Della Reese,
      Sarah Carson
     Con man Eddie Murphy sees that the way to make money is to become a
congressman.  When Florida's congressman, James Garner, dies, Murphy
runs for his seat under name recognition.  When Murphy wins the
election, he starts to have a field day in Washington, D.C.
     1992 was a great year for fans of Eddie Murphy.  In the summer he
put out the film BOOMERANG (which is now on video cassette) and then
just recently he put out the film THE DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN, which is
up to his excellent standard.  I highly recommend THE DISTINGUISHED
GENTLEMAN to all fans of Eddie Murphy.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give THE DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN a five.  THE DISTINGUISHED GENTLEMAN is
rated R for explicit language, adult situations, and adult humor.
     This film has been said by some people to be better than BEVERLY
HILLS COP.  I don't agree with that.  I still feel that BEVERLY HILLS
COP is Eddie Murphy's best film.  However, Eddie Murphy doesn't let his
fans down.  This film is written with the trademark Eddie Murphy humor
that keeps up from beginning to end.
     This is one of those films that it doesn't matter whether you see
it in the theater or not.  I think that a film always looks better on
the big screen, but with the amount that movies are costing these days
some people may want to wait for this film to be released on video
cassette.  However I recommend that big fans of Eddie Murphy see this
film in the theater.
     Eddie Murphy's supporting cast is excellent; especially Charles
S. Dutton ("Roc", ALIEN^3), who plays a minister (and has hair on his
head).  I think that Charles S. Dutton is an great actor and makes
anything that he is in better (he was one of the best things about
ALIEN^3).  Kevin McCarthy also added a lot to the film.

Title
Review for Buried Alive (1990/I)
90 min, R, Horror, 1990
Director: Gerard Kikoine
Cast: Robert Vaughn, Donald Pleasence, Karen Witter, John Carradine,
      Nia Long, Bill Butler, Ginger Lynn Allen
     The film adaptation of some short stories by Edgar Allan Poe.
Karen Witter is hired by Robert Vaughn to come and work at the girls
facility he runs called Ravenscroft.  Girls start disappearing from
Ravenscroft and the police assume that they have run away.  Witter
starts having weird dreams of a pulsating brick wall after she starts
working at Ravenscroft.  Witter also hears screams at night that no one
else hears, are they real or her imagination.
     There is no short story ever written by Edgar Allan Poe entitled
"Buried Alive."  The film BURIED ALIVE is a combination of Poe's stories
"The Cask of Amontillado," "The Black Cat," and pieces of his other
short stories.  The film has almost nothing to do with the stories which
it is "based on."
     The only similarity that I could find between these stories I have
just described and the film is that someone gets walled up by bricks in
them.  However if you are just looking for a horror film to see and are
not looking for any of Poe's stories you might think about this movie.
This film is part of a series of produced by Harry Alan Towers that are
coming over from Italy.  The only other films, that I know of, that are
also coming over are THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM (which is already in
video stores) and THE HOUSE OF USHER.  There are probably others.  Don't
get this film confused with the 1989 film BURIED ALIVE with Tim Matheson
and Jennifer Jason Leigh.
     The film is the last film by the late John Carradine, although he
is not on the screen very much.  If you are a diehard fan of John
Carradine I don't think that is a good enough reason just to run out and
see the film.
     For the rating: for enjoyability I gave the film a four (out of
five), for following Edgar Allan Poe I gave the film a zero.  The film
is a direct-to-video release, like THE PIT AND THE PENDULUM.  BURIED
ALIVE is rated R for explicit language, graphic violence, and female
nudity.
+Spoilers+   +Spoilers+   +Spoilers+   +Spoilers+   +Spoilers+   +Spoilers+
     "The Cask of Amontillado" is about a man (no name was ever given in
the book) that was insulted by a wine connoisseur called Fortunado.  The
man lives with the insult for several years.  He finally gives in to
himself and tricks Fortunado into his wine vaults to taste some
Amontillado.  To make sure Fortunado comes, the man keeps on telling
Fortunado if it is a great inconvenience he can always bring Luchesi,
another wine connoisseur, to the Amontillado instead.  Fortunado's greed
won't let Luchesi go instead of him, even though he has a cold.  The man
brings Fortunado to his house and brings him into his wine vaults.  The
man offers Fortunado wine getting him very drunk as they go inside the
vaults.  When the man has Fortunado deep in his vaults he chains him up
and bricks him in, tossing his torch in just before the last brick to
make sure all the oxygen gets depleted.
     "The Black Cat" is about this man (no name was ever given for him
either) who is an alcoholic.  His wife happens to love pets and has
many.  He abuses them when he is under the influence of the alcohol.  An
all black cat, which followed him home one day, he has found a liking
for.  Because of this he keeps from abusing the cat.  One night in a
drunken fury he grabs the cat and cuts out its eye.  For many days the
cat avoids him, but one night he catches the cat and hangs it in the
garden.  That night his house catches fire and he and his wife escape
unharmed.  On one of the outside walls is a white silhouette of the cat
which he had hung.  Following this, in their new apartment, an almost
totally black cat shows up and takes up an immediate liking for the
man's wife.  The man however hates the cat because it is missing the
same eye as their former cat.  One night the man goes into the basement
to kill the cat.  His wife stops him and the man ends up killing her.  
He walls her up in his basement and then hunts for the cat, but cannot
find it.  After four days the police show up and want to know if they
can search the house.  The man, confident in the job he did of walling
up his wife, allows them to make their search.  When they are in the
basement the man taps on the new wall showing the police how well the
house is built.  After the tapping a wailing cry comes from behind the
wall and the police open it up and find the man's wife, who had already
begun to decompose.  The police also found the cat which caused the
man's wife's death.
     Carradine, I felt, gave a disappointing performance as Vaughn's
dad, who experimented on Vaughn.  Somehow the experimenting made Vaughn
into a killing psycho, but why did he choose to wall people up?  That,
to the best of my knowledge, was never explained.  Another problem is
that the girls from Ravenscroft go into the basement to party and
explore, yet none of them ever saw Carradine down in the basement.
Witter saw Carradine when she went in the basement (the man in the
wheelchair).  The other thing that bothered me is that no one saw the
new bricking in the basement, surely someone had to notice.

Title
Review for Last of the Mohicans, The (1992)
140 min., R, Drama, 1992
Director: Michael Mann
Cast: Daniel Day-Lewis, Madeline Stowe, Wes Studi, Steven Waddington,
      Jodhi May, Eric Schweig, Colm Meany
     Daniel Day-Lewis plays Hawkeye, a colonist who lives with two
Indians.  He runs across a party that is being attacked by Indians.
Day-Lewis rescues Madeline Stowe from the attack.  The rest of the film
shows Day-Lewis escorting Stowe to her destination.
     The advertisements for this film said that "the Oscar race begins
here."  I don't agree with that at all.  I wasn't impressed with this
film at all.  THE LAST OF THE MOHICANS is based on the novel by James
Fenimore Cooper.  The movie has the basic idea of the book, but does not
follow the book very closely.  If you must see this film, I suggest that
you wait for the videocassette.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
LAST OF THE MOHICANS a two.  LAST OF THE MOHICANS is rated R for adult
situations and violence.
     The reason that I didn't like this film very much is the same
reason that I didn't like the book.  All the characters in the film are
flat.  I couldn't get myself to like, or dislike, anyone in the film.
To me, Hawkeye seemed to be just as bad as the evil Indian.  If the
characters had been rounded out, then maybe I would have liked this film
more.
     The scenery in this film is beautiful, especially on the ledges at
the end of the film.  The photography is excellent and enhances the
landscape.  The only reason to see this film in the theater is to see
the photography.  Other than that, I found this film to be rather poor
in quality.  The actors and actresses in the film all try hard but can't
do much with the script or horrible characterizations.

Title
Review for Candyman (1992)
145 min., R, Horror, 1992
Director: Bernard Rose
Cast: Virginia Madsen, Tony Todd, Xander Berkely, Kasi Lemmons,
      Vanessa Williams, Gilbert Lewis
     Virginia Madsen and Vanessa Williams are doing a thesis on folk
lore.  They find one tale about Candyman.  Candyman was a black man back
in the 1600s (?) who had an influential father.   He went to the best
schools, and became a painter.  He was called on to paint a portrait of
one man's virginal daughter, and the painter and the daughter fall in
love.  When the father finds out that the girl is pregnant, he has
Candyman killed by a group of men.  First they cut off one of his hands
with a rusty saw then smear him with honey and let bees sting him to
death.  The folklore says that when you say Candyman five times (into a
bathroom mirror?) he will come and kill you with the hook that has
been nailed to where his stump is.  Madsen and Williams find out that
several killings have been going on in the projects, and Candyman is
blamed.  The two decide to investigate, and Madsen finds out that
Candyman, Tony Todd, might really exist.
     CANDYMAN is based on a short story (I don't remember the title) by
Clive Barker.  Clive Barker didn't write the screenplay for the movie.
CANDYMAN is one of the best horror films to be released to the theaters
this year (but I expect that DRACULA will beat it).  I highly recommend
that you see this film, and don't wait for the video to be released.  On
a scale of zero to five, I give CANDYMAN a five.  CANDYMAN is rated R
for brief female nudity, graphic violence, adult situations, and
explicit language.
     The special effects for this film are great.  The gore is very well
done, without being overly disgusting.  The story is well written and
kept my attention throughout the film.  The script is written such that
the actors don't end up with moronic lines.  The sets are well done and
add a spooky atmosphere to the film.
     The actors (and actresses) all do a great job.  Virginia Madsen
(THE HOT SPOT, CREATOR) is excellent in the main role, as the girl who
may be either losing her mind, or seeing a real demon.  Tony Todd
(NIGHT OF THE LIVING DEAD, 1990 version) is great as the antagonist of
the film.  He makes a perfect demon, who is taking over Madsen's life.
Vanessa Williams gives a good performance as  Madsen's best friend.

Title
Review for Few Good Men, A (1992)
142 min., R, Drama, 1992
Director: Rob Reiner
Cast: Jack Nicholson, Tom Cruise, Demi Moore, Kevin Bacon,
      Kevin Pollak, James Marshall, J. T. Walsh, Kiefer Sutherland,      
      Christopher Guest, Xander Berkeley
     Two Marines are accused of killing another Marine in their platoon.
They are represented by Navy lawyer Tom Cruise and by Demi Moore.
Cruise and Moore want to prove that the Marines didn't kill the man on
purpose, but were just following orders given by their commanding
officer, Jack Nicholson.
     A FEW GOOD MEN is an excellent film, and I suggest that you don't
miss it.  I enjoyed every minute of it.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give A FEW GOOD MEN a five.  A FEW GOOD MEN is rated R for explicit
language and violence.
     The cast for this film is exceptional.  I expect to see some
Academy Award nominations for the cast (among other categories) for this
film.  Jack Nicholson (HOFFA, THE SHINING) stands out above the rest of
the cast.  His performance is the best that I have ever seen him give.
I think that Jack Nicholson gives a much better performance in this film
than in HOFFA, so if you can only see one of his current films I suggest
this one.  Tom Cruise (RAIN MAN, RISKY BUSINESS) gives an excellent
performance.  His character is completely believable.  Demi Moore (GHOST
[1990], ABOUT LAST NIGHT..., BLAME IT ON RIO) is perfect.  I don't think
that she could have done any better with her character.  Kevin Bacon
(FLATLINERS, PLANES TRAINS & AUTOMOBILES) is great.  Kiefer Sutherland
(1969, TWIN PEAKS: FIRE WALK WITH ME) also is outstanding.
     The director, Rob Reiner (THE PRINCESS BRIDE, STAND BY ME), does an
excellent job.  He has created a near perfect, if not perfect, film.
The writing for this film is great.  I was entranced for every minute of
this film.  This film is far better than the other court film out, BODY
OF EVIDENCE.
     The locations used for this film are great.  They set the film
perfectly.  The characters are well built so that they are all three
dimensional.  They are characters that I found myself liking or hating.
They also can bring emotion from the audience watching the film.  I
could probably go on forever talking about all the great aspects of this
film so I will stop here before I end up boring you.  Definitely go out
and see this film as soon as possible.

Title
Review for Player, The (1992)
125 min., R, Comedy, 1992
Director: Robert Altman
Cast: Tim Robbins, Greta Scacchi, Whoopi Goldberg, Kathy Ireland,
      Julia Roberts, Fred Ward, Sydney Pollack, Dean Stockwell,
      Peter Gallagher, Brion James, Cynthia Stevenson,
      Vincent D'Onofrio, Richard E. Grant, Lyle Lovett, Buck Henry,
      Burt Reynolds, Cher, Bruce Willis, Dina Merrill, Angela Hall,
      Anjelica Huston, John Cusack, Lili Tomlin, Nick Nolte,
      Elliott Gould, Peter Falk, Karen Black, Robert Carradine,
      Jeff Goldblum, Ray Walston, David Alan Grier
     Movie executive Tim Robbins is receiving hate mail from a writer.
Robbins thinks that he has figured out who is doing it.  Accidentally
the man gets killed.  Robbins finds out that the wrong man died, and he
has to make sure he doesn't get caught.
     THE PLAYER is well worth watching, and joins a line of films that
successfully make fun of Hollywood, one of which is the very recent
HOLLYWOOD BOULEVARD 2 with Ginger Lynn Allen and Eddie Deezen, and the
not so recent THE BIG PICTURE with Kevin Bacon and Jennifer Jason Leigh.
On a scale of zero to five, I give THE PLAYER a four.  THE PLAYER is
rated R for female nudity, brief male nudity, violence, explicit
language, and adult situations.
     I have never really been taken with the characters Tim Robbins
plays, or Tim Robbins, himself, for that matter.  I especially hated him
BULL DURHAM.  In this film though (and in CADILLAC MAN), I feel that he
did a really good job.  Maybe if he keeps acting like this I will start
to like him.
     The biggest problem with the film is that some of the cast, like
Fred Ward, Tim Robbins, and Whoopi Goldberg, play characters and others,
like Julia Roberts, Burt Reynolds, and Bruce Willis, play themselves.
When a character comes on, at first you don't know whether they are
playing themselves, or somebody else.  I think that if they had
straightened this out, the movie would have run smoother.  I don't know
how they really could have fixed it up other than having unknowns
playing the characters and the knowns playing themselves.
     The cast does a great job, although I don't know how many were just
being themselves, and how many were really acting.  The story was well
written, and the film was great fun to watch.  Earlier this year THE
PLAYER was playing at major theaters.  Now it is in small second run
theaters, and soon it will be coming to video (and laser disk).  If you
want to see this film, I suggest that if you can see it in a theater on
the big screen that you do so, because on a small screen you might miss
something happening.  That may no longer be a possibility for you.  If
you haven't seen this film I suggest that you do, because it is
definitely worth it.
[Moderator's note: In the line of pictures that make fun of Hollywood,
there is also HOLLYWOOD BOULEVARD itself, to which HOLLYWOOD BOULEVARD 2
is a sequel.  The original was co-directed by Joe Dante and is his first
film.]
.


Title
Review for Mom and Dad Save the World (1992)
1:26, PG, Comedy, 1992
Director: Greg Beeman
Cast: Teri Garr, Jeffrey Jones, Jon Lovitz, Dwier Brown, Kathy Ireland,
      Thalmus Rasulala, Wallace Shawn, Eric Idle
     Jon Lovitz, the ruler of a planet of idiots, is going to destroy
Earth.  He sees Teri Garr, an Earth woman, and has Garr and her husband
Jeffrey Jones brought up to his planet.  Lovitz has Jones imprisoned and
tries to marry Garr.  Jones escapes from prison and has to save Garr and
the Earth.
     Given the comic talent in MOM AND DAD SAVE THE WORLD, it could have
been a lot better than it turned out.  However, that doesn't mean that
this film is a waste of time because it is far from that.  This film
will only be liked by those who enjoy "stupid" comedies.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give MOM AND DAD SAVE THE WORLD a four with reservations
(a 3.5).  MOM AND DAD SAVE THE WORLD is rated PG for adult situations
and violence.
     Jon Lovitz (A LEAGUE OF THEIR OWN, MR. DESTINY) is not at his best
in this film.  He was better in almost any of his appearances in the old
episodes of "Saturday Night Live".  Jeffrey Jones (STAY TUNED,
BEETLEJUICE) carries most of this film.  He does a great job.  Teri Garr
(TOOTSIE, CLOSE ENCOUNTERS OF THE THIRD KIND) gives a reasonably good
performance.  Kathy Ireland (NATIONAL LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON 1,
MR. DESTINY) is great.  Wallace Shawn (THE PRINCESS BRIDE, SHADOWS AND
FOG) is disappointing.  I expected much better from him.  Eric Idle
(NATIONAL LAMPOON'S EUROPEAN VACATION, MONTY PYTHON'S THE MEANING OF
LIFE) is the best actor in this film.  This film is worth seeing just
for him.  The various creatures in this film are also great, especially
the ones that live in the sewers.
     As I mentioned earlier, MOM AND DAD SAVE THE WORLD is a "stupid"
comedy.  It starts out slowly, but about one-fourth of the way through
the film starts to pick up and doesn't slow back down.  This film is
basically well written.  It is not in the league of such films  as HOT
SHOTS!, NATIONAL LAMPOON'S LOADED WEAPON 1, or THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2: THE
SMELL OF FEAR.  If any children are around, they will love this film.

Title
Review for Naked Gun 2 1/2: The Smell of Fear, The (1991)
[No, the names on the From:- and by-lines are not mistakes; this is by a family
member of the account owner.  -Moderator]
Synopsis: Los Angeles Cop Frank Drebin, Nielsen, is invited to a lunch
with the President of the United States.  At the lunch, the President
announces that a scientist will unveil his suggestions for the new U.S.
energy plan at a public meeting.  Of course, whatever the scientist says
will go into effect.  The coal, oil, and nuclear energy spokespeople
suspect that the scientist's recommendation will be for more energy from
the sun.  That would greatly hinder their business.  At the time of the
meeting the scientist's laboratory is bombed.  Nielsen rushes to the
scene and finds that there is only one witness, Presley.  Presley is
Nielsen's old lover who he hasn't gotten over yet.  Nielsen's only
suspect for the bombing is the spokesman for nuclear energy (Goulet),
who Presley is now seeing.  Presley won't believe Nielsen when he tells
her what his suspicions are because she thinks that he is jealous.
     The following may contain spoilers that might hinder the enjoyment
of watching the film.  If you have not seen the film proceed with
caution.
     Leslie Nielsen's portrayal of Frank Drebin, a cop who stays
straight-faced while totally messing up, is great.  Priscilla Presley is
back as Drebin's old lover who has seemed to survive the break up;
unfortunately Frank is not that lucky.  He spends the entire movie
trying to win her back.  The evil man portrayed in the film is totally
evil without caring for those around him; all he is interested in is to
make sure his business succeeds.  The film's portrayal of George Bush is
almost perfect.  Those hand motions of his that he does when he is
talking (first lampooned by Dana Carvey in "Saturday Night Live") have
been added in.  One of the scenes not to miss is the parody of GHOST's
love scene with the pottery wheel.  Put in the hands of Nielsen and
Presley not even that is safe.
     Director David Zucker returns again from his television series
"Police Squad!" and his hit film THE NAKED GUN to direct this film.
Like THE NAKED GUN this film relies on slapstick comedy for it laughs.
For serious people who like subtle humor this would not be a film to
see.  For those of you who have seen THE NAKED GUN and liked it, I
highly suggest seeing this film.  It is written by David Zucker and Pat
Proft, who both wrote for the TV series "Police Squad!"
     Where as this film may not be the blockbuster film of the summer (I
expect Arnold Schwarzenegger's film TERMINATOR 2: JUDGMENT DAY will
have that ranking), I feel this is worth going to see before it leaves
the theaters.  On a 0 to 5 scale I give this film a 5.
     THE NAKED GUN 2 1/2 is rated PG-13 for adult situations, explicit
language, and adult humor.

Title
Review for Gas Food Lodging (1992)
104 min., R, Drama, 1992
Director: Allison Anders
Cast: Brooke Adams, Ione Skye, Fairuza Balk, Robert Knepper,      
      Donovan Leitch, David Lansbury, Chris Mulkey, James Brolin, 
      Julie Condra
     Brooke Adams is a waitress at a truck stop.  Her husband, James
Brolin, has moved out of the house and left her with two girls, Ione
Skye and Fairuza Balk.  Skye spends her time skipping high school and
having sex with men.  Balk spends her time either trying to fix up Adams
with other men, or trying to get in contact with Brolin.
     I read a preview of GAS, FOOD, LODGING in PREMIERE magazine during
the summer and I have been waiting for it to be released in my area.  It
just came, and so I rushed out to see it.  I had high hopes for this
film, and I am pleased to say that the film lived up to them.  I highly
recommend that you try to see this film, in the theater if possible, and
if not, off video cassette when it is released.  On a scale of zero to
five, I give GAS, FOOD, LODGING a five.  GAS, FOOD, LODGING is rated R
for explicit language, adult situations, and female nudity.
     All the actresses and actors in this film do a great job.   Brooke
Adams (SOMETIMES THEY COME BACK) is excellent as the girls' mother.  Her
performance showed the stress from raising Ione Skye's character, while
trying to show love for her.  Ione Skye (SAY ANYTHING...)  is
exceptional as Brooke Adams' troubled daughter.   She shows the
resentment that she has for her mother, but the love that exists between
her and her sister Fairuza Balk, even though it is not always shown by
Skye.  Fairuza Balk is very good as Brooke Adams' other daughter.  Most
of the things that happen in this film, happen to Balk.  She is
constantly looking for a father figure so that she can have a complete
family.  She learns about love and loss through the course of the film.
James Brolin (THE AMITYVILLE HORROR) does a good job as Brooke Adams'
ex-husband.  He has to face his fear and go visit his children, of whom
at least one wants to see him.
     GAS, FOOD, LODGING is very well written.  The film never gets slow,
boring, or tedious.  The characters are extremely well written and kept
my interest throughout the entire film.  I found myself caring for the
people in the film, wanting to see what would happen to them.  The
locations used are great.  Especially the desert scenes.  They really
add to the quality of the film.

Title
Review for Wild Orchid (1990)
     These are some films that I just recently checked out of my video
store and really enjoyed.  They are ones that I feel are probably
commonly overlooked and I feel are definitely worth renting.  The rating
system is based on a zero to five scale.
     Drifter Harry Dean Stanton gets reunited with his son Hunter Carson
after a long time of wandering.  His wife Nastassja Kinski had walked
out on him years ago and Stanton feels guilty about it.  He and Carson
go out to try to find Kinski so Carson can be reunited with her.
     Although this film is rather long, I found it to be attention
grabbing.  The film is rather sad in places and happy in others.  The
acting is very well done and the script is well written.  I highly
recommend this film to any fan of dramas.
     Rated R for explicit language and adult situation.  Rating: Five.
PRIVATE POPSICLE
100 min., not rated, Comedy, 1982, In Israli with English
subtitles
Director: Boaz Davidson
Cast: Iftach Katzur, Zachi Noy, Jonathan Segal, Sonia Martin,
      Menache Warshawski, Bea Fiedler, Dietmar Siegert, Dvora Keidar,
      Joseph Shiloah
     This film is part four of the European LEMON POPSICLE series.
Katzur, Noy, and Segal all become part of the Israli army.  They get put
through a vigorous training course.  The three try to get out of
everything they were assigned.  One of the boys sees Martin in the girls
side of the camp.  He dresses up as an officer to go over to see her
     This film ended up being a lot like the American film STRIPES,
except not quite as funny.  The Lemon Popsicle team, Iftach Katzur,
Zachi Noy, and Jonathan Segal, have done a great job with this film, and
after seeing it, I now want to search out their first three works.  The
film is very funny, but only if you like slapstick comedy.
     Not rated but contains adult situations, female nudity, explicit
language, and adult humor.  Rating: Four.
THE SPRING
102 min., R, Action, 1989
Director: John D. Patterson
Cast: Dack Rambo, Shari Shattuck, Gedde Wantanabe, Steven Keats,
      Virginia Watson, Jessie Lawrence Ferguson, Robert V. Barron,
      Rick Olivio, Byron Webster
     Rambo and Wantanabe are archeologists who get evidence that leads
them to believe that Ponce De Leon's fountain of youth exists.  They
travel to Florida to try to find the fountain.  Rambo meets artist
Shattuck, who paints paintings of the fountain and may know its where
abouts.  They are followed by Keats, who wants to use the fountain for
his own personal gain.
     This film silently appeared on the video shelves of a video store
in my area.  Because of the cover, I had never bothered to check it out.
One day I got curious what the film was like so I checked it out, and it
is nothing like the cover implies.  This film will probably only be
liked by fans of B movies who will probably enjoy watching it.  Others
will probably find the story cheesy and the acting poor.
     Rated  R for violence, explicit language, adult situations, and
female nudity.  Rating: Four.
STAR 80
104 min., R, Drama/Biography, 1983
Director: Bob Fosse
Cast: Mariel Hemingway, Eric Roberts, Cliff Robertson, Roger Rees,
      David Clennon, Carroll Baker, Keenen Ivory Wayans
     The true story of Playboy centerfold Dorothy R. Stratten, played
by Mariel Hemingway.  She gets seen by Paul Snider, played by Eric
Roberts, who convinces Stratten to pose nude for "Playboy."  He and she
get married and soon their relationship starts to go bad, so she tries
to get out of it.  Snider, in a mad rage, kills Hemingway.  Dorothy
R. Stratten's story is also told in the film DOROTHY STRATTEN: THE
UNTOLD STORY, and the television film DEATH OF A CENTERFOLD: THE DOROTHY
STRATTEN STORY.
     The story line is often depressing, but the acting is great and the
story is well-written.  Hemingway does a great job as Dorothy and
Roberts is perfect as the slimy Snider.  I recommend this film only to
people who are interested in Dorothy Stratten, or enjoy a good drama.
     Rated R for female nudity, adult situations, explicit language, and
graphic violence.  Rating: Four.
STEWARDESS SCHOOL
93 min., R, Comedy, 1987
Director: Ken Blancato
Cast: Brett Cullen, Mary Cadorette, Donald Most, Sandahl Bergman,
      Judy Landers, Wendie Jo Spencer, Julie Montgomery,
      Dennis Burkley, Corinne Bohrer, Sherman Hemsley, Vicki Frederick,
      Leslie Huntly, Brooke Bundy, Fran Ryan
     A school for stewardesses lowers its standards and accepts anybody
who will apply.  The trainees that show up are anything but desirable,
so one of the instructors tries to get the undesirable students to quit.
     The basic story line is a complete rip-off of POLICE ACADEMY, but
the film is fun to watch if you don't expect too much.  I suggest this
film for anyone who enjoyed the original POLICE ACADEMY film and other
fans of slapstick type humor.
     Rated R for explicit language, adult situations, female nudity, and
adult humor.  Rating: Four.
THE SUICIDE CLUB
90 min., R, Drama, 1988
Director: James Bruce
Cast: Mariel Hemingway, Robert Joy, Madeline Potter,
      Michael O'Donoghue, Anne Lange, Sullivan Brown, Keith Berger,
      Tom Cayler, Lenny Henry, Anne Carlisle
     Hemingway is feeling guilty over the suicide of her brother.  She
gets invited to a party where most of the guests play a card game with a
twist, the winner loses.  The one who wins, gets killed.  Hemingway
observes the first night, and against the suggestions of her boyfriend
Joy, she goes back a second night to play the game.
     This often depressing film is certainly not for everybody's tastes.
I found this film good, but in a weird way.  It is not one to just sit
down to, you have to think while watching it.  I recommend this film to
people who like bizarre movies.
     Rated R for explicit language and violence.  Rating: Four.
TUFF TURF
112 min., R, Drama/Action, 1985
Director: Fritz Kiersch
Cast: James Spader, Kim Richards, Paul Mones, Matt Clark,
      Claudette Nevins, Olivia Barash, Robert Downey, Jr.,
      Ranchito Gomez, Michael Wyle, Kerry Brennon
     Teen Spader moves to a new city.  He sees beautiful Richards and
wants her to be his girlfriend.  She is already seeing punk Mones and he
doesn't want to give her up.  Mones and his gang start a war against
Spader, and Spader fights to get Richards.
     An above-average teen gang film which I feel will be liked by
teenagers/college students, and open minded adults as well.  The acting
in the film is great and the story is rather interesting.  Just don't
expect a perfect film.
     Rated R for explicit language, adult situations, brief female
nudity, graphic violence.  Rating: Five.
WILD ORCHID
111 min., not rated, Drama, 1990
Director: Zalman King
Cast: Mickey Rourke, Jacqueline Bisset, Carre Otis, Assumpta Serna,
      Bruce Greenwood, Jens Peter Oleg Vidou
     Naive American Otis joins a firm and gets sent to Rio De Janeiro to
help Bisset with a real estate deal.  Otis meets bizarre Rourke, who is
interested in Otis.  She goes out with Rourke and he opens her eyes to
the sexual experiences of others.  Rourke doesn't make moves on Otis
and she is confused over it.  Also available in a less explicit R rated
version that runs for 103 minutes.  Followed by WILD ORCHID 2: TWO
SHADES OF BLUE, which just came to video.
     I feel this is Zalman King's, director of TWO MOON JUNCTION, best
film yet.  The film is just an interesting film to sit down and watch.
As far as I can tell there is no great significance to the film.  I
recommend this film to people who like provocative dramas.
     Not rated but contains explicit language, adult situations, female
nudity, and strong sexual content.  Rating: Four.

Title
Review for True Romance (1993)
2:01, Action/Comedy, 1993
MPAA rating: R (female nudity, graphic violence, explicit         
                language, adult situations)
Rating: five (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Tony Scott
Cast: Christian Slater, Patricia Arquette, Dennis Hopper, Gary Oldman,
      Brad Pitt, Val Kilmer, Christopher Walken, Bronson Pinchot,
      Samuel L. Jackson, Saul Rubinek, Conchata Ferrell, Paul Bates,
      Tom Sizemore, Chris Penn, (and Ed Lauter        uncredited?)
     Christian Slater has no life, so his boss hires call girl Patricia
Arquette to give him him a good time on his birthday.  Slater and
Arquette fall in love and get married.  Slater goes to rub out
Arquette's pimp Gary Oldman and ends up with a few million dollars of
cocaine.  They try to get rid of the cocaine while the people to whom
the cocaine belongs try to get rid of Slater and Arquette.
     TRUE ROMANCE is the newest film out by writer Quentin Tarantino
(RESERVOIR DOGS).  It is full of comedy and more bloody corpses than I
can count on my hands and feet, so how can you go wrong with this
film?  The answer is you can't!  This is one hell of a good film.  TRUE
ROMANCE is the best film that I have seen so far this year, and is one
of the best films that I have ever seen.  I highly recommend that you
go out and see this film, preferably while it is in the theaters.  It
is a must see movie that is definitely worth full ticket price.  If you
hadn't gathered, this is not a sicky sweet date movie like BENNY AND
JOON.
     This film is excellently written.  The film moves along quickly
and never gets boring.  The two hours that TRUE ROMANCE runs seem like
they get over immediately and leave the viewer asking for more, wishing
the film wasn't over yet, possibly even compelled to get a ticket for
the next showing.  This film is an excellent combination of brutal
violence and comedy, that should please fans of both.  The plot is well
done and not filled with Hollywood cliches.  Tarantino seems to be a
very promising Hollywood writer who could initiate a change in
Hollywood movie standards.
     The characters, for the most part, are very well developed and do
not leave the impressions of just being light particles being projected
through a piece of celluloid and hitting a giant silver screen in a
darkened room.  Instead they come alive on the screen and leave the
viewer with the impression that they could actually exist somewhere at
this current time.  There are a few characters that don't get developed
very well, such as those of Gary Oldman and Samuel L. Jackson, but
since those characters are only minor and aren't around much, it
doesn't do great harm to TRUE ROMANCE.  Other minor characters though,
like Dennis Hopper's, are well developed even though they don't play a
major role in the film.  Some characters, like Brad Pitt's, are just
around for comic relief.
     The acting in this film is well done.  Christian Slater (UNTAMED
HEART, PUMP UP THE VOLUME), who seems to always do a good job with his
role, is in particularly high form here.  His character is believable
at all points through the film.  Patricia Arquette (A NIGHTMARE ON ELM
STREET 3: THE DREAM WARRIORS, PRETTY SMART) also does a great job in
carrying this film.  I think that this is her best acting work to
date.  Dennis Hopper (RIVER'S EDGE, SUPER MARIO BROS.) does a very good
job with his character making it look realistic for the short time he
is on screen.  Gary Oldman (BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA, ROSENCRANTZ AND
GUILDENSTERN ARE DEAD), who did such a good job in DRACULA, is not in
top form here, which is unfortunate because he could have done a great
job with that character.  Brad Pitt (JOHNNY SUEDE, COOL WORLD) is
excellent.  His character isn't an overly dramatic or important one,
but Pitt has fun with it anyway.  Christopher Walken (BATMAN RETURNS, A
VIEW TO A KILL) does an excellent evil slimeball.  He makes his
character look ruthless and very dark.  Bronson Pinchot (BLAME IT ON
THE BELLBOY, "The Trouble with Larry"), surprisingly, did a great job
with his character.  I didn't expect him to be good in this film
considering the kind of character he has played in the past, but he
pleasantly surprised me and brought much to the scenes he is in.  Tom
Sizemore and Chris Penn (RESERVOIR DOGS, LEATHER JACKETS) are great as
a team of cops and react well off of each other.
     Some of the imagery in the film is extremely well thought out and
filmed very well.  One of those is the love scene between Christian
Slater and Patricia Arquette.  Minimal nudity was seen and a filtered
blue light was the lighting of choice.  The end result is instead of a
scene that looked like it was just put in for mindless titillation it
showed that it had a purpose for showing how the romance between Slater
and Arquette started.
*If you haven't seen the film you probably shouldn't be reading this*
     Another scene that I thought was the highlight of the film
visually was the climactic shoot out in the hotel room with Slater and
company, the police, and the evil drug goons.  The way the bodies were
falling into the flying feathers stuck me as a really beautiful sight.
The parts of this scene where Arquette was crawling to Slater through
the feathers and the black cop was slowly buried by the feathers as he
died were extremely well done.

Title
Review for Fatale (1992)
1:54, unrated version (NC-17 version), Drama, 1993
Director: Louis Malle
Cast: Jeremy Irons, Juliette Binoche, Miranda Richardson, Rupert Graves,
      Ian Bannen, Peter Stormare, Gemma Clarke, Julian Fellowes, Leslie Caron
     Jeremy Irons is having an obsessive affair with Juliette Binoche.
Binoche falls in love with Rupert Graves, Irons's son.  As Binoche and
Graves relationship gets more and more serious, Irons tries to end it.
     DAMAGE is an incredibly slow-moving boring film that is a complete
waste of time.  I can't recommend this film to anyone, unless you enjoy
watching grass grow in the dark.  DAMAGE is now available on
videocassette in two versions, the R rated theatrical version that runs
for 1:50 and the unrated (original NC-17 version) that runs for 1:54
(the version that I am reviewing).  On a scale of zero to five, I give
DAMAGE a zero (too bad it doesn't go lower).  DAMAGE is unrated and
contains female nudity, brief male nudity, adult situations, and
explicit language.
     Louis Malle, the director of the good film PRETTY BABY, has made a
real loser of a film.  Hopefully this film will be a low point in his
career.  Jeremy Irons (whom I have heard is a good actor) was not at
all impressive in this film.  The only way to describe his acting is
wooden and uninspired.  Juliette Binoche (a newcomer to films I
believe) also didn't do a good job.  She didn't ever seem to be with
this film.  Miranda Richardson (who did such a good job in the recent
THE CRYING GAME) is not at all interesting in this film.  I was very
disappointed, especially considering she received an academy award
nomination for best supporting actress.  Rupert Graves (WHERE ANGELS
FEAR TO TREAD) does the best job out of the cast.  He seemed to put
some life into his role.
     This film is poorly written and moves along slowly.  The
characters are boring and invoke no interest from the viewer.  I have
something to say about the "hot and steamy" sex scenes too, they were
neither hot or steamy.  Jeremy Irons and Juliette Binoche have about as
much sexual chemistry as two eggs.  The sex scenes look fake and are
erotic in no way.  If you are looking for a good erotic drama, may I
suggest THE BLUE LAGOON with Brooke Shields and Christopher Atkins or
WILD ORCHID with Mickey Rourke and Carre Otis.  And if you are looking
for a well done film, may I suggest that you just skip this one.

Title
Review for I Yabba-Dabba Do! (1993) (TV)
1:32, not rated, Animated/Comedy, 1993, Made-for-American-Television
Director: William Hanna
Voices of: Henry Corden, Jean Vander Pyl, Megan Mullally, Frank Welker,
           B. J. Ward, Jerry Houser, Joseph Barbera, William Hanna
     Fred Flintstone (voice of Henry Corden) loses all of his money on a
bet.  Pebbles (voice of Megan Mullally) and Bamm-Bamm (voice of Jerry
Houser) have grown up and are planning to get married.  Fred has to find
a way of getting back his money and paying for Pebbles and Bamm-Bamm's
wedding.
     I YABBA-DABBA DO! is the first in a series of Flintstones films
being made for the ABC television network.  It aired on Sunday, February
7 and will probably be repeated soon.  I used to watch "The Flintstones"
as a child and was expecting a very good movie.  I YABBA-DABBA DO!
didn't make all of my expectations, but it is still fun to watch.  I
will now look forward to the next Flintstones movie.  On a scale of zero
to five, I give I YABBA-DABBA DO! a four.
     I YABBA-DABBA DO! is well-animated.  It is not as well animated as
a Disney film, but is much better than "Batman: The Animated Series".
Fans of animation will probably enjoy watching this film for the
animation alone.
     The voice of Wilma Flintstone is done by Jean Vander Pyl, who did
Wilma on the television show "The Flintstones" but Alan Reed, who used
to do the voice for Fred Flintstone is no longer doing it and it is now
done by Henry Corden.  William Hanna and Joseph Barbera (of
Hanna-Barbera) have brief voice cameos as themselves in this film.
     I YABBA-DABBA DO! is well-written.  Fred Flintstone and Barney
Rubble are great and I think will amuse the young and old alike (at
least those that were fans of "The Flintstones").  The writers did a
good job of making Pebbles and Bamm-Bamm older.   Unfortunately the
script has some slow spots in it.  Some of the comedy in this film is
aimed at adult viewers to keep them entertained.  There is also a lot of
slapstick humor that will entertain both adults and children.

Title
Review for Beyond the Valley of the Dolls (1970)
1:49, NC-17, Drama/Comedy, 1970
Director: Russ Meyer
Cast: Dolly Read, Cynthia Myers, Marcia McBroom, John LaZar,
      Michael Blodgett, Edy Williams, Charles Napier
     This film shows three rock singers, Dolly Read, Cynthia Myers, and
Marcia McBroom, who go to L.A. and start to make it big.  They run into
many problems on the fast track and try to make it through them
successfully.
     BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE DOLLS (the sequel to VALLEY OF THE DOLLS
by name only) has just been re-released on CBS/FOX Home Video (now just
called FOX Video I believe) and may be showing up in your local video
store.  This black comedy is worth seeing, if you can take weird dark
films.  On a scale of zero to five I give BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE
DOLLS a four (with reservations).  BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE DOLLS is
rated NC-17 for female nudity, adult situations, explicit language, and
violence.
     The biggest problem with BEYOND THE VALLEY OF THE DOLLS is that it
is rather slow in some places and probably could have been cut by half
an hour.  Other than that, the story, which was written by Russ Meyer
and film critic Roger Ebert, is well written.  On of the best things
about this film is that it doesn't conform with Hollywood standards,
which is probably what earned it the NC-17 rating.  The ending to the
film is very well done and leaves the viewer with a satisfied feeling.
     The actors and actresses are normal B grade film actors.  They
don't have a lot of talent, yet they are not horrible.  In some ways
though, they make the film better than if it had a higher grade cast.
Because the film is about the lower class talent, it fits better, I
feel, to have a lower class cast.

Title
Review for Innocent Blood (1992)
120 min., R, Horror, 1992
Director: John Landis
Cast: Anne Parillaud, Robert Loggia, Anthony LaPaglia, Kim Coates,
      Leo Burmester, Don Rickles, Sam Raimi, Frank Oz, Alfred Hitchcock,
      Dan Quale (yes, the Vice President)
     Anne Parillaud is a vampire who is running out of food.  She always
makes sure that her victims don't turn into vampires by finishing off
the body.  Parillaud turns to Italians as her next food source.  She
feeds off mob boss Robert Loggia, but doesn't get enough time to finish
him off.  Loggia comes back from the dead and sets off to make an undead
mob force.  Parillaud joins with cop Anthony LaPaglia to stop Loggia.
     I enjoyed INNOCENT BLOOD and recommend, if you aren't sick of
vampire movies yet, that you attempt to see this film.  It has now left
all the theaters in my area (I saw it on the last night it was playing)
and will probably soon be doing the same in other cities.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give INNOCENT BLOOD a four.  INNOCENT BLOOD is rated R
for explicit language, adult situations, graphic violence, and female
nudity.
     Anne Parillaud, mostly a foreign film actress, does a good job.
Robert Loggia gives a great and evil performance.  Anthony LaPaglia does
well in his role.  Kim Coates (I seem to remember seeing him in this
year's other vampire film BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER), also does a good
job.  There are many cameo performances in this film.  Frank Oz shows up
briefly as a mortician, Alfred Hitchcock, in a clip from one of his old
films, and Dan Quale, in a television appearance.  Director John Landis,
who has brought forth such films as AN AMERICAN WEREWOLF IN LONDON and
NATIONAL LAMPOON'S ANIMAL HOUSE has created a great movie, which
actually made me jump once (which I normally don't do).
     The eye effects were great.  I loved how the eyes changed colors,
it created a haunting image at some points.  The special effects in
general were outstanding.  The bite wounds looked sickening and the
vampire changeover facial effects were perfect.   The film was very well
written and didn't fall into too many vampire cliches.  The film also
did a good job with not portraying all vampires as vicious freaks.  It
said that some vampires have a sense of what is bad.

Title
Review for Batman Returns (1992)
121 min., PG-13, Action, 1992
Director: Tim Burton
Cast: Michael Keaton, Michelle Pfeiffer, Danny DeVito,
      Christopher Walken, Paul Reubens, Michael Gough, Pat Hingle,
      Michael Murphy, Vincent Schiavelli, Jan Hooks, Cristi Conaway
     Gotham City is being plagued with violence and Batman (Michael
Keaton) is called back for help.  This time two new criminals are
brought fourth, The Penguin (Danny DeVito), and the secretary with an
attitude problem, The Catwoman (Michelle Pfeiffer).  These two criminals
try to bring down Batman to their level to get rid of him.
     BATMAN RETURNS is an extremely good sequel to the original film,
BATMAN, which is almost as good as the original.  I feel that the
director, Tim Burton, has yet again created a wonderful film, that will
probably be loved by both children and adults.  Where BATMAN RETURNS
doesn't have all the characterization that BATMAN had, it does have more
violence.  On a scale of zero to five I give BATMAN RETURNS a five.
BATMAN RETURNS is rated PG-13 for violence, adult situations, and
explicit language.
     Like in the original, Gotham City looks like the New York City of
the future.  It is filled with towering buildings, and as far as I can
tell, has no trees.  Gotham City doesn't look like the nicest place to
live, but it is wonderfully designed.  When I was watching this movie, I
kept thinking of how much money must have gone into this city.  The are
also some stunning visual shot of the city which enhances the film more.
     Like in the original, BATMAN RETURNS has a lot of characterization,
although not as heavy as it was in the first, so creating a three
dimensional criminal, instead of the one dimensional criminal portrayed
in most movies.  The reasons for why the criminal does what he does are
explained, and overall creates a much more interesting movie.
     BATMAN RETURNS easily ranks as one of the best ten sequels that I
have seen.  I hope that when BATMAN 3, which I am sure is already being
worked on, is released that it will be as good as this one.  Tim Burton
seems to give Batman the touch that it needs, which unfortunately I
haven't found with the other films by him that I have seen.  BEETLEJUICE
wasn't that good of a movie; PEE-WEE'S BIG ADVENTURE ... well, I think
this one speaks for itself; and EDWARD SCISSORHANDS seemed to be missing
something.  I think that in Tim Burton's hands Batman has a lot of
potential and I hope to see more of him soon.
     This film will definitely lose a lot of its impact on video
cassette.  If you plan to see this movie, I highly suggest that you try
to find a theater that is still playing it to view it.  It is worth
whatever price you have to pay.

Title
Review for Body of Evidence (1993)
104 min., R, Drama/Mystery, 1993
Director: Uli Edel
Cast: Willem Dafoe, Madonna, Joe Mantegna, Anne Archer, Julianne Moore,
      Jurgen Prochnow, Frank Langella, (and Ernie Hudson uncredited?)
     Madonna's older lover dies of a heart attack while tied up.  The
D.A., Joe Mantegna, has Madonna arrested and brings her to court
claiming that Madonna, knowing of her lover's heart problem, secretly
gave her lover cocaine and then she made it with him until he died.
Madonna gets Willem Dafoe to represent her.  As the trial goes on,
Willem Dafoe gets drawn into Madonna's S&M games.
     BODY OF EVIDENCE is 1993's BASIC INSTINCT.  I had read in a
newspaper, about a month before this film was released, that said BODY
OF EVIDENCE had received an NC-17 rating.  The version that is in the
theaters, I assume, is cut.  After seeing it, I am surprised that it was
able to get an R rating.  On a scale of zero to five, I give BODY OF
EVIDENCE a five.  BODY OF EVIDENCE is rated R for female nudity, strong
sexual content, explicit language, adult situations, and violence.  A
word of warning, this film is not for children.
     I enjoyed this film very much.  The only major complaint that I
have about the film is that it is too short.  Two of the reasons that I
went out immediately to see this film is that I like the director Uli
Edel (LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN) and I have enjoyed Willem Dafoe (WILD AT
HEART, WHITE SANDS) in past films.  I am pleased to say that Willem
Dafoe gives an excellent performance and that Uli Edel has crafted
another great film.
     Madonna (A LEAGUE OF THEIR OWN, DESPERATELY SEEKING SUSAN) is
definitely the most overexposed (in more ways than one) person of 1992,
and it seems that she plans to stay there in 1993.  Riding off the
publicity from her recent album "Erotica" and her book SEX, she is now
about to stir up more waters with this film.  Madonna is definitely not
the best part of this film.  Willem Dafoe and Joe Mantegna's
performances are much better.  However she doesn't hurt the film.
     One of the best actresses in this film is the judge (I didn't
notice who played her).  She helped make this film, and I hope that she
gets the credit that she deserves.  Joe Mantegna (THE GODFATHER - PART
3, BUGSY) is also great.  He alone is worth going to see this film for.
     This film is very well written, and at some points reminds me of
the show "Civil Wars."  The ending to the film is not a typical
Hollywood type ending, I was pleased to see.  I won't say any more about
it though, so I won't spoil the film.
     People who got upset because of the sex scenes in BASIC INSTINCT
should definitely stay away from this film and watch A FEW GOOD MEN
instead, because I think they are worse in this film.  This film is
definitely worth a matinee price.

Title
Review for Bonnie & Clyde: The True Story (1992) (TV)
104 min., not rated, Drama/Action, 1992, made for television
Director: Gary Hoffman
Cast: Tracey Needham, Dana Ashbrook, Doug Savant, Betty Buckley,
      Billy Morrisette, Michael Bowen, Michelle Joyner,
      Louanne Stephens
     In the 1930's Clyde Barrow (Dana Ashbrook) meets Bonnie Parker
(Tracey Needham) in a small town.  The two join together with
W. D. Jones, Billy Morrisette.  They go around robbing stores and banks
becoming three of the most famous criminals in U. S. history.
     BONNIE AND CLYDE: THE TRUE STORY is a remake of the 1968 film
BONNIE AND CLYDE, starring Warren Beatty and Faye Dunaway.  I didn't
think that it would be possible to make a television film that would be
as good as the '68 film, but FOX did.  I highly recommend that if you
missed this film that you try to see it if it comes on television again
or if it is released on video cassette.  On a scale of zero to five, I
give BONNIE AND CLYDE: THE TRUE STORY a five.  BONNIE AND CLYDE is
unrated and made for television but contains scenes not appropriate for
small children.
     I think that this is one of the best television films that I have
ever seen.  This film is based on a true story of the infamous
criminals.  I have always felt that the film has had a sad ending.  The
acting in this film is great, which raises it above standard televison
films.  The story is well written, which I have found to be rare in the
majority of television films that I have seen.
     Hopefully this film will be released on video cassette so that more
people can see it.  While television films that are useless, like
HARDHAT AND LEGS, have been released on video that haven't been worth
watching off television, it is a shame when good television films, like
BLOOD TIES (1991), are not.  I feel that this film would have done well
in the theaters, and, I feel, should have been released in the theaters
instead, then it could have gotten more exposure.
     For those of you who have seen the '68 version, some of the film
has been changed, so it is not like re-watching the original.  This
makes the film better, I feel, because then you don't know exactly what
is going to happen next.
     The biggest let down in the film is the ending.  In the '68
version, you got to see the car shot up, which I thought was rather
cool.  In this film you don't see the car get shot up, and if I remember
correctly, you don't even hear a gun shot.  I just found this to be a
small disappointment.  Otherwise this the film is great.

Title
Review for Dracula (1992)
130 min., R, Horror/Drama, 1992
Director: Francis Ford Coppola
Cast:  Gary Oldman, Winona Ryder, Anthony Hopkins, Keanu Reeves,
       Richard E. Grant, Cary Elwes, Bill Campbell, Sadie Frost,
       Tom Waits
     BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA appears to be a true adaptation of Bram
Stoker's novel.  Keanu Reeves is sent to Transylvania to close a
real estate deal with Count Dracula, Gary Oldman.  Oldman, unknown to
Reeves, is an undead bloodsucker.  Oldman is interested in Reeve's
girlfriend Winona Ryder, and travels to London to get her.  Oldman is
hunted by slightly nutty doctor Anthony Hopkins.
     DRACULA, despite a few technical mistakes, is a very good film.
I feel that it is worth the admission price and well worth going to see
before it leaves the theaters.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
BRAM STOKER'S DRACULA a four.  DRACULA is rated R for female nudity,
graphic violence, and adult situations.
     The film is well written and it held my attention throughout.  I
read the book DRACULA many years ago, so I am not that familiar with
the way the book goes, but from what I could remember, the film seems to
follow the novel.  I was surprised to see that DRACULA is rather
"arty" in many places.  I feel that at least hose of you who tend to
enjoy "art" films might want to go to a matinee of BRAM STOKER'S
DRACULA.   I enjoyed the effect this had on the film.
     The acting in this film was very well done.  Gary Oldman did a
great job as the undead bloodsucker.  He was very convincing in
his role and brings life to the film.  Keanu Reeves (BILL AND TED'S
EXCELLENT ADVENTURE, POINT BREAK, BABES IN TOYLAND [1986 television
film]) is an interesting choice as an actor to portray Jonathan
Harker.  I wouldn't have chosen him as this character, but he does a
great job.  He is on the screen considerably for the first half of the
film, then disappears for the second half.  Winona Ryder (NIGHT ON
EARTH, 1969) is excellent as Reeves' fiancee.  I feel that she is the
major attraction in this film.  Ryder is on the screen the most, I
believe.  Anthony Hopkins gives an average performance as Van
Helsing, the vampire killer.  He neither hurt, nor helped the film.
     The sets that are used for the film are, for the most part, great.
The one part that I really didn't like was the train ride.  I felt that
that looked too unrealistic and cheap.  The interior of the castle was
especially well done, I feel.  I think that the special effects are very
well done.  I liked the look of the 1950s horror films that DRACULA
has.  One of those that I enjoyed the most was the bleeding cross in the
beginning of the film.

Title
Review for Prospero's Books (1991)
125 min., R, Drama, 1991
Director: Peter Greenaway
Cast: John Gielgud, Michael Clark, Isabelle Pasco, Michel Blanc, Erland
      Josephson, Tom Bell, Kenneth Cranham, Mark Rylance, Jim Vd Woude,
      Gerard Thoolen, Pierre Bokma
It's been two hours of silence, it's been two hours of pain, it's been
two hours that are gone forever that I'll never have again!  (with
apologies to Guns N' Roses).
      I am not really a fan of William Shakespeare.  I have not *had* to
read any of his plays yet (although I have heard that high school
teachers are fond of his work so I expect I will have had to read some
by the time I graduate).  I have seen two of Shakespeare's plays on the
screen, those being the 1990 version of HAMLET, which I gave a one, and
the 1953 version of JULIUS CAESAR, which I gave a zero.  PROSPERO'S
BOOKS I give a zero (on a zero to five basis).  I am obviously not the
only person with that feeling towards this film though because at least
six people walked out of the theater while the film was running (the
first, ten minutes into the film).  The reactions from some of the
audience towards the film seemed to be the same as mine.  My mother and
my sister also went and saw the film.  My mother is a fan of William
Shakespeare's work and she didn't like the film at all.  And my sister,
who is age 14, almost fell asleep during the film.  I am not saying that
no one will like the film but it has a very limited audience.
PROSPERO'S BOOKS is rated R for female nudity, male nudity, and adult
situations.
      William Shakespeare *did not* write PROSPERO'S BOOKS.  William
Shakespeare wrote THE TEMPEST.  Someone else (sorry, I missed who wrote
it) wrote PROSPERO'S BOOKS very loosely on THE TEMPEST.  I feel that if
William Shakespeare were alive today he would be disgusted with this
film.   William Shakespeare made THE TEMPEST as a comedy.  This is
definitely not a comedy, at least as far as I can tell.  The film is
supposed to be dream sequences, but it runs more like an LSD nightmare
from hell.  There are double images on the screen (sometimes triple)
that seem to have nothing to do with each other.  There is a lot of talk
about Prospero's endless amount of books that does nothing for the film.
In fact, most of Prospero's books are just plain boring, like the book
of mirrors.  THE TEMPEST is sort of followed but for those that have not
yet read THE TEMPEST that will be lost.  The words are jumbled together
and it was hard for me to follow, and I know the plot line of THE
TEMPEST.  For this reason I suggest that if you plan to go see
PROSPERO'S BOOKS that you first check out THE TEMPEST from your local
library and read it.
      There is a lot of nudity both male and female in the film, but it
is not done in an erotic fashion.  Most of the spirits wear little or no
clothing.   But they are just not clothed, it's not like it is a wild
orgy or anything like that.  There is only one sex scene in the film and
it lasts only a fraction of a second.  There is no bad language in the
film (I am not counting the reactions of some of the audience to the
film).  In some parts of the film the dialogue is put in the corners of
the screen, maybe so those who can't understand what the people are
saying can read it.  I would recommend not bringing your young children
to the film for no other reason than they will be bored through the
entire film.  I don't think the film is worth hiring a babysitter for,
so if you are a parent with children and you must see PROSPERO'S BOOKS,
I would highly suggest renting PROSPERO'S BOOKS when it comes to video
(if it does come to video) instead of seeing it in the theaters (plus it
will save you the high costs of the theater).
      I can't say anything really good about the costumes either.  Most
of the people in the film (the spirits) seemed to have a real lack of
costumes.   Whereas most of the others had costumes to the point of
ridiculousness.   The island seems to be a very dreary place to live,
and if I were Prospero, and had his powers, I would simply conjure up a
boat and get off that island.   Most of the film takes place in a very
dreary building.  The building is sometimes like a castle with
tapestries, columns, and elegant furniture and sometimes it is very
plain.  The most important part of this building seems to be a pool
which seems to be for both swimming and urinating in (how gross huh?).
There also seems to be a forest in this island, but it is not any forest
that I would want to live in.  It is very dark and gloomy (plus that
strange Caliban lives in there).
      I really hate to walk out from a movie without anything good to
say about it, so here is the good aspects of PROSPERO'S BOOKS.  The
previews for the coming attractions was not bad at all (of course the
previews will be different in your theater but I think it is safe to say
that any preview will be better than this film).  And Isabelle Pasco is
rather pretty.  I am sorry to say that I can't even talk about her
acting abilities for she doesn't get a chance to show any off.  For
about the first half of the film Pasco is sleeping.  That seems to be
one of the main features in the film for the camera man keeps showing us
many different angles.  Also, she only gets to say a couple of words
(was it four?)  during the entire movie.  This case seems to be true for
most of the actors in the film.  The only person who really has a
speaking role was John Gielgud (and maybe the person who played
Caliban).  Most of the actors only get to mutter a few sentences, at
best.  I will stop here with my trashing of the film.  I could probably
go on forever but I don't wish to bore you.
      One last comment, at the end of the film when Prospero throws a
copy of THE TEMPEST into the pool, I think that might be symbolic of how
Peter Greenaway threw out most of the charm from THE TEMPEST when making
this film.
      I am sorry but I really can't recommend PROSPERO'S BOOKS for
anyone.   My suggestion is to save your money and go see something else,
anything else.  The film KUFFS is a very good movie.  Maybe you should
go see that instead.

Title
Review for Amantes (1991)
105 min., R, Drama, 1991, In Spanish with English subtitles
Director: Vincente Aranda
Cast: Victoria Abril, Jorge Sanz, Maribel Verdu, Enrique Cerro,   
      Mabel Escano, Alicia Agut
     Ex-soldier Jorge Sanz moves into the town where his girlfriend
Maribel Verdu lives.  As soon as he gets a job and money, they will get
married.  Sanz rents a room from Victoria Abril.  She seduces him, and
Sanz finds that he is falling out of love with Verdu, and into love with
Abril.
     AMANTES is a rather sad film and is based on a true story.   I
don't recommend this film for everybody, although if it comes to a
theater near you for a cheap enough rate, you might be interested in
going to see it.  If the film sounds interesting to you from the review
I have written, I suggest that you do attempt to see this film at a
theater as I don't know if it will ever be released on video cassette.
On a scale of zero to five, I give AMANTES a four.  AMANTES is rated R
for strong sexual content, explicit language, adult situations, brief
female nudity, and brief male nudity.
     The actors/actresses in this film do a very good job.   Victoria
Abril is excellent as Jorge Sanz's landlady.  She is seductive, yet you
can see the evil behind what she does.  Jorge Sanz is great as the poor
man who is deeply in love with Maribel Verdu.  As he gets to know
Victoria Abril he starts to fall in love with her; or is it just the
sexual things that she does with him?  Maribel Verdu is excellent as
Jorge Sanz's girlfriend who sees herself losing him.  She has to convert
to Victoria Abril's tactics if she wants to keep Jorge Sanz for herself.
     This film reminded me a lot of the Pamela Smart case that happened
in New Hampshire last year.  It is almost the exact story, except
instead of a husband, the third person is a girlfriend.  The film is
quite well written.  The end of the film is rushed and a little
confusing.  There are a few slow spots, and I vaguely remember one place
that moved along too quickly, but other than that I don't remember any
problems with the writing.  The film presented the material rather well,
not making it too depressing, especially considering the content.
However, at some points, especially towards the end, the film does get
depressing.

Title
Review for Shadows and Fog (1992)
89 min., PG-13, Comedy, 1992, Black & White
Director: Woody Allen
Cast: Woody Allen, Mia Farrow, John Malkovich, Lily Tomlin,
      Madonna, Jodie Foster, Kathy Bates, John Cusack, Kate Nelligan,
      Wallace Shawn, Fred Gwynne, Donald Pleasence, Julie Kavner,
      Kenneth Mars, David Ogden Stiers, Josef Sommer, Philip Bosco,
      Robert Joy, Kurtwood Smith
     In the city of London, a strangler is going around killing people.
Allen, for no known reason, is convinced by a vigilante group to go out
to the streets on a very foggy night to try to help catch the strangler.
Once on the streets Allen doesn't know what to do, so he wanders around
aimlessly running into all sorts of people.
     SHADOWS AND FOG is a typical Woody Allen film.  It is fun to watch,
in a Woody sort of way, and is a must see for Woody fans, but seems to
have no real significance.  I don't recommend this film for those people
who don't care for Woody's films.  SHADOWS AND FOG is not close to being
as good as the film EVERYTHING YOU EVER WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT SEX, BUT
WERE AFRAID TO ASK, which I consider to be Woody's best film yet.  The
film is worth watching , but I can't give it over a three (on a scale of
zero to five).  SHADOWS AND FOG is rated PG-13 for adult situations and
adult humor.
     The film is filmed in black and white, which gives it an eerie
feeling.  When Woody, or anybody else, is walking around London, it is
rather spooky.  It adds a real atmosphere to the film (and also probably
cut down on the cost quite a bit).  Just about the entire cast of the
film are established actors/actresses, although many of them only have
cameo appearances.  The only two people who have real roles in the film
are Woody Allen and Mia Farrow.  Others, like John Malkovich, Lily
Tomlin, and John Cusack, have supporting roles, but aren't on the screen
for very long.  Others, like Madonna, are on the screen for about two or
three minutes, and then never to be seen again.  They all, however, give
wonderful performances.
     Some of the camera angles were very inventive and others I really
didn't care for.  I think the one I disliked the most was in the brothel
where the camera was sitting in one spot panning around the table.  It
made me feel a little dizzy, and most of the picture was blurry because
the camera was focused on a few people sitting around the table, and
mostly what the camera saw was the walls of the room (because there were
so few people).
     The locations and scenery were very good.  The rooms had a Peter
Greenawayesque feeling to them from the way that the props were placed,
and in most instances what the props were.  The locations really looked
like they were in London,  (I didn't think to look at the credits at the
end to see where it was actually filmed).  The way the alleys looked, I
found to be rather beautiful.  This seems a bit weird to me after seeing
the film, with the presence that the alleys were supposed to portray,
but in the black and white and with the stone work on the buildings the
alleys looked very pleasing.
     I was quite shocked to see how old Woody looked.  The last film I
had seen Woody in was A MIDSUMMER'S NIGHT SEX COMEDY, which was done in
1982.  Woody has never looked young in anything that I have seen him in.
Even in EVERYTHING YOU EVER WANTED TO KNOW ABOUT SEX..., which was done
in 1972, Woody looked old.  But now he looks *very* old, and I almost
didn't recognize him (his voice definitely gave it away).

Title
Review for Lacenaire (1990)
135 min., not rated, Drama, 1991, In French with English subtitles
Director: Francis Girod
Cast: Daniel Auteuil, Jean Poiret, Jacques Weber, Francois Perier,
      Genevieve Casile, Jacques Duby, Jean Davy, Paul Le Person,
      Maiwenn Le Beso, Jacques Sereys, Rufus, Gerald Desarthe
     In the 19th Century, notorious criminal Daniel Auteuil (who might
have actually existed) gets caught and thrown in jail.  The entire movie
is a look by him back on his criminal life through the book that he is
writing about his life.
     L'ELEGANT CRIMINEL is going to be released on video cassette soon,
so don't bother to go see this one in the theaters.  I don't think that
it is worth the money.  The film is interesting to a point, so when it
is released on video cassette, you might give it a look.  On a scale of
zero to five, I give L'ELEGANT CRIMINEL a three.  L'ELEGANT CRIMINEL is
unrated and contains explicit language, adult situations, and violence.
     One of the problems with L'ELEGANT CRIMINEL is its length.  Towards
the end of the film, I found myself getting bored because of the length
and the fact that it didn't have enough content to warrant being that
long.  In THE GODFATHER (and the sequels) there was enought material to
keep the films interesting even though they were extremely long.  This
one runs short of material, so several scenes are stretched out longer
than they should be.  The story line is interesting, to a point.  Some
details about the man's life are left in that I felt were unnecessary
and distracted from the rest of the film.
     The acting in this film is very good and is one of the film's
strong points.  Auteuil does an excellent job.  The supporting cast (I
don't remember who played whom) was also great.  The other strong point
of the film is its elaborate sets.  The sets are great and place the
film very well.  It looks like a lot of work went into building (or
finding) the sets.

Title
Review for Crying Game, The (1992)
     THE CRYING GAME is a film written and directed by Neil Jordan.  It
stars Stephen Rea, Jaye Davidson, Forest Whitaker, and Miranda
Richardson.  Rated R for nudity and mature themes.
     THE CRYING GAME is Jordan's best film since MONA LISA.  After a
string of flops---THE MIRACLE, WE'RE NO ANGELS, and the awful HIGH
SPIRITS---it's a profound relief to know that he is still capable of
making a film that is both thoughtful and gripping.
     This is a difficult film to review.  To discuss it properly would
require me to give away many of the surprises it holds in store for you.
     Stephen Rea plays Fergus, an IRA terrorist, who helps kidnap Jody,
a black English soldier played by Forest Whitaker.  The IRA want to
exchange Jody for one of their own men who is being interrogated by the
British.  If he's not handed back to them in three days, the IRA will
kill Jody.  Fergus has a kinder nature than the other kidnappers, who
see Jody only as a bargaining token, and he is gradually befriended by
Jody: Fergus feeds Jody, talks to him, and spends many hours guarding
him alone.  Jody grows to trust Fergus and knowing that he probably
won't survive, he shows a picture of his girlfriend to Fergus and asks
him to look her up.
     After the kidnapping ends in a bloody raid by the British Army,
Fergus barely escapes with his life.  Deciding to lie low for a while,
he heads "across the water" to London, where he gets himself a job as a
brickie on a building site.  Jimmy, as he now calls himself, finds Dil
(Jody's girlfriend, played by Jaye Davidson) and becomes friends with
her.  Of course, they start to fall in love.  Life suddenly becomes far
more complicated when the other survivors of the IRA cell catch up with
him.
     There are some obvious parallels to MONA LISA.  In both, the stars
are gentle, kind, naive men trapped in circumstances beyond their
control, with obligations to their ruthless bosses.  In both, they fall
in love with a beautiful, self-destructive black woman (though in
neither film is their colour important).
     THE CRYING GAME is not, however, a simple-minded reworking of MONA
LISA.  For one thing, it's not so bleak in tone.  Dil is sweeter, more
innocent, and less self-destructive than her counterpart in MONA LISA,
and Fergus is made of somewhat sterner stuff than Bob Hopkins's
character.
     THE CRYING GAME is a voyage of self discovery.  Fergus comes to
learn about himself, about the nature of loyalty, friendship, love, and
sexual attraction.
     This is a wonderful film, much better than my meager reviewing
skills are able to convey to you.  THE CRYING GAME works well both as a
thriller and as a love story.  Jordan has filled the film with
unheralded surprises, and the central surprise, the point upon which
much of the film turns, was completely unexpected to most of the
audience---including me.  Not only are the direction and the plot
excellent, but so too are the performances; in particular, those of
Davidson (whose first film this is) and Rea.
     I don't yet know which is the better film, MONA LISA or THE CRYING
GAME.  I'm not even sure if the question is worth asking---both are
excellent films and the comparison is somewhat invidious.  I do know
that I will enjoy watching THE CRYING GAME again and that it's been too
long since I last saw MONA LISA.
     Recommended.  One of the best films of the year.
________________
George V. Reilly   

Title
Review for Fisher King, The (1991)
      Normally I would put a brief summary of the film here but the only
way I could do that would spoil THE FISHER KING so I decided to skip the
summary.   Most people have already seen this film but I wanted to put
in my opinion anyway.
      THE FISHER KING is rated R for explicit language, adult
situations, and one very small scene of graphic violence.  I give the
film a four on a zero to five scale.  I highly recommend seeing the film
for it is very well done and enjoyable.  Although the film looks like it
runs for a long time it doesn't seem that long when you're actually
watching it.
      The reason I went to see this film is because it stars Robin
Williams, and I am a fan of Robin Williams' work.  The film I saw was
quite different than what I had expected from the ads.  I was expecting
a retelling of the Fisher King and the holy grail story.  The movie is
not really a retelling of the Fisher King story.  It is however a really
good film that is definitely worth watching at full price.
      Robin Williams puts in one of his best roles yet.  His best role
in my opinion was in DEAD POETS SOCIETY.  His character in THE FISHER
KING is quite believable.  Williams thinks that he is a knight in a
quest to find the holy grail.  Williams is able to put humor into this
character without ruining the dramatic part of this film.  At some
points in the film I felt myself wanting to get up and cheer for Robin
Williams while other times I felt bad for him.  
      Jeff Bridges also puts in a great performance.  Bridges finds out
about Robin Williams and his quest.  Because of a past event Bridges
feels badly for Williams and tries to make himself Williams protector.
This puts a lot of strain on Williams and his girlfriend Ruehl.  Jeff
Bridges really brings his character to life and, like Robin Williams,
really made me feel for his character.
      Director Terry Gilliam has done MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL,
which was a very good comedy about the quests for the holy grail, and
BRAZIL, a science fiction film that I thought was horrible.  He has also
done a couple of other films that I have not seen, both comedies.  He is
an actor in the MONTY PYTHON films too.  I don't think that Gilliam has
ever done a dramatic film before this one and I feel that THE FISHER
KING was a very good start.

Title
Review for Alien (1992)
     Well, if it isn't the season for sequels.  ALIEN 3 and LETHAL
WEAPON 3 are currently playing in the theaters.  HONEY, I BLEW UP THE
KID and BATMAN RETURNS are coming to the theaters during the summer.
CLASS OF NUKE 'EM HIGH 2: SUBHUMANOID MELTDOWN, WAXWORK 2: LOST IN TIME,
and VICE ACADEMY 3 (all direct to video releases I think) just recently
hit video.  I just saw ALIEN 3 and I hope to soon see LETHAL WEAPON 3.
     All of the survivors of ALIENS, except for Sigourney Weaver, die,
when their life support pods crash on a planet.  The planet is an old
maximum security prison, where all the prisoners have taken a vow of
celibacy.  An alien facehugger had snuck into the pod ship and is now in
the prison.
     I was rather disappointed with ALIEN 3.  I feel that ALIEN, a
five-star movie, is one of the best horror/sci-fi flicks out and that
ALIENS, a four star movie, is a good sci-fi film.  I was expecting a
wonderful film for ALIEN 3 filled with elaborate sets, a great
continuation of the alien story, and great special effects.   Two out of
three aren't bad, the sets were great and I have no complaints about the
special effects.  The story, however, leaves something to be desired.
On a scale of zero to five, I give ALIEN 3 a three.  ALIEN 3 is rated R
for graphic violence and explicit language.
     Basically I enjoyed seeing ALIEN 3, the problem being that the film
got marred by the story line.  The story for ALIEN 3 looks like it was
thrown together and released because the producers figured that people
would flock to see another alien movie.  Well, people, at least in my
town, are flocking to see the movie.  I think the 9:30 PM showing I went
to got sold out.
     The acting in the movie is great.  Charles S. Dutton (of FOX's
"ROC" and MISSISSIPPI MASALA) is my favorite person in the film.   Even
though he is a prisoner he seems to have the most caring and compassion,
although sometimes he doesn't show it.  Lance Henriksen (Bishop in
ALIENS) is back, although this time as the creator of Bishop.  Sigourney
Weaver is starting to get a little tiresome.  Of course, the alien is
great!
     If the first two alien movies hadn't been so good, or if this film
were standing alone, I think that it would have gotten a higher rating.
But it had a lot of expectations to live up to, and compared to the
other two alien movies, it doesn't fare too well.   I hope that there
will be no ALIEN 4 because I think that they have run out of good ideas.
     The Alien films have been very highly spoofed.  Part of the reason
for this is that the it has been such a good series that almost
everybody has seen at least one of the films.  ALIEN has been spoofed in
films like Mel Brooks's SPACEBALLS and on television in shows like, the
British comedy series "Red Dwarf," and I seem to remember a "Saturday
Night Live" skit spoofing ALIEN.
     I highly suggest that if you plan to see this film, that you
re-watch ALIEN and ALIENS, for this film takes off where ALIENS left
off.  I do see no reason why you should go to the theater to see this
film.  It is marginal whether it is worth seeing at a theater, but would
probably be worth seeing on video.

Title
Review for Ricochet (1991)
95 min, R, Action, 1991
Director: Russell Mulcahy
Cast: Denzel Washington, John Lithgow, Ice-T, Kevin Pollak, Lindsay Wagner
      Criminal Lithgow is planning to get into big time crime with a
killing at a carnival.  Rookie cop Washington is there and stops him,
and subsequently becomes famous because of it.  Lithgow is sent to
prison where he follows Washington's career with intent to ruin
Washington's career, like he ruined his.
      RICOCHET is rated R for graphic violence, explicit language, and
female nudity.  I give RICOCHET a four (on a zero to five scale).  I
highly recommend this film for anyone who likes action films, but a word
of caution for people with weak stomachs; the violence in the film gets
quite gory at some points.  I do suggest that you go to see the film in
the theater for, like most films, RICOCHET will lose some of it's impact
on video it is well worth the $6.75 admission price (or whatever it is
where you are).
      RICOCHET is a very good action film (but not in the league of
TANGO & CASH, which happens to be my favorite action film).  After the
very beginning the first half is sort of like a prison drama then it
goes back to an action film.
      The basic thing that I didn't like about the film is the lack of
time that Ice-T got in the film.  This is rapper Ice-T's second film,
the first being NEW JACK CITY.  He shows up only briefly in the
beginning and he shows up again near the end of the film.  Although the
critics seem not to like Ice- T's acting I feel that he has good acting
ability and he has the ability to put humor into a role.  I was upset
also that he only did one song for the movie, for the end credits.
      The other complaint about the film is that I think that they could
have picked someone a little more sinister for John Lithgow's role.  For
instance I think that John Glover (from 52 PICK-UP) would have been a
much better bad guy.  At some points in the film John Lithgow didn't
seem to really be as cruel and as heartless as his character was
supposed to be.   In addition Lithgow's partner (I didn't catch who
played him) didn't fit his role at all.

Title
Review for Last Exit to Brooklyn (1989)
103 min., R, Drama, 1990, U.S./German
Director: Uli Edel
Cast: Stephen Lang, Jennifer Jason Leigh, Burt Young,
      Christopher Murney, Jerry Orbach, Alexis Arquette,
      Stephen Baldwin, John Costelloe, Cameron Johann,
      Ricki Lake, Frank Military, Camille Saviola, Zette
     This film tells the story of several people living in Brooklyn, New
York.  Jennifer Jason Leigh is a prostitute who gets soldiers to go with
her to a secluded place and then robs them blind.  Burt Young finds out
that his teenage daughter Ricki Lake is pregnant.  Jerry Orbach is
running a strike that has been going on for six months without any
results.
     LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN is a very good, but very dramatic, film.  I
fully recommend that you rent this film from your local video store.
LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN has probably been over looked by most people
because it doesn't look very good.  They are wrong.  I give LAST EXIT TO
BROOKLYN a four on a scale of zero to five.  LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN is
rated R for explicit language, adult situations, female nudity,
violence, rape, and strong sexual content.
     The actors in this film do a great job.  They all are very
convincing.  The two actors that stand out the most are Burt Young, who
I think gives the best performance in this film, and Jennifer Jason
Leigh.  Leigh, I think, puts in the best performance of her career,
which raises her above the exploitation films that she used to star in
(like FAST TIMES AT RIDGEMONT HIGH).  Jerry Orbach also puts in a great
performance, but he isn't on the screen that much.  The person who I
think put in the worst performance in the film was Stephen Baldwin.  He
could have put a little more effort into his role to make it more
believable.
     LAST EXIT TO BROOKLYN was very well written, although most of the
major film critics seemed to think that the film was over dramatic and
not worth seeing (Roger Ebert excluded), and kept me interested
throughout the film.  I didn't get bored at all during the film.  The
characters are interesting and I was interested in what happened to
them.  This film, unlike what the box cover might suggest, is not an
exploitation film but a serious drama.
     Uli Edel, a first-time director (I think), did a great job with his
direction and I think has a future in movies.  The locations were good;
most of them were really filmed in Brooklyn.

Title
Review for Ski School (1991)
87 min., R, Comedy, 1990
Director: Damian Lee
Cast: Dean Cameron, Tom Breznahan, Patrick Labyoteaux,
      Mark Thomas Miller, Spencer Rochfort, Darlene Vogel,
      Stuart Fratkin, Charlie Spradling
     A well-known ski school has two divisions that continuously battle.
One is battling to get the other thrown out.  The other is battling to
get revenge on the other one.  Mixed in the battle are the new recruits.
     SKI SCHOOL is done by Moviestore Entertainment and distributed by
HBO home video.  SKI SCHOOL, like the earlier films HOT DOG...THE MOVIE
and SNOWBALLING (I have seen neither film, but have heard that they are
good), attempts to make fun of the skiing industry.  Although this film
seems to try hard, it is inconsistently funny and only worth watching
for below $1.50.  On a scale of zero to five, I give SKI SCHOOL a three.
SKI SCHOOL is rated R for explicit language, female nudity, and adult
situations.
     SKI SCHOOL has many great and hilarious moments; its main problem
is that what is between them either there are boring bits, or gratuitous
nudity which seems out of place and just put in for titillation.  If the
film had filled between the laughs with more laughs, I think it would
have ended up much better.  Many of the jokes are sight gags, so those
who go more for subtle comedy will probably find the entire film too
silly and stupid.  Those of you who enjoy films like THE NAKED GUN 2
1/2: THE SMELL OF FEAR will probably find this film worth watching,
once.
     I found this film rather disappointing because it has so much
potential in some areas.  Too often the joke gets lost along the way, or
the joke gets changed and is no longer funny.  The cast is relatively
good, but it shows that they are B movie actors.  Like most B movies,
some of the cast really stand out.  In this film there are two, Charlie
Spradling and the guy who looks and sounds like Rob Scheider of
"Saturday Night Live" (sorry, I couldn't figure out which one he was).
These two deserve more than what this film ended up being.
     Even though the film was made in 1990, my local video store just
recently got it.  I have been waiting a while to see this film and am
disappointed that it didn't reach my expectations.  Oh well, it was
better than the last Moviestore Entertainment film I saw, which was
MEATBALLS 4.  Then again, if I had seen the Moviestore Entertainment
name on the videocassette box, based on my past experiences with their
films, my expectations would not have been so high.

Title
Review for Strangers in Good Company (1991)
97 min., PG, Drama/Comedy, 1991, Canadian
Director: Cynthia Scott
Cast: Alice Diabo, Constance Garneau, Winifred Holden,
      Cissy Meddings, Mary Meigs, Catherine Roche,
      Michelle Sweeny, Beth Webber
     Several women are on a bus when it breaks down in the middle of
nowhere.  One of the women knows of an old falling apart house nearby
where no one lives anymore.  There are no provisions in the house and
they have little with them.  They have to depend on each other's talents
and knowledge until the bus can be fixed.
     STRANGERS IN GOOD COMPANY is a rather good film.  It does have some
slow spots, but on the whole it is well crafted.  The locations are well
picked.  By the house is a beautiful lake, and the house has nice
mountains in the background.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
STRANGERS IN GOOD COMPANY a three.  STRANGERS IN GOOD COMPANY is rated
PG for adult situations.
     The story, itself, is very well done.  It is touching.  You can
feel when the people are scared or depressed.  The actresses did a very
good job, I feel, convincing the audience that they were the character
in the film.  The one main problem with the film is that it sometimes
gets slow.  The fault is not with the actresses, I think, but lies in
the screenplay.  The other main problem with the film is that the oldest
woman tries, I think, to draw a little too much sympathy from the
audience.  If the actress, sorry I don't remember who played her, had
under played the character a bit, the character would have been more
believable.  The screenplay, otherwise, is very well done.  It is a
believable story, which makes the movie much better.  The characters are
ones that I felt myself caring about.  I was hoping that they wouldn't
die stranded out in the middle of nowhere, but would make it to
civilization.

Title
Review for Ataque de los pjaros, El (1987)
1:27, Horror, 1987
Self rating: "unsuitable for anyone under 17" (graphic violence,
                                 female nudity, adult situations)
Rating: four (on a scale of zero to five)
Director: Rene Cardona, Jr.
Cast: Christopher Atkins, Michelle Johnson, Sonia Infante, Salvador Pineda,
      Carol Connery
     Around the world, stories of birds attacking humans start to
surface.  Reporter Michelle Johnson and her camera man Christopher
Atkins are sent to cover the stories thinking they are nothing but a
novelty story.  The two discover that the attacks may be linked and may
be the birds ganging together to try and destroy the human race.
Johnson and Atkins try and try to find a way to get people to know of
the grave danger that could be in store for them.
     BEAKS: THE MOVIE (which also has been released under the title
BIRDS OF PREY - 1987 version) is a remake of sorts of Alfred
Hitchcock's suspense film THE BIRDS.  This film is available (at least
for rental) on IVE videocassette, but may be hard to find.  I can only
recommend this film to gore film freaks and/or fans of Rene Cardona,
Jr.'s films, because all others will probably find this film a complete
waste of time.  This film might have been able to get away with an R
rating, but I expect that it would have received an X (this film was
made in the days before the NC-17 rating) for graphic violence.
     The gore, which is extremely plentiful in this film, is very well
done.  There are numerous scenes of birds ripping apart the faces and
bodies of people that are so gory and graphic it is impossible not to
watch.  The director, Rene Cardona, Jr. (who did the film THE TREASURE
OF THE AMAZON) has done a really good job with this film.  The film
moves along at a good pace with not too much time between the scenes of
gore.
     The cast is of reasonably good quality, and surprisingly enough,
above that of most horror films.  Michelle Johnson (BLAME IT ON RIO,
BLOOD TIES (1991), DR. GIGGLES) does a great job in her role.  She
brought some life into her character, which is not often seen in this
grade of a picture.  She also didn't seem to be following any of
Hollywood's horror stereotypes.  Christopher Atkins (THE BLUE LAGOON)
also does a good job of breaking the Hollywood stereotypes.  He makes a
rounded character that is interesting to watch.
     The screenplay for this film is rather well written for one of
this genre.  There are some surprises in the film, although not that
many.  The film is predictable in many places, but unfortunately most
films are.  It does, however, resemble that of Alfred Hitchcock's THE
BIRDS in several places, but there are some differences so it is not a
complete rip-off.  The lines of dialog are not those of complete horror
movie morons, however in some places they do get rather stupid, but you
can't have everything.  The ending to the film is too quick and wasn't
done as well as it could have been.  Some things fit together just a
little too well in the end.

Title
Review for Mediterraneo (1991)
90 min., not rated, Drama, 1992, In Italian with English subtitles
Director: Gabriele Salvatores
Cast: Diego Abatantuono, Claudio Bigaglili, Guiseppe Cederna,
      Claudio Bilso, Luigi Alberti, Ugo Conti, Memo Dini,
      Vasco Mirandola, Luigi Montini, Irene Grazioli, Antonio Catania,
      Vanna Barba
     Several Italian soldiers are sent to a Greek island for four
months.  After they arrive, their ship gets blown up.  At first the
island appears to be empty, but the soldiers who are cut off from the
world soon, find the villagers.  The soldiers have to start new lives on
the island because they can't get off of it.
     MEDITERRANEO is a wonderful film, and I strongly urge you to go see
it.  The film completely entertained me for the full hour and a half,
but I wished that it was longer because I found myself wanting to know
more about the soldiers.  I am really glad that I got to go see this
film and I feel that it is worth full ticket price, whatever it is.  On
a scale of zero to five, I give MEDITERRANEO a five.  MEDITERRANEO is
not rated but contains female nudity, adult situations, and explicit
language.
     The locations used for the film were great; the island is
beautiful, especially in the mountain country and in the bay area.  The
shots overlooking the ocean are fascinating and really made me want to
go visit this island.  The people on the island were well portrayed,
which added to the film.
     The film has comedy sprinkled through it, which I found made the
film more enjoyable.  I tend to like a film better when it makes me
laugh a few times.  The plot is not overpowering and is one that I don't
think I have seen before.  The soldiers were interesting people, they
were given personalities, traits, hobbies, etc.  The actors who
portrayed the soldiers did a great job.  I am glad that this film won an
Oscar for the best foreign language film in the 1992 Oscars because I
feel that it really deserved it.
     MEDITERRANEO I think is the best film that I have seen this year
and ranks as one of my favorite films out of all the films that I have
seen.  It is just a great film in its cinematography, directing, acting,
and story line.  If you tend to like foreign films, definitely go see
this one even if you have to travel to do so.

Title
Review for Obsessed (1992) (TV)
98 min., not rated, Drama/Suspence, 1992, Made-for-television
Director: Jonathan Sanger
Cast: Shannen Doherty, William Devane, Clare Carey, James Handy,
      Lois Chiles, Lisa Ann Poggi, Albert Stratton
     First there was the nanny from hell (THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE
CRADLE), then the lesbian icepick murderer (BASIC INSTINCT), followed
by the psycho roommate (SINGLE WHITE FEMALE), and now there is a
deranged girlfriend.  Shannen Doherty meets older William Devane when
she is looking at his boat.  Doherty and Devane become lovers, but she
gets too obsessive and he calls the relationship off.  She can't handle
that and wants to pay him back.
     OBSESSED was made for the ABC television network, and is rather
good.  It isn't as good as the other films listed above, but is still
worth trying to see, although some people may be sick of psycho films
and just want to skip this one.  I wouldn't hunt too hard for this film,
it will probably be on repeats in one to three years and you can see it
then if you are still interested.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
OBSESSED a four.
     The actors in OBSESSED do a good job, although sometimes it shows
that they are television actors.  Shannen Doherty sometimes gets a
little carried away with her role and sometimes William Devane doesn't
seem to put enough into his.  But for the most part they carry the film
successfully.  The major problem that I found with the film is that I
couldn't sympathize with any of the characters.  William Devane's
character was a complete jerk and deserved what came to him.  On the
other hand, Shannen Doherty's character was a complete bitch and also
deserved what came to her.
     The film could have been written a little better.  In some parts it
seemed to plod along and other parts looked like they had been put in to
fill up time.  The advertisements for this film made it out to be a lot
more than it was, which is unfortunate because probably many people saw
this film expecting something else and ended up sorely disappointed.
Maybe people should lay off the psycho films until 1993, because there
has been a great amount in the theaters recently, and they are starting
to come to home video (THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE is already out and
BASIC INSTINCT is coming soon).  At least this film is a break from the
"standard television films" and this may mark the start of more films
like it.

Title
Review for Single White Female (1992)
110 min., R, Suspense, 1992
Director: Barbet Schroeder
Cast: Jennifer Jason Leigh, Bridget Fonda, Steven Weber,
      Peter Friedman, Stephen Tobolowski
     Bridget Fonda catches her fiance Steven Weber cheating on her with
his ex-wife and kicks him out of her house.  To avoid being lonely, she
puts an advertisement for a roommate in the paper.  Fonda picks Jennifer
Jason Leigh, a seemingly quiet girl, to be her new roommate.  Fonda
finds out later on that Leigh might not be the person that Fonda thought
Leigh was.
     This is a great suspense film that is definitely worth the ticket
price.  The one major problem with the film is that it seems to be a rip
off of THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE.  It just seems to me that the
plots are relatively close and that maybe somebody should have tried to
make this film a little more original.  Both films have a psychopathic
girl who is trying to take control of the people in their lives (for
different reasons) and are willing to kill to get what they want.  Then
again, this is the basic plot line for all the movies in this genre.
SINGLE WHITE FEMALE is rated R for female nudity, adult situations,
violence, and explicit language.  On a scale of zero to five, I give
SINGLE WHITE FEMALE a five.
     The film moves along smoothly as it progresses.  It doesn't
suddenly jerk into a new situation.  It slowly builds to it, which adds
suspense.  I feel that anybody who enjoyed THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE
CRADLE will most likely enjoy this film.  The actresses are great.
Jennifer Jason Leigh has definitely raised herself above the FAST TIMES
AT RIDGEMONT HIGH level with her current films, RUSH, LAST EXIT TO
BROOKLYN, and SINGLE WHITE FEMALE.  Bridget Fonda, the daughter of Jane
Fonda I believe, also does a great job.  The only male in this film
that I think gives a great performance is Stephen Tobolowski, who plays
Fonda's scummy boss.  The other two males, Steven Weber, and Peter
Friedman who plays Fonda's good friend, both did passable performances.
Fortunately their poor performances didn't hurt the film too much and
the film is still great to watch.
     There isn't really too much to say about this film, other than the
fact that it is a great film and I highly recommend that you don't miss
it.  I think the film will be much more spectacular on the big screen
than on video tape, so I suggest going to the theater to see it if
possible.

Title
Review for Rush (1991)
117 min., R, Drama, 1992
Director: Lili Fini Zanuck
Cast: Jennifer Jason Leigh, Jason Patric, Sam Elliott, Max Perlich,
      Gregg Allman, Tomy Frank, William Sadler, Special K. McCray
     Undercover narcotics cop Jason Patric has to take on a partner.  He
picks new cadet Jennifer Jason Leigh.  They are put out on the streets
to catch drug dealer Gregg Allman.  While investigating, they find
themselves becoming addicted to drugs.
     I was going to see RUSH in the theaters the weekend it opened, but
it opened the same weekend as THE HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE.  I went to
see that instead and was going to see RUSH the next weekend.  The next
weekend RUSH had already closed so now I have seen it on video and
because of the lack of reviews on it when it came out, I decided to
write one.  RUSH is the best narcotics film that I have seen since
DRUGSTORE COWBOY.  On a scale of zero to five, I give the film a five.
RUSH is rated R for explicit language, adult situations, and graphic
violence.
     The acting in the film is great.  Jennifer Jason Leigh gives one of
her best performances in her career.  Jason Patric does a much better
job than usual.  His acting could have been improved a little, but he
still did a great job.  Max Perlich's character I liked least in the
film, but it was not because of Perlich's acting, it was just the
character.  This film is not heavy on action at all, it is mostly drama
(which is misleading from some of the advertisements for the film, so be
forewarned).
     The story is written extremely well.  It kept my interest
throughout and didn't fall into many Hollywood cliches (although there
was a slight problem at the ending in this respect).  The film shows the
gritty downside to being a undercover narcotics officer, and because of
how well it does this, it makes the film excellent viewing.  I think the
thing that drowned this film at the box office was that it is not a
traditional Hollywood film, so it wasn't able to find the audience that
it needed.  It also most likely got left in the dust with films like THE
HAND THAT ROCKS THE CRADLE and BASIC INSTINCT out.  Now that it is on
video I think that it will find the audience that it deserves.
     If you have not yet seen this film, I strongly urge you to rent it.
It is definitely worth what ever price you pay and will provide you with
almost two hours of pure enjoyment (but be prepared to be sad in some
parts).
